U.S.  COMPETITIVENESS:

THE  INNOVATION  CHALLENGE

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JULY  21,  2005

Serial No. 109–24

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

22–550PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
DENNIS  MOORE,  Kansas

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

July  21,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Sherwood  L.  Boehlert,  Chairman,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Jerry  F.  Costello,  Member,  Committee  on
Science, U.S. House of Representatives .............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Vernon J. Ehlers, Member, Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Michael  M.  Honda,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ............................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Lincoln  Davis,  Member,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Todd Tiahrt ............................................

Witnesses:

Mr. Nicholas M. Donofrio, Executive Vice President for Innovation and Tech-

nology, IBM Corporation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................

Mr. John P. Morgridge, Chairman of the Board, Cisco Systems, Inc.

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................

Dr. William R. Brody, President, The Johns Hopkins University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Mr. Nicholas M. Donofrio, Executive Vice President for Innovation and Tech-
nology, IBM Corporation .....................................................................................
Mr. John P. Morgridge, Chairman of the Board, Cisco Systems, Inc.
................
Dr. William R. Brody, President, The Johns Hopkins University .......................

(III)

8
9

9
10

11

12

12

13
65

14
16
22
24

25
26
31
32

33
35
41
42
51

76
78
79

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Page

IV

Statement  by  The  Institute  of  Electric  and  Electronics  Engineers—United
States of America (IEEE–USA) ..........................................................................

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

U.S.  COMPETITIVENESS:  THE  INNOVATION

CHALLENGE

THURSDAY,  JULY  21,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:05  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Sherwood  L.
Boehlert [Chairman of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

U.S. Competitiveness:

The Innovation Challenge

THURSDAY, JULY 21, 2005

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Thursday,  July  21,  2005,  the  House  Science  Committee  will  hold  a  hearing
to  examine  the  relationship  between  federal  science  and  engineering  research  and
education investments and U.S. economic competitiveness.
2. Witnesses
Mr. Nicholas Donofrio is Senior Vice President for Technology and Manufacturing
at IBM Corporation.
Mr.  John  Morgridge  is  Chairman  of  Cisco  Systems,  Incorporated,  and  part-time
Professor at Stanford University’s Graduate School of Business. From 1988 to 1995,
Mr. Morgridge was CEO and President of Cisco.
Dr. William Brody is the President of The Johns Hopkins University. He has pre-
viously  served  as  Director  of  the  Department  of  Radiology,  Professor  of  Electrical
and Computer Engineering, and Professor of Biomedical Engineering at Johns Hop-
kins,  and  Radiologist-in-Chief  at  The  Johns  Hopkins  Hospital.  He  is  also  Co-chair
of the Council on Competitiveness National Innovation Initiative.

3. Overarching Questions

• How do federal science and engineering research and education programs fos-

ter innovation and contribute to U.S. economic competitiveness?

• How is the global competitive landscape changing, particularly with regard to
innovation  capacity,  and  what  does  this  mean  for  future  U.S.  economic  per-
formance?  What  are  the  principal  innovation-related  challenges  U.S.  busi-
nesses face in terms of competing in the global economy?

• How  can  research  and  development  (R&D)  and  math,  science,  and  engineer-
ing  education  and  training  better  contribute  to  the  Nation’s  innovation  sys-
tem and the U.S. competitive position? What specific steps should the Federal
Government take to ensure that the U.S. remains the world leader in innova-
tion?

4. Brief Overview

• The  importance  of  a  strong  scientific  and  technological  enterprise  as  a  pri-
mary  factor  in  driving  economic  growth  is  well-established.  Substantial  and
sustained  U.S.  investments  in  research  and  education  over  the  last  50  years
spawned  an  abundance  of  technological  breakthroughs  that  transformed
American  society  and  helped  the  U.S.  to  become  the  world’s  dominant  econ-
omy.  Economists  estimate  that  these  technological  advances  have  been  re-
sponsible  for  up  to  half  of  U.S.  economic  growth  since  the  end  of  World  War
II. The relationship between innovation and economic growth has only grown
in  recent  years  as  the  world  shifts  to  an  increasingly  knowledge-based  econ-
omy.

• While  the  U.S.  continues  to  lead  the  world  in  innovation  capacity—R&D
spending,  number  of  scientists  and  engineers,  scientific  output,  etc.—recent
indicators  of  the  level  of  U.S.  support  for  research  relative  to  other  countries
show  that  this  lead  may  be  slipping.  Overall  U.S.  federal  funding  for  R&D
as  a  percentage  of  gross  domestic  product  (GDP)  has  declined  significantly
since  its  peak  in  1965,  and  the  focus  of  this  R&D  has  shifted  away  from  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

physical  sciences,  mathematics,  and  engineering—the  areas  of  R&D  histori-
cally most closely correlated with innovation and economic growth.
• At  the  same  time,  other  nations—particularly  emergent  nations  such  as
China  and  India—have  recognized  the  importance  of  innovation  to  economic
growth, and are pouring resources into their scientific and technological infra-
structure, rapidly building their innovation capacity and dramatically increas-
ing their ability to compete with U.S. businesses on the world stage.
• It  has  become  increasingly  apparent  that  the  growing  innovation  capacity  of
foreign  competitors,  combined  with  the  rise  of  the  global  economy  and  a  rel-
ative  erosion  of  federal  support  for  innovation  in  the  U.S.,  could  present  a
long-term challenge to U.S. economic competitiveness.
• As  a  result,  some  industry  and  academic  leaders  have  raised  concerns  that
U.S.  Government  policy  has  been  slow  to  react  to  the  rapidly  changing  com-
petitive  landscape.  In  particular,  calls  from  U.S.  industry  for  a  revitalization
of the U.S. innovation system have become louder and more frequent. Numer-
ous  business  associations  representing  nearly  every  industry  sector  are  now
calling  on  the  Federal  Government  to  respond  to  the  competitiveness  chal-
lenge  by  increasing  investments  in  the  science  and  engineering  research  and
education.

5. Background
History of U.S. R&D Funding

Prior  to  World  War  II,  the  private  sector  funded  most  research  and  development
activity  in  the  U.S.  Federal  Government  support  was  uncoordinated  and  targeted
toward  solving  a  small  number  of  specific  problems.  The  onset  of  the  war  led  to  a
substantial (and successful) investment and effort to harness science and technology
to  meet  the  challenges  of  the  war.  In  1945,  President  Roosevelt’s  science  advisor,
Vannevar  Bush,  published  a  seminal  report  entitled  Science:  the  Endless  Frontier,
which  argued  that  continued  and  expanded  public  support  for  long-term,  funda-
mental scientific research was as an important of investment in peacetime as it was
in wartime, noting that building the knowledge base would ultimately lead to accel-
erated innovation and greater future economic growth.

In  response  to  the  report,  Congress  made  support  for  civilian  fundamental  re-
search a national priority, creating the National Science Foundation (NSF) in 1950.
The Soviet launch of Sputnik in 1957 further broadened federal support for science
and technology, resulting in the creation of the National Aeronautics and Space Ad-
ministration (NASA) and significant spending increases on R&D and math, science,
and  engineering  education.  Another  important  response  to  Sputnik  was  passage  of
the  National  Defense  Education  Act  in  1958,  which  provided  unprecedented  re-
sources  for  math  and  science  education  at  the  elementary,  secondary,  and  post-sec-
ondary  levels.  Together  these  events  led  to  a  dramatic  shift  in  the  Federal  Govern-
ment’s  approach  to  funding  research  and  education.  In  1935,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  support  for  R&D  comprised  only  13  percent  of  overall  U.S.  expenditures.  By
1962, the federal portion had risen to 70 percent. Today, the federal portion has de-
clined  to  roughly  30  percent,  in  part  because  of  increased  development  funding  by
the private sector.
Role of R&D in Innovation

These efforts placed the U.S. at the forefront of innovation by building a massive
U.S. R&D enterprise and educating the next generation of scientists and engineers.
Ultimately, this paid significant dividends for the Nation. While economists are not
able to precisely determine the economic impact of federal support for R&D, the ad-
vancements  resulting  from  such  support  have  undeniably  transformed  every  aspect
of  American  life.  Computers,  the  Internet,  lasers,  jet  aircraft  and  modern  tele-
communications  are  just  a  few  examples  of  products  made  possible  by  federal  R&D
investments since World War II.
6. Issues
Overall Federal Support for R&D

The  amount  of  the  country’s  overall  wealth  devoted  to  federal  R&D  has  declined
significantly  since  the  post-Sputnik  surge  in  support  for  R&D.  According  to  Office
of  Management  and  Budget  statistics,  in  1965,  funding  for  R&D  as  a  percentage  of
GDP  (measured  as  outlays),  also  known  as  R&D  intensity,  was  slightly  over  two
percent (Chart 1). In 2005, it is estimated to be 1.07 percent.

While  this  ratio  has  recently  begun  to  increase  again,  turning  upward  over  the
last five years, the majority of those increases have gone toward short-term defense

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

development  and  homeland  security  applications.  For  example,  the  Department  of
Defense  (DOD)  R&D  increases  alone—most  of  which  have  supported  development
projects  that  have  very  little  impact  on  innovation  or  broader  economic  develop-
ment—has accounted for almost 70 percent of the overall R&D increases of the last
five  years.  Of  the  remaining  increases,  75  percent  has  gone  to  the  National  Insti-
tutes of Health (NIH) and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS). At $71 bil-
lion  and  $29  billion,  respectively,  the  R&D  budgets  of  DOD  and  NIH  now  account
for over 75 percent of all federal R&D. Meanwhile, funding for the physical sciences
and engineering—the areas historically most closely associated with innovation and
economic growth—have been flat or declining for the last 30 years.

The increased emphasis on short-term development at the expense of longer-term
basic and applied research, as well as the emphasis on defense and biomedical R&D
spending,  has  led  many  in  industry  and  academia  (as  well  as  the  Science  Com-
mittee)  to  question  whether  federal  R&D  priorities  are  appropriately  balanced  to
maximize innovation and ensure long-term economic competitiveness.

Compounding  these  concerns,  the  long-term  outlook  for  the  federal  budget  does
not favor future increases in discretionary spending (through which almost all R&D
is  funded).  Absent  major  policy  changes,  the  growth  in  mandatory  federal  spend-
ing—primarily  for  health  and  retirement  benefits  and  payments  on  the  national
debt  interest—will  demand  a  significantly  greater  share  of  the  government’s  re-
sources.
Shift of Private Sector R&D

During  the  heyday  of  the  corporate  research  laboratory  in  the  middle  decades  of
the  20th  century,  U.S.  corporate  laboratories  supported  all  stages  of  R&D,  from
knowledge creation to applied research to product development, and were quite suc-
cessful in their efforts to nurture innovation. The most notable example of this was
AT&T’s Bell Laboratories, which grew to be one of the world premier research orga-
nizations  of  the  last  century,  developing  numerous  breakthrough  technologies  that
changed  American  life,  including  transistors,  lasers,  fiber-optics,  and  communica-
tions satellites. Researchers at Bell Labs and other corporate laboratories were eligi-
ble for, and received, grants from federal research agencies such as NSF and DOD,
but  they  received  core  support  from  the  parent  company  and  they  conducted  basic
and  applied  research  directed  toward  developing  technology  relevant  to  the  com-
pany’s business.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

While  overall  growth  of  industry-funded  R&D  has  remained  strong  in  recent
years,  the  focus  of  this  R&D  has  shifted  significantly  away  from  longer-term  basic
research  in  favor  of  applied  research  and  development  more  closely  tied  to  product
development.  Because  of  market  demands  from  investors  to  capitalize  on  R&D
quickly,  large  corporate  laboratories  of  the  Bell  Labs  model  are  increasingly  rare
(notable  exceptions  include  companies  such  as  IBM  and  GE).  Instead,  corporations
now  focus  research  projects  almost  exclusively  on  lower-risk,  late-stage  R&D
projects with commercial benefits, leaving the Federal Government as the predomi-
nant supporter of long-term basic research.
Increasing Competitiveness of Foreign Countries

While  trends  of  support  for  the  innovation  system  in  the  U.S.  have  showed  signs
of slowing and even eroding, other nations are committing significant new resources
to  building  their  science  and  technology  enterprises.  More  than  one-third  of  OECD
(Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development) countries have increased
government support for R&D by an average rate of over five percent annually since
1995.  The  European  Union  has  recently  established  a  target  to  achieve  EU-wide
R&D intensity of three percent of the EU economy by 2010. (By comparison, the cur-
rent U.S. R&D intensity, public and private sector combined, is 2.6 percent of GDP.)
Similarly,  individual  nations,  including  South  Korea,  Germany,  the  U.K.  and  Can-
ada, have recently pledged to increase R&D spending as a percentage of GDP.

However,  no  nation  has  increased  its  support  for  innovation  as  dramatically  as
China. It has doubled its R&D intensity from 0.6 percent of its GDP in 1995 to 1.2
percent  in  2002  (this  during  a  time  of  rapid  GDP  growth).  R&D  investments  in
China  by  foreign  corporations  have  also  grown  dramatically,  with  U.S.  investments
alone  increasing  from  just  $7  million  in  1994  to  over  $500  million  in  2000.  China
is  now  the  third-largest  performer  of  R&D  in  the  world,  behind  only  the  U.S.  and
Japan.

The  increased  innovation  capacity  of  other  countries  is  also  becoming  evident  in
output-based  R&D  benchmarks.  For  example,  the  U.S.  share  of  science  and  engi-
neering  publications  published  worldwide  declined  from  38  percent  in  1988  to  31
percent  in  2001,  while  Western  Europe  and  Asia’s  share  increased  from  31  to  36
percent and 11 to 17 percent, respectively. Similar trends have occurred in the area
of U.S. patent applications and citations in scientific journals.
Education and Workforce Issues

While the supply and demand of future scientists and engineers is notoriously dif-
ficult to predict, most experts believe that the transition to a knowledge-based econ-
omy  will  demand  an  increased  quality  and  quantity  of  the  world’s  scientific  and
technical  workforce.  As  is  the  case  with  R&D  figures,  trends  in  the  distribution  of
the world’s science and engineering workforce are also unfavorable to long-term U.S.
competitiveness.

The  world  is  catching  up  and  even  surpassing  the  U.S.  in  higher  education  and
the  production  of  science  and  engineering  specialists.  China  now  graduates  four
times  as  many  engineering  students  as  the  U.S.,  and  South  Korea,  which  has  one-
sixth the population of the U.S., graduates nearly the same number of engineers as
the U.S. Moreover, most Western European and Asian countries graduate a signifi-
cantly  higher  percentage  of  students  in  science  and  engineering.  At  the  graduate
level, the statistics are even more pronounced. In 1966, U.S. students accounted for
approximately  76  percent  of  world’s  science  and  engineering  Ph.D.s.  In  2000,  they
accounted  for  only  36  percent.  In  contrast,  China  went  from  producing  almost  no
science and engineering Ph.D.s in 1975 to granting 13,000 Ph.D.s in 2002, of which
an estimated 70 percent were in science and engineering.

Meanwhile,  the  achievement  and  interest  levels  of  U.S.  students  in  science  and
engineering  are  quite  low.  According  to  the  most  recent  international  assessment,
U.S. twelfth graders scored below average and among the lowest of participating na-
tions in math and science general knowledge, and the comparative data of math and
science  assessment  revealed  a  near-monopoly  by  Asia  in  the  top  scoring  group  for
students  in  grades  four  and  eight.  These  students  are  not  on  track  to  study  college
level  science  and  engineering  and,  in  fact,  are  unlikely  ever  to  do  so.  Of  the  25–
30 percent of entering college freshmen with an interest in a science or engineering
field, less than half complete a science or engineering degree in five years.

All  of  this  is  happening  as  the  U.S.  scientific  and  technical  workforce  is  about  to
experience  a  high  rate  of  retirement.  One  quarter  of  the  current  science  and  engi-
neering  workforce  is  over  50  years  old.  At  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  Department  of
Labor  projects  that  new  jobs  requiring  science,  engineering  and  technical  training
will increase four times higher than the average national job growth rate.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

Industry Concerns and Reports

As  a  result  of  the  aforementioned  trends,  U.S.  businesses  have  become  increas-
ingly vocal about concerns that the U.S. is in danger of losing its competitive advan-
tage.  In  an  effort  to  call  attention  to  these  concerns,  several  industry  organizations
have independently produced reports specifically examining the new competitiveness
challenge  and  recommending  possible  courses  of  action  to  address  it.  Prominent
among these efforts is the National Innovation Initiative (NII), a comprehensive un-
dertaking  by  industry  and  university  leaders  (including  those  representing  IBM,
Cisco, and The Johns Hopkins University) to identify the origins of America’s inno-
vation  challenges  and  prepare  a  call  to  action  for  U.S.  companies  to  ‘‘innovate  or
abdicate.’’  The  December  2004  NII  final  report,  Innovate  America:  Thriving  in  a
World  of  Challenge  and  Change,  intends  to  serve  as  a  roadmap  for  policy-makers,
industry  leaders,  and  others  working  to  help  America  remain  competitive  in  the
world economy.

Other  industry  associations  that  have  also  produced  recent  reports  include  AeA
(formerly  the  American  Electronics  Association),  the  Business  Roundtable,  Elec-
tronic  Industries  Alliance,  National  Association  of  Manufacturers,  and  TechNet.
While the companies and industry sectors represented by these organizations varies
widely,  one  general  recommendation  was  common  to  all  of  the  reports:  the  Federal
Government  needs  to  strengthen  and  re-energize  investments  in  R&D  and  science
and engineering education.
7. Witnesses Questions

The  witnesses  were  asked  to  address  the  following  questions  in  their  testimony:

Questions for Mr. Donofrio

face in terms of competing in the global economy?

• What role does innovation play in bolstering U.S. competitiveness?
• What principal innovation challenges do your company and its industry sector
• How  can  research  and  development  and  math,  science,  and  engineering  edu-
cation  and  training  better  contribute  to  the  strength  of  the  Nation’s  innova-
tion system and to the U.S. competitive position?
• What should the Federal Government be doing to strengthen the Nation’s in-
novation  system,  particularly  with  regard  to  federal  programs  to  support  re-
search and technical workforce development?

Questions for Mr. Morgridge

face in terms of competing in the global economy?

• What role does innovation play in bolstering U.S. competitiveness?
• What principal innovation challenges do your company and its industry sector
• How  can  research  and  development  and  math,  science,  and  engineering  edu-
cation  and  training  better  contribute  to  the  strength  of  the  Nation’s  innova-
tion system and to the U.S. competitive position?
• What should the Federal Government be doing to strengthen the Nation’s in-
novation  system,  particularly  with  regard  to  federal  programs  to  support  re-
search and technical workforce development?

Questions for Dr. Brody

in the global economy?

• What role does innovation play in bolstering U.S. competitiveness?
• What principal innovation challenges does the U.S. face in terms of competing
• How  can  research  and  development  and  math,  science,  and  engineering  edu-
cation  and  training  better  contribute  to  the  strength  of  the  Nation’s  innova-
tion system and to the U.S. competitive position?
• What should the Federal Government be doing to strengthen the Nation’s in-
novation  system,  particularly  with  regard  to  federal  programs  to  support  re-
search and technical workforce development?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  The  hearing  will  come  to  order.  I  want  to
welcome  everyone  here  today  to  hear  from  our  witnesses,  who  are
true captains of industry and intellectual leaders.

The  reason  for  this  hearing  should  be  clear.  We  want  to  send  a
message.  If  we  don’t  invest  today  in  science,  technology,  and  edu-
cation,  then  our  economy  simply  will  not  continue  to  thrive.  Hap-
pily, we have some key allies in Congress promoting this message,
such  as  Chairman  Frank  Wolf  on  the  Appropriations  Committee,
the  Chairman  of  the  subcommittee  of  jurisdiction,  and  his  fellow
appropriator, John Culberson, but we have more work to do to en-
sure that all of Washington understands what is at stake.

We used to be so far ahead of everyone else that when we looked
around,  we  couldn’t  find  the  people  in  second  place.  Guess  what?
They  are  breathing  down  our  neck  now.  I  like  being  preeminent.
I  like  being  number  one.  We  have  got  our  work  cut  out  for  us  to
maintain  that  position.  We  live  in  financially  constrained  times  in
Washington. The jockeying for federal funds gets more intense each
year, and most of us have scars to prove it. We need more forceful
and more vocal advocates, both inside and especially outside of gov-
ernment,  if  research  and  education  are  to  get  the  attention  they
need.

Today’s hearing is just one effort among many to raise the profile
of  these  issues.  Many  associations  have  gone  into  high  gear,  and
I want to draw particular attention to the National Innovation Ini-
tiative  of  the  Council  on  Competitiveness,  which  is  now  moving
into  a  legislative  stage.  Also,  we  hope  the  Innovation  Summit  this
fall,  which  Dr.  Vern  Ehlers,  our  distinguished  colleague  on  the
Committee, and a scientist in his own right, we are working on this
together, to put together with industry groups, thanks to Chairman
Wolf, that will galvanize the type of support we need for this most
important and most urgent mission we are upon.

This  is  a  critical  time  for  research  and  education,  as  Congress
and  the  Administration  are  working  on  both  the  Fiscal  2006  and
2007 budgets. We need to act now if future generations are to enjoy
the  standard  of  living  that  leaders  like  our  witnesses  today  have
brought  to  the  United  States.  And  I  remind  people  all  the  time  of
so-called glory days of the ’90s. Ten consecutive years, quarter after
quarter,  year  after  year,  growth  in  our  economy.  More  Americans
employed  than  ever  before.  Guess  what?  That  was  a  technology-
driven era, and we have got to replicate that in this generation and
in the next generations to come. And we are going to succeed if we
do  it  right,  and  we  are  going  to  fail  if  we  fail  to  recognize  the  im-
portance of the basics, like K–12 math and science education. Like
federal investment in the science enterprise.

And I remind everybody of this saying right up here on the wall:
‘‘Where  there  is  no  vision,  the  people  perish.’’  We  are  not  going  to
perish,  because  of  the  work  that  we  are  doing  on  this  committee,
and  because  of  the  outstanding  leadership  we  enjoy  from  people
like our distinguished panel of witnesses today.

With  that,  let  me  give  the  microphone  to  another  very  distin-

guished American, my colleague from Illinois, Mr. Costello.
[The prepared statement of Chairman Boehlert follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN SHERWOOD L. BOEHLERT

9

I  want  to  welcome  everyone  here  today  to  hear  from  our  witnesses  who  are  true

captains of industry and intellectual leaders.

The  reason  for  this  hearing  should  be  clear;  we  want  to  send  a  message;  if  we
don’t  invest  today  in  science,  technology,  and  education  then  our  economy  simply
will  not  continue  to  thrive.  Happily,  we  have  some  key  allies  in  Congress  in  pro-
moting this message such as Chairman Frank Wolf and his fellow appropriator John
Culberson.  But  we  have  more  work  to  do  to  ensure  that  all  of  Washington  under-
stands what’s at stake.

We  live  in  financially  constrained  times  in  Washington.  The  jockeying  for  federal
funds  gets  more  intense  every  year.  We  need  more  forceful  and  more  vocal  advo-
cates, both inside and especially outside of government if research and education are
to get the attention they need.

Today’s hearing is just one effort among many to raise the profile of these issues.
Many associations have gone into high gear, and I want to draw particular attention
to  the  National  Innovation  Initiative  of  the  Council  on  Competitiveness,  which  is
now  moving  into  a  legislative  stage.  Also,  we  hope  the  Innovation  Summit  this  fall
which  Dr.  Ehlers  and  I  are  working  to  put  together  with  industry  groups,  thanks
to Chairman Wolf, will also galvanize support.

This is a critical time for research and education as Congress and the Administra-
tion  are  working  on  both  the  fiscal  2006  and  2007  budgets.  We  need  to  act  now  if
future generations are to enjoy the standard of living that leaders like our witnesses
today have brought to the United States.

Mr.  COSTELLO.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have
a  full  statement  that  I  will  enter  into  the  record.  I  do  have  brief
comments that I would like to make.

First,  let  me  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing,  and  let  me  join
you  in  welcoming  our  witnesses  here  this  morning,  to  explore  the
Nation’s innovation capabilities and its competitiveness in the glob-
al economy.

There  are  many  examples  of  how  the  excellence  of  our  science
and technology enterprise has played a central role in our economic
competitiveness. To stay in the lead, as you indicated in your open-
ing statement, as the rest of the world makes increasing strides to
catch  up,  we  must  make  the  appropriate  investments  in  research
and  development,  and  in  the  education  of  new  generations  of  sci-
entists and engineers.

Unfortunately, the Administration has not placed a high priority
on research investments, particularly for non-defense research. The
best measure of federal support for the research that underpins in-
novation and creation of advanced technology is the federal science
and  technology  budget.  The  Administration  proposed  a  1.4  percent
spending  reduction  in  its  budget  for  Fiscal  Year  2006.  While  the
House  passed  the  appropriation  bills  increasing  this  funding  level,
the increase is still below the inflation level. If we continue to chip
away  at  the  research  base,  we  jeopardize  our  economic  strength
and technological competitiveness for the long-term.

Of perhaps even greater concern for the long-term is whether the
correct policies are in place to ensure that we have the type of sci-
entists  and  engineers  needed  in  the  future.  Ranking  Member  Gor-
don and myself have recently organized and held in this very room
a  roundtable  discussion  to  look  at  supply  and  demand  of  science
and technology workforce, including the effects of offshoring.

Several  things  became  apparent  as  a  result  of  that  roundtable
discussion.  First,  there  is  no  straightforward  answer  on  whether
there is a shortage or a surplus now, and there is no accurate way
to  predict  future  demand  in  this  country.  It  is  also  very  clear  that
we  have  entered  a  new  era  of  international  competition,  in  which

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

our  economic  competitors  are  producing  increasing  numbers  of
well-trained  scientists  and  engineers,  and  that  the  U.S.  companies
are going offshore for their low-cost technical talent.

The  question  then  is  what  kind  of  skills  will  enable  U.S.  sci-
entists and engineers to differentiate themselves from, and thereby
command  higher  salaries  than,  foreign  scientists  and  engineers.
With  unemployment  levels  in  engineering  at  historic  highs  and
U.S.  companies  announcing  that  they  are  reducing  their  profes-
sional workforce, it is difficult to see how these careers will attract
the  most  talented  young  people,  our  American  students,  who  have
other career options.

These  are  difficult  issues  that  go  beyond  simple  solutions,  such
as  more  funding  for  R&D,  or  training  more  scientists  and  engi-
neers.  We  need  more  information  on  the  factors  that  lead  to  the
offshoring  of  science  and  engineering  jobs,  and  on  the  impact  of
this trend on the career choices of our students.

It  does  little  good  to  invent  new  technologies  if  the  manufac-
turing  and  production  is  done  offshore,  yet  we  are  hearing  that  in
venture  capital  invested  high  tech  firms,  that  this  is  exactly  what
is happening. Developing successful policies to address these issues
will require a frank and open discussion between industry, govern-
ment, and universities.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  look  forward  to  hearing  the  testimony  of  the
witnesses here today, in particular, as to how they think that inno-
vation  will  create  more  jobs  in  the  United  States,  as  well  as  other
important  issues.  And  again,  I  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing
this morning, and look forward to hearing our witnesses.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Mr. Chairman, I am pleased to join you in welcoming our witnesses this morning
to  this  hearing  to  explore  the  Nation’s  innovation  capabilities  and  its  competitive-
ness in the global economy.

No  one  serving  on  the  Science  Committee  can  fail  to  appreciate  the  relationship

between innovation economic strength and security.

We have had many opportunities to review through the Committee’s hearings how
the  excellence  of  our  science  and  technology  enterprise  has  played  a  central  role  in
our economic competitiveness.

To stay in the lead in competitiveness, as the rest of the world makes increasingly
greater strides to catch up, requires that we progress even faster. That means mak-
ing  appropriate  investments  in  research  and  development  and  in  the  education  of
new generations of scientists and engineers.

And I want to stress the word appropriate, we can’t expect to re-cycle the policies

of twenty years ago and expect them to work today.

Unfortunately,  this  Administration  has  not  placed  a  high  priority  on  research  in-

vestments, particularly for non-defense research.

The  best  measure  of  federal  support  for  the  research  that  underpins  innovation
and  creation  of  advanced  technology  is  the  Federal  Science  and  Technology  budget.
The  Administration  proposed  a  1.4  percent  spending  reduction  in  its  budget  for
fiscal  year  2006.  While  the  House-passed  appropriation  bills  have  turned  this  into
an equivalent increase—even so, the increase will trail the inflation level.

If  we  continue  to  chip  away  at  the  research  base,  we  jeopardize  our  economic

strength and technological competitiveness for the long-term.

Of  perhaps  even  greater  concern  for  the  long-term  is  whether  the  correct  policies
are  in  place  to  ensure  we  have  the  type  of  scientists  and  engineers  needed  in  the
future.

Ranking Member Gordon and I recently organized a roundtable discussion to look
at  supply  and  demand  for  the  science  and  technology  workforce,  including  the  ef-
fects of off-shoring.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

Several things became clear from that event. First, there is no straightforward an-
swer  on  whether  a  shortage  or  surplus  now  exists,  and  there  is  no  accurate  way
to  predict  future  demand.  Indeed,  one  of  the  witnesses  pointed  out  that  past  pre-
dictions of shortages of scientists and engineers have been notoriously wrong.

It  is  also  clear  we  have  entered  a  new  era  of  international  competition  in  which
our  economic  competitors  are  producing  increasing  numbers  of  well  trained  sci-
entists  and  engineers  and  that  U.S.  companies  are  going  off-shore  to  avail  them-
selves of this low-cost technical talent.

The question then is what kinds of skills will enable U.S. scientists and engineers
to differentiate themselves from, and thereby command higher salaries than, foreign
scientists and engineers. With unemployment levels in engineering at historic highs
and U.S. companies announcing that they are reducing their professional work force
it  is  difficult  to  see  how  such  careers  will  attract  the  most  talented  American  stu-
dents, who have other career options.

These are difficult issues that go beyond simple solutions, such as fund more R&D
or  train  more  scientists  and  engineers.  For  instance,  we  need  more  information  on
the  underlying  factors  that  lead  to  the  off-shoring  of  science  and  engineering  jobs
and on the impact of this trend on the career choices of our students.

It  is  timely  to  explore  what  policy  options  are  available  to  ensure  the  Nation
maintains its current prominence in technology and innovation. In addition, we need
to address how innovation will create more jobs in the U.S.

It  does  no  good  to  invent  new  technologies  if  the  manufacture  and  production  is
done  off-shore.  Yet  we  are  hearing  that  in  venture  capital  invested  high-tech  firms
that this is exactly what is happening.

Developing successful polices to address these issues will require a frank and open

discussion between industry, government and universities.

I  look  forward  to  discussing  these  matters  with  our  distinguished  panel,  and  I

thank the Chairman for convening this hearing.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

As  a  firm  believer  that  innovation  is  the  key  to  U.S.  economic  growth,  vitality,
and  national  security,  I  am  pleased  that  the  Science  Committee  is  holding  this  im-
portant  hearing.  One  of  my  top  priorities  in  Congress  has  been  to  educate  other
Members  about  innovation  and  foster  policies  that  enhance  it.  The  United  States
is  on  the  cutting  edge  of  global  competition  because  of  our  past  investments  in
science  and  technology.  Whether  we  remain  in  that  position  depends  on  how  well
we understand the drivers of innovation and how we choose to respond.

There  are  many  ways  we  can  foster  innovation  and  competitiveness  at  the  na-
tional  level,  but  some  are  less  obvious  than  others.  I  have  consistently  advocated
for  two  main  goals:  increased  funding  across  the  federal  agencies  that  support  fun-
damental  research;  and  strengthening  math  and  science  education  in  our  current
and  future  workforce.  Economists  attribute  more  than  half  the  economic  growth  in
the  past  50  years  to  technological  innovation.  Federally  funded  basic  research  has
been responsible for groundbreaking technologies, such as magnetic resonance imag-
ing  (MRI),  the  global  positioning  system  (GPS),  human  genome  mapping,  fiber  op-
tics,  lasers,  and  the  Internet.  Bolstering  our  workforce  requires  improving  current
training  programs  and  strengthening  core  math  and  science  teaching  and  curricula
throughout our K–12 system. In the House I co-chair the Science, Technology, Engi-
neering and Math (STEM) Education Caucus, a member organization that works to
support STEM Education at all levels. Improving the science literacy of our current
and future workforce will ensure the quality of our intellectual infrastructure. In ad-
dition  to  the  ways  I  have  mentioned,  we  must  continue  to  be  aware  of  other  areas
that impact the innovation process and maintain Congressional awareness and sup-
port of those areas.

I  have  been  working  on  these  issues  for  some  time  now.  In  2002,  as  Chairman
of  the  Science  Committee’s  Subcommittee  on  Environment,  Technology  and  Stand-
ards,  I  held  a  hearing  about  innovation  in  manufacturing.  Following  that  hearing
I  developed  the  Manufacturing  Technology  Competitiveness  Act,  which  passed  the
House  overwhelmingly  in  the  108th  Congress.  Unfortunately  the  Senate  did  not
have  time  to  take  it  up  last  year,  but  we  are  at  it  again  even  stronger  this  time
around  and  expect  this  year’s  bill,  H.R.  250,  to  be  on  the  House  Floor  soon.  The
Manufacturing  Technology  Competitiveness  Act  authorizes  the  highly  successful
Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership  program.  This  federal-State  partnership  pro-
gram,  run  by  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  provides
expert advice to small and medium-sized manufacturers who want to improve their

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

processes  to  remain  competitive.  My  manufacturing  bill  also  establishes  collabo-
rative research programs at NIST that would foster partnerships between small and
large manufacturers, academic researchers, and other partners to do manufacturing-
specific research.

I  know  that  today’s  witnesses  will  share  personal  experiences  and  creative  ideas
on ways we can promote an environment of innovation to maintain U.S. competitive-
ness across all sectors of the economy. I am happy to see the Committee has invited
representatives  of  both  the  business  and  the  academic  communities,  because  there
are  no  ‘‘islands  of  innovation’’  and  I  believe  new  partnerships  between  traditionally
separate  communities  will  be  important  for  future  innovation.  I  look  forward  to
learning  from  all  of  our  witnesses  how  we  might  make  government,  industry,  aca-
demia and others work together as a team for creative innovation.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Honda follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE MICHAEL M. HONDA

Chairman  Boehlert  and  Ranking  Member  Gordon,  thank  you  for  holding  this
hearing  today  with  these  distinguished  witnesses  to  address  the  vitally  important
issue  of  U.S.  competitiveness  in  the  global  economy  and  the  role  of  innovation  in
maintaining the U.S. preeminence.

I  represent  from  Silicon  Valley,  where  tens  of  thousands  of  high  tech  workers
have lost their jobs over the last few years. Many of these jobs have moved overseas,
a  fate  formerly  only  associated  with  unskilled  jobs.  These  are  highly  skilled  jobs,
though,  held  by  highly  educated  people.  We  can’t  just  ‘‘retrain’’  them  to  move  up
into  higher  skilled  jobs  these  jobs  are  at  the  top  rungs  of  the  engineering  ladder.
This aspect of the problem makes it a very difficult one to tackle.

One thing that has troubled me about the debate over out-sourcing is that it has
been portrayed as an ‘‘us vs. them’’ confrontation, pitting the U.S. against other na-
tions,  usually  Asian  ones  such  as  India,  China,  or  Taiwan.  I  disagree  with  this  no-
tion,  however,  because  the  truth  is  that  American  executives  running  American
companies  are  making  decisions  to  move  jobs  to  other  countries.  They  are  not  com-
ing in and ‘‘stealing our jobs,’’ we are giving those jobs away.

Why are we doing that? It seems to be a complex question. Simple business sense
tells  us  that  there  must  be  something  about  the  demands  placed  on  companies  by
American consumers that is driving this out-sourcing. And there must be some ben-
efit that companies see to making the move.

Until  we  can  identify  those  factors,  we  will  not  be  able  to  figure  out  what  needs
to be done. We will be left to flail about, trying stopgap measures that do not really
address the root of the problem.

In  the  end,  it  looks  like  either  we  need  to  stop  the  jobs  from  moving  out  of  the
country,  become  resigned  to  the  fact  that  these  top  tier  technology  jobs  going  away
and  accept  a  workforce  shift  to  the  service  sector,  or  maybe  create  whole  new  high
tech  fields  in  which  the  U.S.  leads  the  rest  of  the  world,  so  that  the  jobs  need  to
stay here.

I  am  not  sure  how  we  are  going  to  do  that,  since  I  do  not  know  the  underlying
factors  that  have  led  to  the  problem.  I  hope  that  our  expert  witnesses  can  help  us
understand  some  of  the  causes  behind  the  trends  and  then  develop  some  policies
to address some of these questions.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Davis follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE LINCOLN DAVIS

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Ranking  Member,  for  holding  today’s  hearing.
Many  say  the  U.S.  is  losing  its  competitive  edge  when  it  comes  to  technology  and
innovation.  In  Tennessee’s  Fourth  Congressional  District,  I  see  jobs  being  lost  or
jobs  going  overseas,  where  labor  is  cheaper.  At  the  same  time,  I  see  other  nations
investing more heavily in research and technology than we are. Other countries are
surpassing the U.S. when it comes to certain areas of technology like computer chip
manufacturing or technology customer service.

How can the U.S. regain its competitive edge? I believe that the Federal Govern-
ment should support math and science education in our public schools to encourage
more children to pursue science and technology careers.

I  also  believe  we  should  look  carefully  at  our  national  budget  and  find  a  way  to
maintain balance, providing cost-effective health care and Social Security, while also
giving adequate funding to science and technology research.

Most  federal  research  dollars  go  to  university  scientists,  who  are  training  tomor-
row’s  generation  of  innovators.  We  must  fund  federal  research  in  a  balanced  way

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

so  that  the  physical  sciences  receive  the  same  level  of  support  as  the  biomedical
sciences did a few years ago.

I  am  interested  in  hearing  ideas  from  today’s  witnesses  on  how  the  U.S.  can  re-
gain  its  competitiveness.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  yield  back  the  balance  of  my
time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman  and  Mr.  Ranking  Member,  thank  you  for  hosting  this  very  impor-

tant hearing today.

Many  have  noted  recently  that  manufacturing  plants  are  shifting  off-shore,  but
we  must  also  recognize  that  high-end  engineering  jobs  are  being  moved  off-shore.
Additionally,  U.S.  companies  are  moving  to  establish  industrial  research  labs
abroad.

Like  many  other  Members  sitting  here  today,  I  believe  strongly  in  promoting
science  and  engineering  education.  We  have  a  tremendous  responsibility  as  legisla-
tors  to  recognize  that  our  nation  is  no  longer  leading  the  pack  in  STEM  (science,
technology,  engineering  and  math)  performance  and  that  related  job  markets  are
shifting overseas. Deciding if and how we will remedy this situation is our greatest
challenge.

Mr.  Donofrio,  Mr.  Morgridge,  and  Dr.  Brody,  thank  you  for  your  willingness  to

join us. I am eager to hear your testimony and your recommendations.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Costello,  and
our  panel  today  is  composed  of  three  very  distinguished  people  in
their own right, and I want to thank each of you for serving as in-
structors  for  this  committee.  And  we  do  something  on  this  com-
mittee  that  some  people  might  find  a  little  bit  rare.  We  sort  of  sit
back and listen. We invite people like you, who have distinguished
records in the real world, if you will. We have Nobel laureates. And
we  sit  back  and  we  listen,  and  we  hope  to  learn,  and  we  respect
you  for  your  willingness  to  serve  as  guides  for  us,  and  to  help  in-
form us.

In the final analysis, Congress is going to be a success or failure
based upon the direction in which we take this country, and we are
not going to do it in the dark of the night, on the back of an enve-
lope,  in  some  lobby.  We  are  going  to  do  it  in  open  hearings,  where
we get the best guidance we can get.

And  with  that,  let  me  present  to  my  colleagues  and  to  the  audi-
ence our distinguished witnesses: Mr. Nicholas Donofrio, Executive
Vice President for Innovation and Technology for the IBM Corpora-
tion;  Mr.  John  Morgridge,  Chairman  of  Cisco  Systems,  Incor-
porated;  and  Dr.  William  Brody,  President  of  The  Johns  Hopkins
University.

Thank  you  very  much,  gentlemen,  for  appearing  here.  And  we
would ask you to summarize your statements as much as you can,
which  would  provide  greater  opportunity  for  the  interaction  here.
We ask the obvious questions, and then we sit back and say, hmm.
You will notice we have a timer there, and Mr. Morgridge, in front
of  you,  you  are  all  veterans.  You  have  been  through  this  drill  be-
fore.  The  chair  is  not  arbitrary.  I  am  not  going  to  cut  you  off  in
mid-sentence or even mid-thought or mid-paragraph, but we would
try to summarize it, so that we can get to the exchange here.

With that, Mr. Donofrio, you are up first.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

STATEMENT  OF  NICHOLAS  M.  DONOFRIO,  EXECUTIVE  VICE
PRESIDENT  FOR  INNOVATION  AND  TECHNOLOGY,  IBM  COR-
PORATION
Mr.  DONOFRIO.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  distinguished
Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Nick  Donofrio,  and  it  is
my pleasure to be with you today. At the outset, I extend my most
sincere gratitude to Chairman Boehlert for his personal leadership,
and  to  the  committee  for  its  longstanding  support  of  science,  tech-
nology and innovation.

My testimony this morning is focused on the principal innovation
challenges  we  faced  in  IBM  and  within  the  information  technology
industry,  and  I  will  also  share  my  views  on  the  role  innovation
plays in the competitiveness of the United States of America.

IBM’s transformation over the past few years has been driven by
new global marketplace realities and opportunities which, taken to-
gether,  have  shifted  our  focus  from  the  development  and  manufac-
turing  of  products  and  technologies  to  the  robust  application  and
integration  of  technology.  The  shift  is  enabling  us  to  deliver  new
value  to  our  clients  around  the  world  as  we  align  around  a  single
business model—innovation. Innovation that is collaborative, open,
multi-disciplined, and global.

For  the  information  technology  industry  and  for  the  United
States of America’s economy, a new era of growth is beginning, due
in large part to the emergence of a new computing architecture and
the new business models it enables.

The  change  is  fundamentally  driven  by  the  convergence  of  three
historic  developments.  The  first  is  network  ubiquity,  as  evidenced
by  the  Internet,  which  is  fast  becoming  the  world’s  operational  in-
frastructure. The second is by open standards, widely adopted tech-
nical and transactional specifications that are spurring the creation
of  new  kinds  of  products  and  services.  And  the  third,  the  emer-
gence  of  the  network  ubiquity  and  open  standards  has  been  en-
abled  by  a  new  business  design  that  allows  for  the  enablement  of
institutions to integrate their business operations horizontally, and
respond  rapidly  to  business  challenges,  responding  in  a  way  that
we at IBM call on-demand.

Implementing  these  fundamental  concepts  enables  businesses,
governments, and institutions of higher learning to innovate in new
and entirely different ways, and it is affording new growth opportu-
nities in both economic and societal activity. Seizing the opportuni-
ties  demands  unique  foresights  and  capability,  and  nations  must
choose carefully. Investment, talent, and infrastructure are increas-
ing  everywhere,  making  the  world  more  tightly  integrated.  For
companies  in  a  broad  range  of  industries,  as  well  as  governments,
the choice is either innovation or commoditization. Institutions may
choose to be innovative by investing in managing, leveraging intel-
lectual capital, or they can be commodity players, by differentiating
themselves through low price, economies of scale, and efficient dis-
tribution of other parties’ intellectual capacity and capability.

The choice will impact nations as well as industries. Only by un-
derstanding,  anticipating,  and  managing  the  forces  of  innovation
and commoditization can we properly address the challenges to na-
tional  economic  prosperity.  So,  how  do  we,  as  a  nation,  capitalize
on  the  most  important  developments  in  technology,  infrastructure,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

and  business  organization?  How  do  we  translate  those  develop-
ments  into  the  differentiators  and  distinguishers  for  American
prosperity. In short, how do we optimize for innovation?

Today,  innovation  is  the  arbiter  of  national  competitiveness.  We
must recognize innovation as a national priority, and adopt innova-
tion  as  a  core  strategy  for  the  21st  century  knowledge-based  econ-
omy. Reaching higher levels of innovation is complex, and since the
basic  idea  is  to  transform  ideas  and  intellectual  property  into  new
value, the private sector is the primary agent.

Still,  the  Federal  Government  has  enormous  influence.  That  is
because innovation no longer is driven solely by investments in re-
search  and  development.  It  must  be  viewed  from  both  the  supply
and demand sides. Policy and infrastructure create a national plat-
form that can accelerate or impede the pace and quality of innova-
tion.  The  Council  on  Competitiveness  National  Innovation  Initia-
tive  calls  for  the  United  States  to  develop  an  integrated,  coherent
approach  to  innovation  across  a  number  of  policy  areas.  The  vital-
ity of the ecosystem will stimulate innovation.

We cannot focus only on the discrete components, but on the en-
tire  ecosystem.  A  proper  mix  of  policy  measures  will  make  the
United States a more attractive and fertile environment for innova-
tion  investment.  And  I  have  included  in  my  formal,  written  state-
ment a number of policies I believe will have the greatest potential
for national innovation success. Allow me just to cite a few.

Our  country  needs  the  world’s  deepest  collection  of  business  and
technological  innovators,  able  to  create  and  apply  intellectual  cap-
ital;  that  is  what  defines  competitive  advantage.  Workforce  skills
must  include  both  technology  and  strategic  expertise.  Equally  im-
portant,  our  nation’s  structural  transition  to  a  services  economy
needs to be supported by a deepened understanding of how services
can  support  and  interact  with  manufacturing  and  other,  more  tra-
ditional  activities.  The  services  sector  today  accounts  for  the  bulk
of employment in the United States, and in other high wage econo-
mies.  More  than  75  percent  of  the  United  States  gross  domestic
product  is  services-based,  and  with  the  exception  of  India  and
China,  at  least  half  the  workforce  in  every  high  wage  country  is
concentrated in the services sectors.

Students also must be prepared to become innovators. Education
must  be  transformed  and  realigned,  and  reform  must  start  with
the  curriculum.  For  example,  creative  and  integrative  instruction
can  be  achieved  through  the  development  of  problem-based  learn-
ing,  which  is  particularly  helpful  in  the  development  of  scientific,
mathematical,  and  technical  talent.  Our  nation  benefits  greatly
from  a  diversity  of  talent,  a  diversity  of  culture,  and  a  diversity  of
thought  and  insight  from  all  over  the  world.  Innovation  does  not
happen  in  isolation.  It  is  a  multi-disciplined  and  multicultural
event.  We  need  national  immigration  policies  that  enable  the
United States to attract and retain the best minds in the world.

Unlocking  innovation  demands  that  we  rethink  our  ideas  also
about  intellectual  property.  While  the  ownership  of  intellectual
property  is  an  essential  driver  of  innovation,  technology  advances
are often dependent on shared knowledge, open standards, and col-
laborative  innovation.  The  best  intellectual  property  framework
balances both proprietary and open approaches.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

I will close now with these brief thoughts. Economies around the
world  are  replicating  the  characteristics  that  have  given  Western
nations  such  an  advantage.  Many  companies  in  rapidly  developing
nations, such as China, Indian, Brazil, and Russia, are leapfrogging
to  new  computing  architectures  and  business  designs,  and  those
countries  are  developing  very  specific  innovation  strategies  and
higher levels of skill. As the United States considers its next steps,
I urge that any dialogue on innovation be made in a global context.
The  forces  of  the  global  economy  of  integration  and  advances  in
technology  are  presenting  complex  challenges.  The  status  quo  sim-
ply cannot be an option. Government, business, academia and labor
must  work  together  to  create  a  climate  and  a  culture  to  facilitate
cross-border,  cross-organizational,  and  cross-disciplinary  collabora-
tion. That is the only environment for innovation to thrive in.

America  has  a  long  and  proud  history  of  recognizing  when
change  is  required,  and  seizing  upon  that  opportunity,  and  rising
to  the  challenge.  We  are  at  such  an  inflection  point  today.  I  am
very  enthusiastic  about  our  opportunities,  and  about  our  outlook
for prosperity, and I thank you very much for listening.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Donofrio follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NICHOLAS M. DONOFRIO

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  Thank  you  for  in-
viting  me  to  join  you  today.  My  name  is  Nicholas  Donofrio  and  I  am  the  executive
vice  president  for  Innovation  and  Technology  in  the  IBM  Corporation.  I  appreciate
the  opportunity  to  offer  IBM’s  views  on  U.S.  competitiveness  and  the  innovation
challenge. Given the fundamental role of innovation in underpinning American eco-
nomic  growth  and  national  security,  I  believe  this  hearing  is  more  important  now
than ever.

I  also  wish  to  thank  Chairman  Boehlert  for  his  longstanding  support  of  science,
technology  and  innovation.  Under  his  leadership,  this  committee  has  been  an  out-
standing proponent for the pillars of growth in our society—namely, research, tech-
nology and skills development.

I  will  focus  my  testimony  today  on  the  principal  innovation  challenges  we  face—
both inside IBM and within the information technology industry—as we compete in
the global economy. You also have asked me to provide my views on the role innova-
tion plays in driving the competitiveness of the United States.

With  regard  to  IBM,  no  longer  are  we  focused  exclusively  on  the  development,
manufacture  and  delivery  of  information  technology,  but  rather  on  the  application
and integration of technology to deliver new and lasting value to our clients around
the world. We have conducted an end-to-end transformation of our business, driven
by  major  new  global  marketplace  realities  and  opportunities.  As  a  company  with
$96  billion  in  revenue,  and  which  operates  in  174  countries,  we  believe  we  bring
unique  insight  to  global  trends  and  a  solid  base  from  which  to  make  national  rec-
ommendations. IBM is aligned around a single, focused business model—innovation.
Innovation that is collaborative, open and multi-disciplined.
TRENDS

History  suggests  that  a  sustained  period  of  growth  is  about  to  begin  for  the  $1.4
trillion information technology industry. At the same time, new markets are opening
up on its borders. We believe that the drivers of growth are very different today and
will remain so for the foreseeable future; they are propelling information technology
and business services, and they are affecting not only IBM and the IT industry, but
also  the  American  economy  as  a  whole.  Further,  a  major  factor  in  the  accelerated
growth  of  the  American  economy  in  the  post-1995  period  has  been  the  increase  in
productivity  gained  by  the  application  of  information  technology  to  business  proc-
esses.

The  rewards  of  that  growth  will  not  be  shared  equally;  they  will,  as  in  the  past,
flow  to  those  enterprises  and  nations  that  can  innovate  and  turn  disruptive  shifts
to  their  advantage.  Such  conviction  is  what  sharpens  our  focus  on  innovation  in
IBM, for the benefit of our clients and the nations where we conduct business.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

Our  economy  today  is  moving  into  a  new  era,  underpinned  by  cyber-infrastruc-
ture,  a  new  architecture  of  computing  and  the  new  business  models  they  enable.
The essential ideas about the networked organization and global economy are clear-
ly taking hold. Those changes are driven by the convergence of three historic devel-
opments:

Network  Ubiquity:  In  less  than  a  decade,  the  Internet—the  most  visible  evi-
dence  of  an  increasingly  networked  world—has  reached  some  800  million  people,
and is projected by some analysts to reach more than a billion people by 2007. The
Internet has not only connected people and opened up access to the world’s informa-
tion, it is rapidly becoming the planet’s operational infrastructure. It is linking peo-
ple, businesses and institutions, as well as billions—ultimately trillions—of devices.
It is facilitating and transforming transactions of all kinds—from commerce, govern-
ment services, education and health care, to entertainment, conversation and public
discourse.

Open  Standards:  Technical  and  transaction  specifications  underpin  all  indus-
tries.  When  they  become  standards—that  is,  when  they  are  widely  adopted—they
enable growth by spurring the creation of many new kinds of products and services.
Standards  made  possible  electrical,  telephone  and  TV  networks,  CDs,  DVDs,  credit
and  debit  cards  and  global  financial  markets—and  by  extension,  all  the  other  busi-
ness  and  public  services  those  systems  enabled.  Today,  standards  are  truly  taking
hold  in  information  technology.  They  determine  how  computers  operate  and  soft-
ware applications are developed, how digital content is produced, processed, distrib-
uted  and  stored,  and  how  transactions  of  all  types  are  managed.  These  standards
are  ‘‘open’’—that  is,  not  owned  or  controlled  by  any  one  company  or  entity.  (The
Internet  itself,  for  example,  is  built  on  open  standards.)  This  is  common  in  other
industries, but a radical departure for the information technology industry.

New  Business  Designs:  The  simultaneous  emergence  of  the  networked  world
and  open  standards  is  enabling  entirely  new  business  designs,  giving  CEOs  and
other  decision-makers  options  that  were  not  feasible  before.  Companies  can  now  be
far more flexible and responsive to changes in the economy, buyer behavior, supply,
distribution  networks,  consumer  tastes,  geopolitical  realities—even  the  weather.
That  is  because  their  business  operations  can  be  integrated  horizontally,  from  the
point  of  contact  with  customers  through  the  extended  supply  chain.  And  because
vital  information  is  captured  and  managed  enterprise-wide,  networked  companies
can anticipate and respond much faster, or, in other words, on demand.

The  fundamental  shifts  I  have  described  are  creating  significant  competitive  ad-
vantages for institutions around the world, particularly in the management and in-
tegration  of  their  business  processes.  Companies  are  innovating  in  new  areas,  such
as supply chain management, engineering design services, human resource manage-
ment,  after-sales  services  and  customer  care.  Governments  are  transforming  their
legacy agencies to organize around missions rather than departments. Academic in-
stitutions  are  delivering  their  course  ware  through  the  Internet  in  addition  to  the
traditional  classroom.  Institutions  are  radically  innovating  in  their  business  oper-
ations and processes using information technology and the services and expertise as-
sociated  with  business  process  transformation.  This  new  organizational  structure
and  marketplace  are  growing  dramatically,  and  American  industry  is  at  the  fore-
front.  We  see  global  opportunity  in  excess  of  $500  billion  that  can  be  addressed  by
both information technology and non-information technology companies.

Enterprises  around  the  world  are  innovating  through  the  transformation  of  their
businesses  because  they  recognize  that  new  and  integrated  processes  result  in  gen-
uine competitive advantage.
INDUSTRY CHANGE

Like  other  major  structural  shifts  before  it,  the  new  era—networked,  built  on
standards  and  with  wholly  new  business  and  institutional  models—is  opening  up
new possibilities for profit and growth for business, while also affecting other realms
of societal and economic activity—from government, to health care, to education.

Seizing the opportunities presented by that shift, as always, requires unique fore-
sight and capabilities. Despite the turmoil in the economy in recent years, some na-
tions  have  managed  to  increase  their  prosperity,  advance  the  frontiers  of  science
and learning, and build multiple kinds of new expertise. For them, the result today
is an economy poised for sustained growth in traditional markets and robust growth
in  the  new  markets.  But,  as  I  mentioned,  the  growth  will  not  be  shared  equally.
In  the  years  ahead,  choosing  wisely  will  prove  important.  Significant  rewards  will
accrue to those who are up to the challenge.

Capabilities,  investments  and  infrastructure  are  increasing  everywhere.  Global
interconnections  make  it  possible  for  people  to  work  from  virtually  anywhere.  The

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

world  is  indeed  becoming  more  tightly  integrated.  For  American  companies  in  a
broad  range  of  industries—as  well  as  governments—the  choice  is  either  innovation
or commoditization.

Companies  that  create  new,  high-demand  technologies  and  services  enjoy,  for  a
time,  barriers  to  entry,  as  well  as  superior  margins  and  pricing  power,  since  there
are  few  other  providers  of  that  technology  or  service.  However,  alternative  tech-
nologies or capabilities inevitably emerge, decreasing the innovator’s advantages. In
short, that segment of the industry ‘‘commoditizes.’’ There are still attractive oppor-
tunities to be pursued, but with much less profit potential.

The  global  innovation-commoditization  cycle  has  never  been  more  pronounced
than it is today, and it forces distinct choices. Winners can be the innovators—those
with  the  capacity  to  invest,  manage  and  leverage  the  creation  of  intellectual  cap-
ital—or  the  commodity  players,  who  differentiate  through  low  price,  economies  of
scale and efficient distribution of other parties’ intellectual capital.

Perhaps the greatest risk is to get squeezed in the middle—being attacked by low-
price  competitors,  while  lacking  the  expertise  and  intellectual  capital  to  keep  up
with the most aggressive innovators.
GLOBAL TRENDS AND OPPORTUNITY

The  dilemma  affects  nations,  as  well  as  industries.  Understanding,  anticipating
and  managing  the  forces  of  innovation  and  commoditization  can  address  many  of
the challenges to national economic success. Today, companies and organizations are
coming to a new way of conceptualizing and managing business activity. Essentially,
they  are  choosing  to  move  to  a  higher  value  space  in  the  overall  national  economic
picture.  A  networked,  interconnected  model  enables  them  to  achieve  higher  levels
of  responsiveness,  flexibility  and  efficiency  than  legacy,  Industrial-Age  business
models.  This  new  flexibility  offers  great  potential  for  growth,  by  increasing  produc-
tivity and by creating entirely new capabilities.

There are many examples of new capabilities. In health care, for instance, we now
see personalized medicine on the horizon—as the integration of patient histories and
genomic data is changing the nature of diagnosis and patient care. In insurance, we
see  products  and  services  tailored  to  the  driving  habits  of  individual  policyholders.
So, how do we, as a nation, enable that transformation? How do we capitalize on
the most important developments in technology, infrastructure and business organi-
zation in which we currently have global leadership? How do we translate those de-
velopments  into  differentiators  for  American  prosperity?  How  do  we  strategically
align ourselves to innovate and leverage the networked world, based on a combina-
tion  of  expertise,  advanced  technology,  and  business  insight,  for  productivity  gains
and economic success? In short, how do we optimize for innovation?
MOVING TO THE FUTURE

Innovation has become the new arbiter of national competitiveness. We must rec-
ognize  innovation  as  a  national  priority.  For  the  United  States  to  thrive  in  the
hyper-competitive world economy we must, with urgency, mobilize business, govern-
ment, educators and researchers to adopt innovation as a core strategy to build the
foundation for a 21st Century knowledge-based economy.

Innovation success will be a product of many stakeholders collaborating and shar-
ing  the  risk  of  change.  To  facilitate  the  process,  our  nation’s  policy  architecture
must be modernized to address the changing nature of innovation, the new opportu-
nities I have described and the new global competitors. The redesign of our nation’s
innovation  policies  must  be  balanced,  consistent  and  coordinated,  and  focused  on
crucial challenges.
INNOVATION ECOSYSTEM: A KEY CONCEPT

Achieving  national  innovation  success  is  complex.  It  requires  far  more  than  the
management of ideas, technology transfer and research and development. The chal-
lenge is not only to generate fresh ideas and intellectual property, but to transform
ideas  and  intellectual  property  into  new  value.  As  such,  they  become  commercially
successful. The private sector is the primary agent for innovation. The Federal Gov-
ernment, however, has enormous influence over the pace of fundamental knowledge
advances, the incentive for private enterprises to invest in innovation and the condi-
tions under which innovation may thrive.

Innovation  is  not  just  R&D  driven.  It  needs  to  be  viewed  on  both  the  supply  and
demand  side,  and  in  a  global  perspective.  A  basic  prerequisite  for  the  next  genera-
tion  of  innovation  policies  is  to  move  toward  a  thoughtful  integration  with  all  the
dynamics of the National Innovation Ecosystem, as illustrated in the following chart:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

The  push  and  pull  of  supply  and  demand  do  not  occur  in  a  vacuum.  They  are
strongly  influenced  by  public  policy  and  the  overall  infrastructure  for  innovation  of-
fered by our society.

Public policies related to education and training, research funding, regulation, fis-
cal  and  monetary  tools,  intellectual  property  and  market  access  demonstrably  affect
our ability to generate innovation inputs and respond to innovation demands.

The  same  can  be  said  of  infrastructure—be  it  transportation,  energy,  health  care,
information  technology  networks  or  communications.  Taken  together,  the  policy  and
infrastructure  environments  create  a  national  platform  that  can  accelerate—or  im-
pede—the pace and quality of innovation. [Excerpted from: InnovateAmerica, Report
of the National Innovation Initiative, December 2004]

AN INTEGRATED POLICY APPROACH REQUIRED

In  2004,  IBM  Chairman  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  Sam  Palmisano  co-chaired
the  National  Innovation  Initiative  of  the  Council  on  Competitiveness.  One  of  the
central findings of its report is that the United States needs an integrated, coherent
approach  across  a  number  of  policy  arenas  to  maintain  global  economic  leadership.
The total mix and composition of federal policies affect private sector innovation be-
havior.

Many  of  the  critical  choices  lie  outside  the  traditional  sphere  of  research  and  de-
velopment and innovation supply policies. Policies which influence the supply of tal-
ent,  risk  capital,  the  demand  for  innovative  goods  and  services  and  the  robustness
of regional innovation networks also are important. A higher level of national inno-
vation  performance  will  result  from  an  integrated  end-to-end  (idea  to  market)  ap-
proach  by  the  Federal  Government.  The  vitality  of  the  ecosystem  will  stimulate  in-
novation.  Focusing  only  on  the  discrete  components—investing  in  schools  or  sector-
specific  initiatives—is  not  enough.  We  must  find  ways  to  address  the  entire  eco-
system.

The  National  Innovation  Initiative  report  presents  recommendations  under  three
broad  themes:  talent,  investment  and  infrastructure.  They  represent  a  new  ap-
proach  to  drive  U.S.  competitiveness—making  clear  that  innovation  is  not  a  check-
point  on  the  economic  agenda,  but  rather  the  organizing  principle  of  the  agenda.  If
the U.S. seeks to remain the most attractive and fertile environment for innovation
in  the  world,  such  policy  measures  must  be  pursued  as  a  coherent  and  clearly-ar-
ticulated strategy.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

COMPONENTS OF A NATIONAL INNOVATION POLICY

The highest-leverage policy choices for consideration in a national innovation pol-

icy include:

1. Establishing  an  innovation  focal  point  within  the  Executive  Office  of  the
President  to  frame,  assess  and  coordinate  strategically  the  future  direction  of
the Nation’s innovation policies.

2. Creating  new  metrics  for  the  national  innovation  ecosystem  to  drive  perform-
ance  and  monitor  results.  New  metrics  of  the  knowledge-based  economy
should  include  knowledge  indicators,  contractual  agreements  like  strategic
partnerships,  IP  licensing,  and  conditions  for  innovation,  such  as  economic
demand, public policy environment and infrastructure readiness.

3. Implementing  new  tax  incentives  to  provide  scholarships  for  the  next  genera-
tion of scientists, engineers and innovators and changing immigration policies
to attract and retain the brightest talent from around the world.

4. Accelerating innovation oriented learning environments at the K–12 level, en-
hancing  careers  options  and  the  adaptability  of  workers  through  portable
learning benefits.

5. Modifying  the  long-term  Federal  R&D  investment  portfolio  by  a  new  priority
on  the  physical  and  engineering  sciences,  setting  aside  an  increased  propor-
tion  of  research  funding  to  basic,  novel,  high-risk  and  exploratory  research,
establishing  a  research  program  for  the  services  sciences,  encouraging  multi-
disciplinary  research,  and  making  permanent  a  restructured  R&D  tax  credit
including university-industry collaborations.

6. Coordinating  and  focusing  federal  economic  development  programs  on  re-
gional  innovation  hotspots  and  creating  more  dynamic  innovative  industry
clusters.

7. Implementing  a  legal  and  regulatory  framework  that  encourages  voluntary
and more complete disclosure of business intellectual (‘‘intangible’’) assets and
longer-term innovation strategies.

8. Supporting  a  new  U.S.  production  capability  in  emerging  technologies
through  creation  of  world  class  Centers  for  Production  Excellence,  strength-
ening  DOD’s  historic  role  in  advanced  manufacturing  research,  reorganizing
the  Manufacturing  Extension  System  toward  innovation  services  for  small  to
medium  sized  enterprises  and  supporting  an  open  systems  approach  to  cus-
tomer relationship, product design, supply chain, manufacturing and logistics
systems.

9. Capitalizing 

on 

innovation 

cells,
nanotechnology,  new  materials,  micro-machining,  advanced  semi-conductor
technology,  broadband  deployment  and  applications,  next  generation  wireless
devices,  digital  medical  records  and  health  care,  pervasive  computing,  mod-
eling and simulation.

in  hydrogen 

opportunities 

fuel 

EDUCATION, TRAINING AND WORKFORCE

I will now comment on several areas of education, training and workforce develop-
ment  which  contribute  to  our  nation’s  innovation  system  and  competitive  position.
Competitive  advantage  today  comes  from  expertise—and  expertise  is  not  static.
The United States needs the world’s deepest, most diverse collection of business and
technology  innovators,  supported  by  advanced  collaboration  systems  and  a  culture
that enables continuous learning. In the Agricultural Age, land and farm production
defined  competitive  advantage.  In  the  Industrial  Age,  it  was  raw  materials  and
manufacturing  capability.  Today,  it  is  the  ability  to  create  and  apply  intellectual
capital based on multi-dimensional expertise.

Workforce  skills  must  include  both  technology  and  strategic  expertise.  An  under-
standing  of  technology—its  current  capabilities  as  well  as  its  future  potential—is
now  integral  to  business  decision-making.  Business  leaders  need  innovation  part-
ners  who  are  at  the  frontiers  of  research  and  deeply  steeped  in  the  issues  and  dy-
namics of specific industries.

To  advance  strategic  expertise,  the  Nation’s  structural  transition  to  a  services
economy  needs  to  be  supported  by  a  deepened  understanding  of  how  services  sup-
port  and  interact  with  manufacturing  and  other  more  traditional  activities.  In  fact,
in  today’s  global  economy,  the  services  sector  provides  the  bulk  of  employment  in
high-wage economies. See attached chart:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

A  wide  community  is  beginning  to  discuss  the  technical  and  social  effects  of  new
developments  in  global  connectivity,  automation,  technology  integration  and  Web
services and a new scientific discipline is being opened. Leading universities are be-
ginning  to  work  with  IBM  to  better  understand  the  social  and  technical  issues  in-
volved  in  collaborating  across  global  enterprises.  For  example,  the  University  of
California  at  Berkeley  is  considering  the  implementation  of  a  Services  Science  cur-
riculum  in  conjunction  with  IBM  Research—much  in  the  way  the  first  Computer
Science  department  was  initiated  at  Columbia  University.  Federal  research  invest-
ment and collaboration could significantly accelerate learning in this area.

To  advance  technology  expertise,  I  am  convinced  that  education  must  be  trans-
formed  and  realigned  to  prepare  students  to  become  innovators.  Reform  must  start
with  curriculum.  Creative  and  integrative  instruction  can  be  achieved  through  the
development  of  Problem-Based  Learning  (PBL)—a  methodology  that  is  sure  to  en-
hance  the  development  of  much-needed  skills—especially  in  the  engineering  and
technical  professions.  PBL  is  specifically  helpful  in  the  development  of  scientific,
mathematical  and  technical  talent.  It  focuses  on  ill-structured  problem-solving,  and
provides deeper meaning, applicability and relevancy to classroom materials and the
development  of  crucial  analysis  skills  that  are  required  in  the  workplace.  An  edu-
cation  system  designed  to  support  curriculum  focused  on  acquiring  discreet  skills
and  memorizing  information  will  not  produce  the  leaders  and  innovators  the  world
needs.

In  my  own  industry,  these  needs  are  particularly  acute.  The  information  tech-
nology sector is experiencing a pronounced shift in demand for specialized skills that
fuse  industry-specific  knowledge,  information  technology  capability  and  business
process  expertise.  These  skills  enable  the  business  transformations  described  ear-
lier. Organizations seek more integrated and customized technology and services so-
lutions  that  create  competitive  advantage  and  enable  innovation.  New  information
technology  jobs  are  mushrooming  in  areas  like  business  analysis,  security  analysis,
vendor management, service management, system integration, and others. IBM’s cli-
ents  seek  business  acumen,  project  management  and  leadership  skills  along  with
specific  IT  skills  linked  to  open  standards,  networking  and  e-commerce.  These
emerging occupations require higher skills and they are well paid.

Finally, we must realize that we benefit greatly from a diversity of talent, a diver-
sity of culture, a diversity of thought and insight from all over the world—intra-na-
tional  and  international.  Innovation  does  not  happen  in  isolation.  It  happens
through  collaboration  across  the  diverse  communities  required  to  sustain  economic

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

leadership  in  the  21st  century.  We  need  national  immigration  policies  that  enable
the United States to attract and retain the best minds in the world.

In an expertise-based, global marketplace, the expansion of business into more di-
verse  services  is  forcing  us  to  rethink  the  types  of  skills  and  educational  degrees
that  are  needed  to  drive  America  forward.  In  fact,  the  whole  services  paradigm  is
enabling us to be more innovative in our approach to talent development.

Applied  more  broadly,  our  experience  drives  me  to  conclude  that  America  needs
a  culture  of  learning,  skill  building  and  collaboration.  Specifically,  it  means  that
technologists  and  business  experts  need  to  work  closely  together,  not  simply  to
share insights, but to create entirely new intellectual capital for competitive advan-
tage. We must build the capacity to apply new intellectual property to nurture and
launch new high-value businesses.

Unlocking  innovation  also  demands  that  we  rethink  our  ideas  about  intellectual
property. Some believe the best way to provide incentives for innovation is by fierce-
ly  protecting  the  inventor’s  proprietary  interest.  Others  argue  that  we  should  open
the  doors  and  give  full  access  to  intellectual  assets.  I  believe  we  need  a  new  path
forward, an approach that offers a balance of those two extremes.

While  IP  ownership  is  an  essential  driver  of  innovation,  technological  advances
are  often  dependent  on  shared  knowledge,  standards,  and  collaborative  innovation.
The  IP  framework  must  enable  both.  We  must  protect  truly  new,  novel  and  useful
inventions.  And  we  need  to  recognize  that  open  standards  can  accelerate  the  inter-
operability and expansion of the global infrastructure. Because collaborative innova-
tion is relatively new, the structure and processes to accommodate ownership, open-
ness and access are evolving, and new creative models are emerging. This is an area
of tremendous promise and is currently being addressed in patent legislation in the
Judiciary Committee.
SUMMARY

Economies  around  the  world  are  replicating  the  characteristics  that  have  given
Western  nations  such  an  advantage—open  markets,  R&D  investment  and  highly-
trained  workers.  Many  companies  in  rapidly  developing  nations  such  as  China,
India, Brazil and Russia are leapfrogging to new computing architectures and busi-
ness  designs.  Emerging  nations  with  limited  legacy  infrastructures  are  developing
specific  innovation  strategies.  They  plan  to  drive  economic  growth  by  leapfrogging
in  infrastructure  development.  These  approaches  are  creating  a  highly  competitive
global economy.

As the United States considers its next steps, I urge that any dialogue on innova-
tion must be made in the global context. The forces of global economic integration—
and advances in technology—are presenting complex challenges that can only be ad-
dressed  by  embracing  opportunities  for  change  and  future  prosperity.  The  status
quo simply cannot be an option.

Governments,  business,  academia  and  labor  must  work  together  to  create  a  cli-
mate  and  a  culture  that  facilitates  cross-border,  cross-organizational  and  cross-dis-
ciplinary  collaboration.  That  is  the  only  environment  in  which  innovation  will
thrive.

America  has  a  long  and  proud  track  record  of  recognizing  when  change  is  re-
quired,  and  then  rising  to  the  challenge.  We  are  at  such  an  inflection  point  today.
I  am  very  enthusiastic  about  seizing  the  opportunities  before  us  and  prospering  in
the decades ahead.

Thank you for the opportunity to be with you today.

BIOGRAPHY FOR NICHOLAS M. DONOFRIO

Nick Donofrio is the leader of IBM’s technology strategy and a champion for inno-
vation  across  IBM  and  its  global  ecosystem.  His  responsibilities  include  IBM  Re-
search, Governmental Programs Quality, Environmental Health and Product Safety,
and  Mr.  Donofrio  is  Vice  Chairman  of  the  IBM  International  Foundation.  Also  re-
porting  to  Mr.  Donofrio  are  the  senior  executives  responsible  for  IBM’s  enterprise
on  demand  transformation  internal  information-technology  organization  and  IBM’s
initiatives  for  open  industry  standards  and  intellectual  property.  He  is  a  member
of IBM’s Executive Technology and Strategy teams. In addition to his strategic busi-
ness  mission,  Mr.  Donofrio  leads  the  development  and  retention  of  IBM’s  technical
population  and  strives  to  enrich  that  community  with  a  diversity  of  culture  and
thought.

Mr.  Donofrio  joined  IBM  in  1967  and  spent  the  early  part  of  his  career  in  inte-
grated  circuit  and  chip  development  as  a  designer  of  logic  and  memory  chips.  He
held  numerous  technical  management  positions  and,  later,  executive  positions  in
several  of  IBM’s  product  divisions.  He  has  led  many  of  IBM’s  major  development

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

and  manufacturing  teams—from  semiconductor  and  storage  technologies,  to  micro-
processors and personal computers, to IBM’s entire family of servers.

23

He earned a Bachelor of Science degree in Electrical Engineering from Rensselaer
Polytechnic  Institute  in  1967  and  a  Master  of  Science  in  the  same  discipline  from
Syracuse University in 1971. In 1999 he was awarded an honorary doctorate in En-
gineering  from  Polytechnic  University,  in  2002  he  received  an  honorary  doctorate
in  Sciences  from  the  University  of  Warwick  in  the  United  Kingdom,  and  in  2005
he was awarded an honorary doctorate in Technology from Marist College.

Mr.  Donofrio  is  a  strong  advocate  of  education  and  vigorously  promotes  mathe-
matics  and  science  as  the  keys  to  economic  competitiveness.  He  is  particularly  fo-
cused  on  advancing  education,  employment  and  career  opportunities  for  under-rep-
resented minorities and women. He served for many years on the Board of Directors
for  the  National  Action  Council  for  Minorities  in  Engineering  (NACME)  and  was
NACME’s  Board  Chair  from  1997  through  2002.  He  also  serves  on  the  national
Board of Directors for INROADS, a non-profit organization that trains and develops
talented minority youth for professional careers in business and industry.

He  is  the  holder  of  seven  technology  patents  and  is  a  member  of  numerous  tech-
nical  and  science  honor  societies.  He  is  a  Fellow  of  the  Institute  for  Electrical  and
Electronics  Engineers,  a  Fellow  of  the  U.K.-based  Royal  Academy  of  Engineering,
a  member  of  the  U.S.-based  National  Academy  of  Engineering,  a  member  of  the
Board of Directors for the Bank of New York, and he serves on the Board of Trust-
ees at Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute.

In  2002,  Mr.  Donofrio  was  recognized  by  Europe’s  Institution  of  Electrical  Engi-
neers with the Mensforth International Gold Medal for outstanding contributions to
the  advancement  of  manufacturing  engineering.  In  2003  he  was  named  Industry
Week  magazine’s  Technology  Leader  of  the  Year,  the  University  of  Arizona’s  Tech-
nical Executive of the Year, and was presented with the Rodney D. Chipp Memorial
Award  by  the  Society  of  Women  Engineers  for  his  outstanding  contributions  to  the
advancement  of  women  in  the  engineering  field.  In  2005,  Mr.  Donofrio  was  elected
a  member  of  the  American  Academy  of  Arts  and  Sciences  and  was  presented  with
Syracuse University’s highest alumni honor—the George Arents Pioneer Medal.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

Chairman BOEHLERT. And thank you for that very positive close.

Mr. Morgridge.

STATEMENT OF JOHN P. MORGRIDGE, CHAIRMAN OF THE

BOARD, CISCO SYSTEMS, INC.

Mr. MORGRIDGE. Good morning. I am John Morgridge, Chairman
of Cisco Systems, the worldwide leader in networking for the Inter-
net.  This  year,  Cisco  celebrates  its  twentieth  anniversary.  I  am
honored to offer this testimony before this committee.

Today’s  hearing  comes  at  an  important  and  challenging  time  in
our  country.  It  is  clear  that  the  United  States  can  no  longer  take
for granted our place as the global economic technology and innova-
tion  leader.  There  is  much  that  government,  education,  and  indus-
try  can  do  to  address  the  challenge,  but  we  cannot  be  complacent
in our response. We must recognize the challenge, and take it head
on, if we hope to be successful.

Like my colleagues, I will briefly focus on three areas today: edu-
cation,  the  appropriate  physical  infrastructure,  and  the  proper
legal  and  policy  framework.  First,  and  most  important,  is  a  sound
primary and secondary education system, with a focus on math and
science.  Education  is  the  foundation.  All  innovation  comes  from  it,
and  it  is  the  engine  for  economic  growth.  We  have  the  finest  post-
secondary education institutions in the world, bar none, but we are
not  producing  anywhere  near  enough  ready  high  school  graduates
to  capitalize  on  this  national  asset,  and  particularly  in  math,
science, and engineering.

There  are  no  easy  answers,  but  technology  may  help.  Ten  years
ago,  our  industry  faced  a  shortage  of  well-trained,  network  savvy
technical  personnel,  people  who  understood  the  fundamentals  of
networking  and  could  design,  install,  and  maintain  networks.  To
address the challenge, we launched the Cisco Networking Academy
Program.  High  schools,  community—technical  and  community  col-
leges, universities, provided the teachers, students, and classrooms.
Cisco provides the online curriculum, currently 16 semesters worth,
a distribution network, a teacher training and support system, and
in some cases, equipment. Some eight years later, this partnership
of  some  10,000  institutions,  in  over  160  countries,  has  provided
basic  networking  training  to  1.2  million  individuals.  Currently,  al-
most  a  half  million  students  are  involved  in  the  programs.  If  any
of  you  would  like  to  visit  an  academy,  I  would  be  delighted  to  join
you. There is at least one institution in each Congressional district
who  is  our  partner  in  this  program.  More  recently,  based  on  our
academy  experience,  Cisco  has  joined  others  in  developing  a  pilot
program  in  the  Kingdom  of  Jordan  to  deliver  K–12  math  cur-
riculum  in  this  blended  classroom  Internet  model.  If  successful,  a
science  curriculum  will  follow.  We  hope  to  capitalize  on  this  pilot
here in the United States and in other countries as well.

We clearly want to have U.S. students studying and excelling at
the masters and Ph.D. level in math, science, and engineering, but
we  must  also  continue  to  attract  the  best  and  brightest  from
around  the  world  to  our  universities,  and  encourage  them  to  stay
after  their  studies.  The  positive  impact  that  foreign-born  students
have  had  on  our  innovation  economy  cannot  be  underestimated.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

Upwards  of  one  third  of  Cisco’s  technical  personnel  are  foreign-
born.

Lastly,  in  the  area  of  education,  we  must  continue  to  fund  basic
research projects in our universities. They are the major innovation
factories. Cisco, like many other countries, was born and incubated
at  a  great  research  university.  NSF  and  other  government  agency
funding is critical to maintaining this unique U.S. asset.

The  second  area  is  having  appropriate  and  proper  legal  and—I
am sorry. The second area is having the appropriate physical infra-
structure  necessary  to  support  the  innovation  ecosystem,  namely
and  most  specifically,  having  real,  ubiquitous  broadband  available
to  all  Americans,  either  a  wire  line  or  a  wireless.  I  applaud  Presi-
dent Bush’s stated goal of having universal broadband connectivity
in  the  United  States  by  2007,  and  we  are  looking  forward  to  the
FCC’s leadership in making this goal a reality.

Lastly, we must foster innovation by having proper legal and pol-
icy framework, particularly in the area of intellectual property and
in  the  patent  systems.  Patents  ensure  that  inventors  have  the  in-
centive to invest in further innovation, while at the same time, pro-
moting public access to new inventions. The threat of patent litiga-
tion, however, is becoming a drag on innovation, while the current
patent system is creating incentives for frivolous lawsuits. Legisla-
tion is necessary to reduce the disruptions caused by litigation, and
improve the quality of our patents.

At  Cisco,  our  most  important  asset  walks  out  the  door  every
night.  We  understand  the  vital  importance  of  intellectual  property
to  business  development,  and  strong  intellectual  property  protec-
tion is necessary. The most effective role of government is to ensure
adherence  to  existing  laws,  and  enforce  penalties  against  trans-
gressors.

In  summary,  there  is  a  lot  that  business,  government,  and  edu-
cation  can  do  to  focus  on  innovation  and  our  national  overall  com-
petitiveness. In order to innovate and remain competitive in the in-
creasingly  global  marketplace,  we  must  have  the  national  trained
workforce  necessary  to  produce  the  products  and  services  that  the
global markets require.

A  national  focus  on  science,  math,  and  engineering  training  is
vital  for  the  U.S.  to  continue  leading  the  innovation  economy.  We
must  have  the  appropriate  physical  infrastructure,  in  the  form  of
a  ubiquitous  true  broadband.  We  must  have  a  date  certain  for  the
transition  to  digital  television  to  free  up  the  spectrum  for  public
safety  uses,  as  well  as  rural  broadband.  Finally,  we  must  have  a
legal  framework  that  incents  innovation  and  a  patent  system  that
protects  the  inventors,  while  not  creating  a  system  that  is  overly
litigious.  Patent  legislation  before  the  Congress  should  be  passed
this session.

Thank you. I will be happy to take any questions.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Morgridge follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN P. MORGRIDGE

I  am  John  Morgridge,  Chairman  of  the  Board  of  Cisco  Systems,  the  worldwide
leader  in  networking  for  the  Internet.  This  year,  Cisco  celebrates  20  years  of  com-
mitment to technology innovation, industry leadership and corporate social responsi-
bility and I am honored to offer this testimony on innovation and U.S. competitive-
ness before this committee.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Today’s  hearing  comes  at  an  important  and  challenging  time  for  our  country.  It
is  becoming  very  clear  that  the  United  States  can  no  longer  take  for  granted  our
place as the global economic, technology, and innovation leader. There is much that
government and industry can do to address this challenge, but we cannot be compla-
cent  in  our  response.  We  must  recognize  the  challenge  and  take  it  head  on  if  we
hope to be successful.

I will focus on three areas today. The first area, and in my mind, the most impor-
tant to ensure global competitiveness and continued innovation is a sound education
system,  including  sufficient  basic  research  and  development  funding  as  well  as  a
focus on science and math. The second area is having the appropriate physical infra-
structure  necessary  to  support  the  innovation  ecosystem,  namely,  and  most  specifi-
cally,  having  real,  ubiquitous  broadband  available  to  all  Americans—whether
wireline  or  wireless.  Last,  we  must  foster  innovation  by  having  a  proper  legal  and
policy  framework,  particularly  in  intellectual  property,  security  and  in  the  patent
system.

I. IMPORTANCE  OF  EDUCATION  TO  INNOVATION  AND  U.S.  COMPETI-

TIVENESS
Education is the foundation to all innovation and the engine to economic growth.
We  must  advocate  policies  that  will  create  an  educated  workforce  to  match  Amer-
ica’s  future  employment  needs,  specifically  an  educated  workforce  trained  in  math
and science which is critical to the innovation economy. In order for America’s high
tech industry to stay competitive throughout the 21st Century and beyond, we need
to  invest  in  our  workforce  of  tomorrow  by  giving  them  the  tools  necessary  to  com-
pete for post-secondary education programs or careers in science, math or engineer-
ing. We need to make America’s educational system the best in the world by making
math  and  science  teaching  a  priority  for  our  children  and  support  efforts  on  the
State and federal levels to accomplish this objective. I applaud what this committee
has  done  to  recognize  the  finest  math  and  science  teachers  in  this  country—their
work is vital to our future competitiveness.

A  domestic  workforce  educated  in  science,  math  or  engineering  will  ensure  that
the American high tech industry continues to lead the world in terms of innovation
and entrepreneurship. Moreover, an educated workforce will enable Cisco and other
job producing innovative companies to meet our human resource needs by attracting
domestic talent, unencumbered by immigration restrictions.

Unfortunately,  America’s  children  are  not  receiving  the  necessary  training  in
math  and  science  to  compete  for  high-paying  technology  jobs  of  the  future.  For  ex-
ample,  only  24  states  require  secondary  students  to  take  at  least  three  years  of
math,  and  only  21  states  require  students  to  take  at  least  three  years  of  science.
Because math and science education is lacking, young Americans will miss out on
job opportunities, or will lack the necessary skills for post-secondary study. Nation-
ally,  out  of  100  ninth-graders,  only  67  will  graduate  from  high  school  on  time,  only
38  will  directly  enter  college,  only  26  are  still  enrolled  their  sophomore  year,  and
only  18  will  end  up  graduating  from  college.  U.S.  12th  graders  performed  among
the lowest of the 21 countries assessed in both math and science on the Third Inter-
national Mathematics and Science Study.

Improving  education  worldwide  is  a  top  goal  of  Cisco  Systems,  Inc.  Since  1997,
the Cisco Networking Academy Program has leveraged the Internet to improve edu-
cation  around  the  world.  The  Cisco  Networking  Academy  Program  has  enabled
Cisco to facilitate public and private partnerships for education and become a lead-
ing  innovator  in  e-learning.  Since  its  inception,  over  1.6  million  students  have  en-
rolled at more than 10,000 Academies located in high schools, technical schools, col-
leges,  universities,  and  community-based  organizations  in  over  150  countries.  For
more information on this program, please visit: www.cisco.com/go/netacad.

We have to be innovative in our approach to education. We are in the 21st century
and  must  use  the  tools  and  methods  of  today  to  train  our  future  workforce.  With
an e-learning model such as the Cisco Network Academy Program we have learned
that  curriculum  can  be  altered  based  on  how  well  students  are  performing  on  the
tests based on that curriculum. We have also found that students in East Palo Alto,
California,  an  underprivileged  area,  perform  as  well  as  the  richest  school  districts
in  America.  Given  the  opportunity  and  the  tools,  students  can  perform  and  become
excited  about  technology.  Students  in  the  Chairman’s  district  are  currently  becom-
ing certified as Cisco Network Associates at SUNY Institute of Technology and Mo-
hawk  Valley  Community  College,  as  well  as  at  Broome-Tioga  Board  of  Cooperative
Educational Services, serving 15 school districts in Broome and Tioga counties.

Additionally, Cisco has helped develop a pilot program in the Hashemite Kingdom
of  Jordan  to  deliver  math  and  science  curriculum  via  the  Internet.  Partnering  with
the  government  of  Jordan,  the  World  Economic  Forum,  U.S.  Agency  for  Inter-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

national  Development  (USAID),  and  many  other  corporate  partners,  the  Jordan
Education Initiative (JEI) is using the Internet to deliver curriculum of math, Infor-
mation  and  Communication  Technology  (ICT),  Arabic  and  Science  (January  2005).
Taking  the  knowledge  from  this  pilot  program,  we  hope  to  expand  to  other  nations
and bring this method of curriculum delivery to the United States as well.

Cisco  supports  increasing  innovation  in  public  schools,  establishing  high  stand-
ards,  promoting  the  use  of  education  technology  in  the  classroom  and  ensuring  ac-
countability  of  schools,  teachers,  districts  and  programs.  We  also  support  efforts  to
ensure  that  all  children—and  all  Americans—share  in  the  information  age  through
access to technology and its benefits. However, we also need to put a renewed focus
on math and science in the schools, much like in the 1960’s, so that it is the United
States producing the innovative technologies and the job centers of tomorrow, rather
then our counterparts in Europe or Asia.

The  positive  impact  that  foreign-born  students  have  had  on  our  innovation  econ-
omy  cannot  be  discounted.  We  clearly  want  to  have  U.S.  students  studying  and  ex-
celling  at  the  masters  and  Ph.D.  levels  in  math,  science  and  engineering,  but  we
also  must  continue  to  attract  the  best  and  the  brightest  from  around  the  world  to
our universities and encourage them to stay in the U.S. after their studies. Foreign-
born  math,  science  and  engineering  students  have  been  and  continue  to  be  a  boon
to our economy and we should support their continued success in academia and in-
dustry in this nation.

Recognizing  the  technology  industry’s  responsibility  to  contribute  to  an  improved
education  system,  TechNet  has  established  an  Education  Task  Force  to  develop  a
new  private-sector  initiative  to  increase  America’s  math,  science  and  engineering
talent.  TechNet  is  a  technology  policy  trade  association  of  CEO’s  of  which  Cisco  is
a  founder  and  active  member.  The  Task  Force  will  examine  science  and  math  pre-
paredness in primary and secondary education as well as barriers to science and en-
gineering  degree  attainment  in  post-secondary  and  graduate  education.  One  of  the
goals  of  the  Task  Force  is  to  impact  the  goal  of  doubling  the  number  of  STEM
(Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and  Math)  majors  by  2015.  I  serve  on  this  Task
Force and we will be offering our full report this fall.

Last,  but  certainly  not  least,  in  order  to  stimulate  high-tech  research  and  give
companies  certainty,  the  R&D  tax  credit  should  be  updated  and  expanded  to  maxi-
mize  its  impact  in  incentivizing  companies  to  conduct  R&D  in  the  United  States.
Additionally,  funding  should  be  increased  for  basic  R&D  at  government,  university
and private labs. It pleases me to no end that Chairman Boehlert is a self-professed
‘‘unabashed  cheerleader’’  for  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  and  hope  that
the  increased  funding  for  the  NSF  he  and  his  colleagues  were  able  to  get  this  year
will be built upon.

The  House  Science  Committee,  with  its  deep  understanding  of  the  importance  of
math  and  science  to  our  overall  standing  in  the  world,  should  continue  to  use  its
leadership role, with hearings such as this one, to bring attention to this vital area
for  U.S.  competitiveness  and  innovation  and  press  for  increased  funding  for  math
and science education, basic R&D and the National Science Foundation.

II. APPROPRIATE PHYSICAL INFRASTRUCTURE FOR INNOVATION
Broadband Deployment

The Internet, as we know it, was developed with government funds under the di-
rection  of  the  U.S.  Advanced  Research  Projects  Agency  and,  in  1969,  became  a  re-
ality  with  the  interconnection  of  four  university  computers.  From  those  humble  be-
ginnings,  the  Internet  has  now  become  the  basis  for  efficiencies  and  productivity
never thought possible.

Broadband is always-on, high-speed connectivity to the Internet and it is the foun-
dation  of  all  future  information  connectivity.  Its  import  to  innovation,  collaboration
and  a  nation’s  overall  competitiveness  cannot  be  understated.  The  deployment  of
broadband  infrastructure  is  a  key  measure  of  success  for  a  country  and  is  crucial
to  the  future  growth  of  the  innovation  economy.  I  applaud  President  Bush’s  stated
goal  of  having  universal  broadband  connectivity  in  the  United  States  by  2007  and
we are looking forward to the FCC’s leadership to making this goal a reality.

Although  a  few  countries  such  as  Korea  and  Japan  have  achieved  significant
broadband penetration, most countries lag far behind. The United States has fallen
from fourth to 16th in broadband penetration and stands to fall even further. More-
over, with few exceptions, most of the broadband infrastructure available today con-
sists of relative slow connections in the 500kpbs to 3Mbps range, not in the 10Mbps
to 100Mbps that will needed to support the development of future innovative appli-
cations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Because telecommunications is one of the most intensely regulated industries and
has  a  legacy  of  decades  of  government  involvement,  regulatory  policy  significantly
affects  broadband  infrastructure  investment.  Regulators  and  government  can  affect
investment  in  myriad  ways,  some  negative  and  some  positive:  through  the  applica-
tion of legacy regulation to new technologies, through attempts to artificially create
competition, through spectrum allocation, through subsidy systems, and through di-
rect government investment and tax incentives.

Cisco  believes  that  deployment  of  next  generation  broadband  infrastructure
should take priority over most competing interests when deciding regulatory policy.
In Cisco’s opinion, any national broadband plan should include policies to:

Æ Incent private sector investment in broadband infrastructure
Æ Promote market-driven deployment of new technologies and applications
Æ Encourage innovation and entrepreneurship through clear, concise, minimally

intrusive rules that create as much market certainty as is possible

Æ Make spectrum available for wireless broadband services

Key  regulatory  policies  to  implement  these  goals  include  removing  regulatory  re-
quirements  to  unbundle  new  networks  and  new  infrastructure  investment;  keeping
onerous  telecommunications  regulation 
imposed  on  competitive
broadband providers such as cable, wireless, and powerline; avoiding legacy regula-
tion being imposed on new technologies and applications such as VoIP, IP video, and
other  Internet  applications;  ensuring  sufficient  spectrum  for  high  speed  broadband
access applications; and migrating programs to support infrastructure investment in
low density rural areas from a traditional circuit switched voice focus to broadband
connectivity.
Digital Television Transition

from  being 

In  order  for  additional  wireless  spectrum  to  be  made  available  for  public  safety
uses,  as  well  as  to  bring  broadband  to  rural  and  under-served  areas  in  the  Nation,
Cisco  has  advocated  a  ‘‘date  certain’’  to  end  analog  television  broadcasting  in  the
700 MHz band in the U.S.

Current federal law provides that analog television broadcasting will cease by the
end  of  2006  or  when  85  percent  of  households  can  receive  digital  TV  signals.  It  is
clear that the 2006 date will not be met, given projected market conditions. Key offi-
cials at the FCC, and in the U.S. House of Representatives, have indicated an inter-
est  in  selecting  a  date  certain  of  no  later  than  January  1,  2009,  and  Cisco,  along
with  other  high  technology  companies,  including  consumer  electronics  companies,
rural interests, and the public safety community, are urging policy-makers to adopt
a  hard  date.  Once  the  transition  is  complete,  24  MHz  of  spectrum  will  be  turned
over to public safety licensees, and the lion’s share would be devoted to commercial
wireless service, including broadband access, as the directed by Congress.

Cisco  has  no  ‘‘technology  religion’’  with  respect  to  licensed  wireless  broadband
technology.  Cisco  is  a  member  of  the  WiMax  inter-operability  forum,  and  has  also
closely  followed  developments  around  the  802.20  standard,  but  we  believe  it  is  the
market that will best decide what technologies will flourish. As fits our overall phi-
losophy,  we  do  not  believe  that  the  government  should  pick  technology  winners  or
losers.

The basic benefits that will be available to the American public as soon as broad-
casters give back their second channel will be numerous. According to the Informa-
tion Technology Industry Council (ITI), of which Cisco is an active member, benefits
will include:

1. Public  Safety—On  9/11  and  every  day  across  the  country,  first  responders
from  police  and  fire  departments  cannot  speak  to  each  other  because  their
radios  operate  on  different  frequencies.  The  9/11  Commission  Report  rec-
ommended in 2004 that Congress approve legislation to clear these channels
for public safety. Congress was aware of this problem in 1997 and designated
more  spectrum  for  use  by  first  responders,  but  it  can’t  take  effect  until
broadcasters release their currently held spectrum.

2. Rural  Broadband—Rural  areas  are  one  of  the  major  parts  of  the  country
that  still  lack  high-speed  broadband  Internet  access.  Using  the  additional
spectrum, companies would be able to offer wireless broadband to areas that
are not served by current broadband technologies.

3. Economic Growth—A definitive digital TV transition date would give high-
tech  companies  enough  certainty  to  invest  R&D  into  innovative  wireless
broadband  networks  for  use  in  the  newly  available  spectrum.  That  would  in
turn spark growth in the U.S. high-tech sector, provide new high-quality jobs

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

for  American  workers,  and  add  to  the  global  competitiveness  of  U.S.  tech-
nology.

4. Telecom  Competition—Today,  consumers  receive  most  of  their  tele-
communications  services—phone,  television,  and  Internet  service—through
either  their  phone  line  or  their  cable  line.  Because  spectrum  in  the  700
megahertz band is of high quality and capable of advanced uses, it could one
day  become  a  ‘‘third  pipe’’  into  consumers’  homes  that  could  provide  phone,
television  and  Internet  services,  which  would  have  the  effect  of  increasing
competition and reducing prices for consumers.

III. PROPER LEGAL AND POLICY FRAMEWORK FOR INNOVATION
Patent Reform

Patents  ensure  that  inventors  have  the  incentive  to  invest  in  further  innovation,
while  at  the  same  time  promoting  public  access  to  new  inventions.  The  threat  of
patent  litigation,  however,  is  becoming  a  drag  on  innovation  while  the  current  pat-
ent  system  is  creating  incentives  for  frivolous  litigation.  Legislation  is  necessary  to
reduce the disruptions caused by litigation and improve the quality of patents.

Certain factors in the current patent system have resulted in disruptions for Cisco
and  other  leading  innovation  companies.  First,  the  playing  field  in  the  patent  legal
system  has  become  increasingly  tilted  towards  plaintiffs,  making  even  weak  claims
problematic  for  litigation  targets.  Second,  the  U.S.  Patent  and  Trademark  Office
(PTO)  is  currently  overburdened  and  lacks  procedures  necessary  to  avoid  issuing
poor quality patents on which plaintiffs can stake a claim. Third, some opportunistic
trial lawyers and investment funds are buying up patents to use as offensive litiga-
tion tools. These so-called ‘‘patent trolls’’ accumulate patent portfolios not to further
innovation  and  development  of  new  products,  but  to  compel  others  to  license  tech-
nologies from them under threat of litigation. In many instances, these patents are
used  for  strictly  tactical  purposes,  never  intended  for  commercialization  of  inven-
tions.

Cisco  supports  efforts  to  pass  common  sense  patent  reform  legislation  to  reduce
the  disruptions  caused  by  litigation  and  improve  the  quality  of  patents.  We  are
working with other companies and industry groups to craft legislative recommenda-
tions to address this issue.
Intellectual Property

At  Cisco,  we  believe  our  most  important  assets  walk  out  the  door  every  night.
However, as we produce and own intellectual property and understand the vital im-
portance  of  intellectual  property  to  business  development,  strong  intellectual  prop-
erty protection is necessary. Mandatory or legislated standards are not the answer,
however.  Technical  standards  developed  and  mandated  by  the  government  would
freeze  technological  innovation  and  hurt  development  of  digital  technologies.  This
concept is true for digital rights management, security and other issues where some
have  asked  government  to  step  in  and  mandate  a  solution.  If  history  and  Moore’s
Law  are  any  indicators,  by  the  time  a  technology  industry  standard  is  developed
and  adopted,  there  is  usually  one  in  the  pipeline  that  is  better  and  in  the  market-
place eighteen months later.

The most effective role of government is to ensure adherence to existing laws and

enforce penalties against transgressors.
Security

We all recognize how important security is to our economy, national security, and
national  competitiveness.  Over  the  years,  this  committee  has  been  a  leader  in  pro-
moting  cyber  security  research  and  development,  including  it’s  authorship  of  the
2002  Cyber  Security  Research  and  Development  Act  (P.L.  107–305),  which  brought
an  important  focus  to  the  benefits  from  additional  basic  cyber  security  research  at
the  NSF  and  the  ongoing  security  work  at  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and
Technology. The proper policy framework is also vitally important for continued ad-
vances in security.

Innovation sits at the heart of the security challenge. There is tremendous innova-
tion in security technologies. Information security systems are moving from passive
to active, and from point products to self-defending networks using an adaptive, and
interconnected, architecture-based approach. We will enhance security through inno-
vation and effective law enforcement. As the nature of security continues to change,
public policy has to continue recognize the centrality of innovation, and continue to
avoid  technology  mandates  or  regulation,  which  at  the  end  of  the  day  will  always
trail innovation, and make us less, not more, secure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

CONCLUSION

31

In  summary,  there  is  a  lot  that  the  government  can  be  doing  to  focus  on  innova-

tion and our national overall competitiveness.

In  order  to  innovate  and  remain  competitive  in  the  increasingly  global  market-
place  we  must  have  the  national,  trained  workforce  necessary  to  produce  the  prod-
ucts  and  services  that  the  global  market  requires.  If  we  do  not  produce  them,  they
will be produced elsewhere. A national, laser focus on science, math and engineering
training  is  vital  for  the  U.S.  to  continue  leading  the  innovation  economy.  Further,
we  must  also  have  the  tools  to  incent  the  future  workforce  to  go  into  science,  math
and  engineering.  The  Financial  Accounting  Standards  Board  (FASB),  overseen  by
the  Securities  and  Exchange  Commission  (SEC),  has  issued  a  final  rule  to  require
companies  to  expense  stock  options—a  vital  component  of  what  helped  build  Cisco
Systems  and  other  innovative  companies  around  the  Nation.  Without  the  appro-
priate tools to build companies in the U.S., it becomes increasingly difficult to com-
pete.

We  also  must  have  the  appropriate  physical  infrastructure  in  the  form  of  ubiq-
uitous,  true  broadband.  We  must  have  a  date  certain  for  the  transition  to  digital
television  to  free  up  the  spectrum  for  public  safety  uses  as  well  as  for  rural
broadband.

Finally,  we  must  have  a  legal  framework  that  incents  innovation  and  a  patent
system  that  protects  the  work  of  inventors  while  not  creating  a  system  that  is  so
overly litigious to the point of being fruitless to innovation. Patent legislation before
the Congress should be passed this session.

Thank you.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JOHN P. MORGRIDGE

John P. Morgridge joined Cisco Systems in 1988 as President and CEO, and grew
the  company  from  $5  million  to  more  than  $1  billion  in  sales,  and  from  34  to  more
than  2,250  employees.  In  1990  he  took  Cisco  public,  and  in  1995  was  appointed
Chairman.  During  his  tenure,  Cisco  has  become  the  leading  supplier  of  high-per-
formance  inter-networking  products,  with  more  than  $20  billion  in  revenues,  and
some 34,000 employees in 65 countries.

As  Chairman,  Morgridge  continues  to  champion  a  range  of  education,  philan-
thropy, and corporate citizenship initiatives, and is a guiding force behind the com-
pany’s long-term commitment to focusing on basic human needs, responsible citizen-
ship, and access to education.

Morgridge  speaks  frequently  to  audiences  worldwide  about  productivity,  strategic
management,  entrepreneurialism,  and  how  education  and  technology  can  fuel  eco-
nomic development in developing nations. He teaches management at Stanford Uni-
versity’s Graduate School of Business, and serves on its School of Business Advisory
Council.  In  1996,  he  received  Stanford’s  Arbuckle  Award  for  excellence  in  manage-
ment leadership.

Prior  to  Cisco,  Morgridge  was  President  and  CEO  of  GRiD  Systems,  and  before
that  held  senior  positions  with  Stratus  Computer  and  Honeywell  Information  Sys-
tems.  He  earned  a  BBA  from  the  University  of  Wisconsin  and  an  MBA  from  Stan-
ford.

Morgridge  and  his  wife,  Tashia,  actively  support  a  range  of  education,  conserva-
tion, and human services initiatives, and he serves on the boards of CARE, the Na-
ture Conservancy, Business Executives for National Security, the Wisconsin Alumni
Research  Foundation,  the  Cisco  Foundation,  and  the  Cisco  Learning  Institute.
Morgridge is also a Trustee of Stanford University.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

Chairman BOEHLERT. I suspected something before I came to to-
day’s  hearing,  because  I  knew  of  the  witnesses,  and  Mr.  Donofrio
and Mr. Morgridge, and I suspect and know Dr. Brody will confirm,
this  is  going  to  be  a  love-in.  This  is  people  who  agree  with  each
other.

The  challenge  before  us  is  to  get  other  people  to  pay  attention
when they are dealing with issues of the moment in other commit-
tees, and on the other side of the Capitol, got to deal with this right
now, because the moment is here.

Dr. Brody.

STATEMENT OF DR. WILLIAM R. BRODY, PRESIDENT, THE

JOHNS HOPKINS UNIVERSITY

Dr. BRODY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and Members of the Com-

mittee. It is a both an honor and a pleasure to be here today.

Johns  Hopkins  University,  the  university  of  which  I  am  Presi-
dent, was founded in 1876 as the first research university in Amer-
ica.  Today,  Johns  Hopkins  is  the  largest  university  recipient  of  re-
search  funding  from  agencies  of  the  Federal  Government,  and  for
25 years in a row, has been the country’s leading academic institu-
tion,  in  terms  of  expenditures  in  science,  medical,  and  engineering
research.

But  I  am  also  here  today  as  a  member  of  the  Council  on  Com-
petitiveness, and now, co-chair of the Committee’s National Innova-
tion  Initiative,  or  NII,  which  I  believe  you  are  all  familiar.  The
Council, of course, brings together labor, business, government, and
academic  leaders  to  address  issues  of  importance  at  this  time,  of
course, being the focus on innovation.

Since  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  said  this  was  a  learning  experience,  I
am  going  to  teach  you  introductory  calculus,  and  the  calculus  is
what  I  call  the  calculus  of  innovation,  which  I  have  learned  from
my  role  on  the  NII.  And  it  is  very  simple,  this  is  no  homework  re-
quired.  Knowledge  drives  innovation;  innovation  drives  produc-
tivity;  productivity  drives  economic  growth.  It  couldn’t  be  simpler.
It is what made America what it is today. And in order to do that,
as you have heard, we need talent, we need investment in basic re-
search,  and  we  need  infrastructure  in  order  to  enable  that  to  hap-
pen. And knowledge is key.

What  I  would  like  to  do  is  to  tell  a  little  story,  an  example.  In
the 1960s, I was a graduate student at Stanford University, study-
ing both medicine and electrical engineering. And I had the oppor-
tunity  to  work  on  a  computer  system—actually,  the  computers
were  made  by  IBM—on  a  project  to  tie  computers  together.  These
computers  were—it  wasn’t  clear  what  you  would  do  tying  com-
puters together, but the Defense Department, through the Defense
Advanced  Research  Project  Agency,  DARPA,  funded  this  project,
and  it  was  called  the  DARPANet,  and  my  colleague,  John
Morgridge,  knows  about  this  very  well.  And  of  course,  in  the  ’60s,
we  were  playing  around  with  this,  doing  all  sorts  of  things,  none
of  them  particularly  useful  at  the  beginning.  It  wasn’t  clear  where
it  ended.  Fast  forward  15  years,  a  graduate  student  working  at
Stanford  on  the  DARPANet  makes  some  small  computers  that  he
calls  workstations,  and  forms  a  company  called  Sun  Microsystems.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

Sun,  if  you  don’t  know  it,  stands  for  Stanford  University  Network,
and is a multi-billion dollar company today.

Another  pair  of  students,  I  believe  a  husband  and  a  wife  team,
made  little  devices  that  move  traffic  around  on  this  network,  and
that  became  the  foundation  for  Cisco  Systems,  and  of  course,  the
DARPANet  became  the  Internet,  and  not  only  do  we  have  Cisco
and Sun today, but we have got Yahoo! and Google and thousands
of  other  companies,  hundreds  of  thousands  of  jobs,  and  tens  of  bil-
lions of dollars.

I use this as an example for two reasons. One, it talks about the
investment  in  sort  of  blue  sky  research  that  has  no  short-term  or
foreseeable  value,  but  ends  up  being  extraordinarily  valuable.  Sec-
ondly,  it  provides  a  vehicle  in  which  young,  talented  students  can
come to a university and learn a new field, in the process of under-
taking  the  research.  And  also,  it  illustrates  the  importance  of  tak-
ing risks, and I think as a nation, we have become extraordinarily
risk averse.

You  have  heard  things  about  education,  and  certainly,  access  to
talent  is  critical.  And  although  we  have  had  the  best  and  the
brightest  coming  to  the  United  States,  as  you  know,  that  is  no
longer  happening  in  our  universities,  and  we  need,  I  think,  very
quickly to address what has become a global talent search. In 2002,
the  House  passed  the  NSF  Tech  Talent  bill,  which  created  incen-
tives  for  universities  to  increase  the  fraction  of  students  receiving
degrees  in  science  and  engineering  majors,  but  these  NSF  pro-
grams were not funded as authorized. Scholarship money is a crit-
ical choice of majors for students, and providing incentives, I think,
is  a  way  to  fund,  to  get  students,  more  students  into  science  and
engineering by funding scholarships.

We  should  also  augment  programs  to  reach  out  to  underserved,
especially  under-represented  populations,  women  and  minorities,
because we are excluding a large potential fraction of the labor pool
to access homegrown talent. And universities should be encouraged
to bolster science and math teacher training. After all, we have lots
of people who are expert in science and math. We should find ways
to leverage our expertise into the school system.

We  have  two  urgent  priorities  before  us,  I  think.  The  first  is  to
greatly increase government and private funding in basic research,
as opposed to applied research, and emphasize the far out research,
like  the  DARPANet  that  was  going  on.  I  use  DARPA  as  an  exam-
ple, because I had a conversation with one of my computer science
faculty  who  recently  was  telling  me  that  DARPA  was  becoming
very  short-term  focused.  I  had,  then,  a  conversation  with  a  presi-
dent  of  a  major  research  university,  who  told  me  that  the  DARPA
research  now  was  so  short-term  focused  that  they  were  no  longer
accepting  DARPA  grants  in  certain  fields,  because  with  a  short-
term  focus,  they  couldn’t  put  a  graduate  student  on  the  project  for
fear  that  the  project  funding  would  end  before  the  graduate  stu-
dent  completed  the  dissertation.  This  is  a  huge  issue,  I  think,  to
turn around, but take a long-term focus.

And  we  need  to  fulfill  our  commitment  to  double  the  National
Science  Foundation  budget  in  the  next  five  years,  significantly  in-
creasing  our  basic  research  efforts  in  the  physical  sciences  and
mathematics  and  information  sciences,  as  we  have  through  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

doubling of the NIH budget. The NSF budget costs $18 per person,
scarcely  more  than  a  couple  of  six  packs  of  your  favorite  brew  or
cola,  and  I  think  we  can’t  afford  not  to  make  this  kind  of  commit-
ment.

I  would  just  like  to  close  by  saying  that  since  World  War  II,
America  has  led  the  world  in  science  and  technology  innovations,
largely because it was willing to make considerable investments in
both its education systems and its research and development infra-
structure, that has enabled natural creative genius of the American
people  to  flourish.  But  today,  as  at  no  time  in  the  recent  past,  we
are  challenged  by  other  nations  equally  determined  to  succeed.  As
Americans, we wish them every success, except the kind that would
come at our own expense. The race belongs to the swiftest, and we
must keep running.

Thank you very much for the opportunity to speak today.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Brody follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM R. BRODY

Introduction

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  it  is  a  pleasure  and  an  honor  for
me  to  testify  before  you  today  regarding  U.S.  competitiveness  and  the  innovation
challenge we face at home and from abroad. My name is Bill Brody and I am Presi-
dent of The Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore, Maryland.

Johns  Hopkins  was  founded  in  1876  as  the  first  research  university  in  America.
For  more  than  125  years  the  university  has  committed  its  resources  and  energies
to  scientific  discovery  and  innovation.  Among  the  discoveries  to  come  from  Johns
Hopkins are saccharine and Mercurochrome, transit satellites and cardiopulmonary
resuscitation, gene splicing and parallel processor technology. Today, Johns Hopkins
is  the  largest  university  recipient  of  research  funding  from  agencies  of  the  Federal
Government, and for 25 years in a row has been the country’s leading academic in-
stitution in expenditures in science, medical and engineering research.

I  am  also  appearing  today  as  a  member  of  the  Council  on  Competitiveness,  and
Co-chair  of  the  Committee’s  National  Innovation  Initiative.  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee are no doubt familiar with the role the Council plays in shaping the national
discourse on business and economic competitiveness by assembling data, developing
recommendations,  and  implementing  follow-up  strategies  in  every  region  of  the
country.
The Need to Innovate

In  my  work  with  the  Council  on  Competitiveness  I  have  been  introduced  to  a

novel concept: the calculus of innovation.

When  we  talk  about  competitiveness,  what  we  mean  is  the  capacity  to  increase
the real income of all Americans by producing high-value products and services that
meet  the  test  of  the  world  markets.  It  sounds  easy,  but  of  course  as  we  all  know,
it’s  not.  Competition  can  be  brutal.  The  need  to  be  competitive  with  all  comers  is
not an abstraction. It’s not some future worry we have time to ignore in the present.
American  economic  competitiveness  is  a  real  issue,  right  now,  one  that’s  tremen-
dously  important  to  us  all.  In  recent  years,  productivity  gains  have  accounted  for
about  two-thirds  of  the  annual  growth  of  our  gross  domestic  product.  Much  of  this
gain has come from innovation in the application of technology to business.

And this is where the calculus of innovation comes in.
The calculus of innovation is really quite simple:

Knowledge drives innovation;
Innovation drives productivity;
Productivity drives our economic growth.

That’s  all  there  is  to  it.  In  the  roaring  1990s,  our  knowledge  enabled  us  to  inno-
vate,  and  our  innovations  increased  American  productivity,  and  hence,  American
economic growth.

But  there  is  no  guarantee  that  these  productivity  gains  will  continue.  And  based
upon studies I have seen at the Council on Competitiveness, it looks as though the
innovation  pipeline  is  slowly  being  squeezed  dry.  If  current  trends  continue,  many

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

of  us  on  the  Council  believe  there  is  a  good  chance  that  U.S.  competitiveness  in  vi-
tally important high-tech areas will fall behind that of China, India, and even a re-
surgent Western Europe. Here’s why:

First, we are losing the skills race. About one-third of all jobs in the United States
require  science  or  technology  competency,  but  currently  only  17  percent  of  Ameri-
cans  graduate  with  science  or  technology  majors.  By  contrast,  the  National  Science
Foundation  2004  Science  and  Engineering  Indicators  report  shows  that  the  world
average is 27 percent, Korea’s average is twice ours, and in China, fully 52 percent
of college degrees awarded are in science and technology.

By way of example, when Harvard polled its entering class recently, it discovered
only  one  percent  of  their  students  expressed  interest  in  studying  computer  science,
yet information technology lies at the heart of many of our productivity gains.

Today,  foreign  graduate  students  studying  science  and  technology  in  our  univer-
sities outnumber their American counterparts. They’re terrific students, but histori-
cally about 40 percent have left the United States after receiving their degrees. Pol-
icy  changes  since  2001  have  made  it  more  difficult  to  come  to  the  United  States,
and more difficult to stay. But consider the talent we may be sending away: 35 per-
cent of the doctoral degrees we award in the physical sciences go to foreign-born stu-
dents, as do fully 58 percent of the engineering Ph.D.s.

Europe  now  produces  more  than  twice  the  number  of  scientists  and  engineers  as
the U.S.; and Asia about three times the number. Again relying on National Science
Foundation  data,  the  U.S.  share  of  world  Bachelor’s  engineering  degrees  granted
dropped  in  half  during  the  1990s:  from  about  12  percent  in  1991  to  six  percent  in
2000.

Second,  and  just  as  worrisome  as  losing  the  skills  race,  we  are  beginning  to  lose
our  preeminence  in  discovery  as  well.  Historically,  innovation  in  science  and  tech-
nology has been the direct result of investments in basic research and development.
America’s longstanding commitment to generously fund R&D has been a major driv-
er of our economic competitiveness.

However,  as  a  percentage  of  our  overall  gross  domestic  product,  U.S.  federal  re-
search  and  development  spending  peaked  forty  years  ago—in  1965,  at  just  under
two percent of GDP. Today, it is now down by more than half, to about 0.8 percent
of GDP. And while government spending for medical research has increased, overall
R&D spending, especially in basic sciences, continues to decline.

As  you  would  expect,  these  numbers  have  very  real  consequences.  Science  and
technology  articles  published  in  Western  Europe  already  exceed  those  in  the  U.S.
By  2010,  it  is  anticipated  that  the  emerging  economies  of  Asia  will  produce  more
patents and spend more on R&D than the United States.

The Washington Post reported last week on the world’s most competitive economy:
Finland.  It  wasn’t  until  Nokia  surpassed  Motorola  and  Japanese  competitors  to  be-
come the leading cell phone maker that many of us paid much attention to Finland.
But  we  all  know  now  that  Finland  is  a  world-class  competitor.  Two  factors  in  par-
ticular seem to support their achievements: first, they have what is largely acknowl-
edged  to  be  the  best  educational  system  in  Europe.  Finnish  students,  when  tested,
are  the  world’s  best  readers,  and  among  the  best  in  science  and  math.  The  second
factor is that the Finns have an extraordinary commitment to research and develop-
ment.  The  Post  reports  that  through  government  and  private  industry,  the  Finns
devote  3.5  percent  of  their  gross  domestic  product  to  research  and  development,  al-
most  a  full  percentage  point  more  than  the  total  U.S.  private  and  public  research
investment (which is 2.6 percent of GDP) and nearly double the average for Europe
as a whole.

The lesson of Finland is the same lesson the United States taught the rest of the
world  in  the  past  50  years:  investment  in  education  combined  with  investment  in
research  and  discovery  pay  enormous  returns.  I  believe—and  Council  of  Competi-
tiveness  studies  show—that  investment  in  education  and  R&D  is  probably  the  sin-
gle  best  way  we  can  address  some  of  our  most  persistent  and  difficult  challenges.
For instance, we are all aware that our country has a huge trade deficit. We have
lived  with  this  imbalance  for  years,  driven  in  part  by  our  thirst  for  imported  oil.
But  here  too  the  recent  numbers  are  worrisome.  Since  the  end  of  World  War  II  we
have  always  maintained  a  positive  balance  of  trade  in  high-tech  exports.  It  has  al-
ways been a source of strength. In 1980, for instance, the U.S. produced 31 percent
of  global  high-tech  exports;  Japan  produced  15  percent,  and  emerging  Asia  seven
percent.  But  by  2001,  those  numbers  had  turned  around.  Now  the  U.S.  was  pro-
ducing  only  18  percent,  Japan  10  percent,  and  the  emerging  nations  of  Asia  fully
25  percent  of  high-tech  exports.  Our  once-positive  balance  of  trade  for  high-tech
items is now in deficit, and continuing to fall rapidly.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

Declining  leadership  in  innovation  suggests  our  standard  of  living  will  decline  as
a  result.  Some  say  that  has  already  happened.  In  fact,  research  by  the  Council  of
Competitiveness  shows  that  the  real  income  of  many  Americans  did  not  improve
even during the economic booms of the 1980s and 1990s.
Fueling Innovation

Knowledge  drives  innovation;  innovation  drives  productivity;  productivity  drives

our economic growth.

In order to master the calculus of innovation, promote economic growth, and sup-
port  the  genius  for  innovation  and  discovery  that  has  been  the  hallmark  of  Amer-
ican prosperity for two centuries, we must reaffirm our national belief in the trans-
formative  power  of  knowledge.  To  do  so,  we  should  rededicate  ourselves  to  both
transmitting  existing  knowledge  to  the  next  generation  through  the  world’s  best
educational system, and continuing to lead the world in the discovery of new knowl-
edge  by  aggressively  funding  research  and  development  in  all  areas  of  science  and
technology.

In the remainder of my testimony I am going to draw extensively (and borrow out-
right)  from  the  Council  on  Competitiveness  National  Innovation  Initiative  Report,
Innovate  America:  Thriving  in  a  World  of  Challenge  and  Change,  which  is  one  of
the  most  succinct  and  prescriptive  analyses  I  have  seen  of  the  challenges  we  face
and  the  actions  that  we  can  take  to  ensure  our  future  technological  leadership  and
economic prosperity.

Talent  is  our  nation’s  most  important  innovation  asset,  and  so  it  is  vital  that  we
build  the  base  of  scientists  and  engineers  working  in  this  country  at  the  frontiers
of  new  discovery.  Innovation  capacity  in  a  modern  technological  society  depends  al-
most  entirely  on  a  broad  class  of  scientists  and  engineers  who  can  imagine,  and
then  implement,  bold  new  ideas.  But  unless  the  United  States  takes  action  swiftly,
the  demand  for  science  and  engineering  talent  will  soon  outstrip  supply.  The  num-
ber of jobs requiring technical training is growing at five times the rate of other oc-
cupations,  yet  the  average  age  of  our  science  and  engineering  workforce  is  rising,
the number of new entrants into fields other than the biological and social sciences
is static or falling, and the all-important perception of these jobs as being remunera-
tive, important and exciting career options is declining.

Many  of  America’s  working  scientists  and  engineers  are  products  of  the  National
Defense  Education  Act  (NDEA)  of  1958,  passed  in  the  wake  of  Sputnik.  The  NDEA
sparked  a  half-century  of  remarkable  innovation  and  wealth  creation—and  it  may
help  explain  why  approximately  60  percent  of  the  CEOs  of  the  Fortune  100  have
science or engineering degrees. In the knowledge economy, the ability to understand
technology,  and  anticipate  the  technological  foundations  of  growth,  is  becoming  in-
creasingly critical to every career path.

The trouble is, enrollments are moving in precisely the wrong direction. A quarter
of  the  current  science  and  engineering  workforce  in  America  is  more  than  50  years
old,  and  many  will  retire  by  the  end  of  this  decade.  New  entrants  into  science  and
engineering fields are not replacing these retirees in sufficient numbers.

It is clear that the science and engineering problem begins early in the K–12 edu-
cational pipeline. We are losing our future scientists and engineers around the jun-
ior  high  school  level.  In  the  4th  grade,  U.S.  students  score  above  the  international
average  in  math  and  near  first  in  science.  At  8th  grade,  they  score  below  average
in  math,  and  only  slightly  above  average  in  science.  By  12th  grade,  U.S.  students
are  near  the  bottom  of  a  49-country  survey  in  both  math  and  science,  outscoring
only  Cyprus  and  South  Africa.  Less  than  15  percent  of  U.S.  students  have  the  pre-
requisites  even  to  pursue  scientific  or  technical  degrees  in  college.  And  most  have
little  interest  in  pursuing  scientific  fields.  Only  5.5  percent  of  the  1.1  million  high
school  seniors  who  took  college  entrance  exams  in  2002  planned  to  pursue  an  engi-
neering degree.

This  brings  me  to  the  first  of  two  urgent  priorities  facing  our  nation  at  the  start
of the 21st century: We need access to the best tech talent in the world. And to assure
that  access,  we  must  take  immediate  and  deliberate  steps  to  expand  the  pool  of
technical talent available in the U.S. This priority has two components.

First,  we  must  nurture,  encourage,  and  greatly  expand  our  home  grown  pool  of
talent.  The  science  and  engineering  pilot  program  offered  by  Mr.  Gordon  of  Ten-
nessee is an imaginative and innovative approach to this problem that would estab-
lish a regional pilot program to improve scientific and technological skills of elemen-
tary and secondary school teachers, and to encourage those teachers to directly par-
ticipate  in  ongoing  research  projects  at  national  laboratories  and  research  univer-
sities.  I  applaud  this  effort  to  bring  the  excitement  and  challenge  of  scientific  re-
search into our elementary and high school classrooms, to help stimulate a new gen-
eration of future scientists and engineers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

At  the  undergraduate  level,  financial  incentives  matter  a  great  deal,  especially
given  escalating  tuition  costs.  The  Tech  Talent  Bill,  passed  in  2002  by  the  House
and  largely  incorporated  into  the  2002  National  Science  Foundation  Authorization
Act, addressed this issue by creating a class of incentives for universities to increase
the fraction of students receiving undergraduate degrees in science and engineering.
However, these NSF-directed programs have not been funded as authorized, so their
potential impact remains unrealized.

The  availability  of  scholarship  money  is  a  critical  factor  in  the  choice  of  majors.
Recognizing this, the National Innovation Initiative proposes the creation of an ‘‘In-
vesting  for  the  Future  Fund’’  which  would  be  a  national  Science  and  Engineering
scholarship  fund  created  from  private  sector  donations.  The  fund  would  create  tax
incentives  for  corporate  and  individual  donors  who  support  the  next  generation  of
innovators. The goal would be to provide a scholarship to any qualified student ma-
joring in math or science at a four-year college who has an economic need and who
maintains a high level of academic achievement.

Finally, in terms of home grown talent, it is increasingly important that we reach
out to under served and under-represented students. By 2020, more than 40 percent
of  college-age  students  will  be  of  African,  Hispanic,  Asian,  or  other  non-European
descent.  Currently,  African  Americans,  Hispanics,  and  other  ethnic  and  racial  mi-
norities account for only six percent of the science and engineering workforce—a fig-
ure  far  below  their  demographic  presence.  Women,  who  make  up  nearly  half  the
total workforce, represent only a quarter of the science and engineering professions.
If  America  is  to  strengthen  its  base  of  science  and  engineering  talent,  it  must  per-
force rely on these, the fastest-growing segments of the workforce, to provide signifi-
cant numbers of new scientists and engineers.

The  second  component  of  this  need  to  access  the  world’s  best  tech  talent  for  our
science  and  technology  industries  concerns  foreign-born  students  studying  in  the
United States. Two weeks ago I was in Singapore, meeting with the Nation’s senior
economic development leader. In the course of our conversation we touched upon the
role of foreign-born students in Singapore’s universities and I was amazed when this
senior  official  walked  over  to  a  blackboard  and  without  notes  wrote  out  a  detailed
summary  of  the  numbers  and  nationalities  of  foreign-born  students  in  his  country.
Singapore  actively  recruits  the  best  and  brightest  students  from  many  countries  to
attend its world-class universities. In exchange, they require the students to remain
and  work  in  Singapore  for  a  specified  number  of  years,  and  encourage  these  high-
tech workers to stay permanently and contribute to Singapore’s high-tech future.

It  is  important  to  recognize  that,  like  Singapore,  we  are  in  a  global  competition
for  high-tech  talent.  Until  only  recently,  there  was  very  little  competition.  America
didn’t  need  a  global  recruitment  strategy,  because  America  didn’t  have  to  compete
for  the  world’s  best  and  brightest  talent.  If  you  wanted  to  play  in  the  game,  you
had  to  come  to  America.  But  today,  this  is  no  longer  the  case.  Tens  of  thousands
of  bright  students  who  used  to  come  to  America  to  study  science  and  engineering
now  have  many  other  options.  In  the  case  of  China,  in  particular,  the  Chinese  gov-
ernment  has  been  investing  heavily  in  their  research  infrastructure  within  their
universities, making it much more attractive for Chinese nationals to stay home and
study.

At  Johns  Hopkins,  for  instance,  the  number  of  graduate  students  enrolled  from
China has declined from 328 in 2001 to 178 in 2004. Meanwhile, the number of for-
eign  undergraduate  students  of  all  nationalities  has  dropped  from  381  in  2001  to
257 in 2004.

Consider for a moment how critically important foreign nationals are to our high-
tech industries. Foreign students account for nearly half of all graduate enrollments
in  engineering  and  computer  science  at  American  universities.  Foreign  scientists
comprise  more  than  35  percent  of  engineering  and  computer  science  university  fac-
ulties, and nearly a third of our entire science and engineering workforce.

There  are  indications,  however,  that  post  9/11  American  visa  policies  are  revers-
ing decades of openness to foreign scientific excellence. Delays and difficulties in ob-
taining visas to the United States are contributing to a declining in-flow of scientific
talent. Meanwhile, competitor countries are quite naturally taking advantage of our
increasingly  cumbersome  visa  process  to  lure  top  talent  away.  And  with  the
strengthening  of  foreign  science,  there  are  many  attractive  scientific  opportunities
abroad to substitute for U.S. conferences, degrees and visiting scholar positions. The
number  of  foreign  students  on  American  campuses  declined  in  2003–2004  by  2.4
percent,  the  first  drop  in  foreign  enrollments  since  the  1971–1972  academic  year.
This  appears  to  be  a  trend.  A  survey  of  major  graduate  institutions  conducted  by
the Council of Graduate Schools found a six percent decline in new foreign graduate
enrollments in 2004, the third year in a row with a substantial drop. As one official

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

of  the  International  Association  of  Educators  remarked:  ‘‘The  word  is  out  on  the
street in China: You can’t get a visa to study in the United States.’’

In the past two decades American retailers have pursued a policy of importing the
best  high-quality  products  from  China  and  other  countries  to  the  benefit  of  Amer-
ican  consumers.  There  is  something  to  be  learned  in  this  model.  We  should  have
an explicit national focus on importing the brightest students from China and from
countries  around  the  world,  and  keeping  them  here  afterwards  as  part  of  our  high
tech workforce. Make sure it’s easy for the best and brightest to come here, to stay
here, and then to find legal residency to work here when their studies are complete.
It is worth remembering that there is not a university in America that charges tui-
tion  at  the  full  cost  of  educating  its  students.  Even  students  paying  full  fare  are
heavily  subsidized  by  endowments  from  grateful  alumni,  and  from  subsidies  in
many different forms from the State and Federal governments. It is only fair in re-
turn  to  ask  foreign  national  students  to  repay  these  generous  supplements  by  ask-
ing them to remain and work here in the United States for a set period of time and
contribute to our national economy.

This  brings  me  to  the  second  of  the  two  urgent  priorities  before  us.  We  should
greatly increase both government and private funding in research, with a particular
emphasis on ‘‘far out’’ frontier research that has the potential of creating new indus-
tries and transforming how we work and live. It’s just like Dale Earnhardt Jr. would
tell you—when the race gets tough, step on the gas.

Let  me  be  explicit.  I  believe  we  need  to  fulfill  our  commitment  to  double  the  Na-
tional  Science  Foundation  budget  to  approximately  $10  billion  by  FY  2007,  as  was
previously  passed  by  the  House.  We  must  significantly  increase  our  basic  research
efforts  in  the  physical  sciences,  in  mathematics,  and  in  the  information  sciences.
And  we  should  do  this  without  robbing  Peter  to  pay  Paul  by  reassigning  funds  al-
ready designated for the life sciences through the National Institutes of Health and
other agencies.

The  doubling  of  the  NIH  budget  has  been  a  tremendous  boon  to  biomedical  re-
search,  and  tremendous  benefits  will  be  seen  in  our  lifetimes.  We  should  not  allow
America’s real and substantial lead in these fields begin to erode by slowly whittling
away  at  these  gains.  In  order  to  assure  our  continuing  leadership  we  need  to  con-
tinue  to  increase  our  medical  research  expenditures  at  the  rate  of  biomedical  infla-
tion,  currently  about  3.5  percent  a  year.  Anything  less  than  that  is,  effectively,  a
cut.

At the same time, we need to find ways to encourage private industry to be more
accepting of risks in the form of transformative business practices and technologies,
while removing all incentives to engage in the short-term, bottom line thinking that
has unfortunately become a hallmark of too many American corporations.

In  an  innovation  economy,  intellectual  capital  is  the  engine  that  drives  economic
growth  and  prosperity.  Investment  risks  and  rewards  are  increasingly  built  around
ideas. It is for this reason in particular that we need to revitalize frontier and multi-
disciplinary  research,  the  two  areas  that  are  most  likely  to  bring  about  important
new scientific discoveries and technological innovations.

Investment in frontier research has always been the bedrock of American innova-
tion.  Many  of  the  country’s  most  innovative  industries  were  built  on  decades  of  re-
search that had no discernible applications. The highly theoretical world of quantum
mechanics  spawned  the  semiconductor  industry  and  the  IT  revolution.  Department
of Defense research engineers working on file-sharing techniques invented the Inter-
net.  Scientists  researching  atomic  motion  helped  create  global  positioning  devices.
But  serious  flaws  have  begun  to  appear  in  our  current  efforts  to  support  American
research.

Perhaps  most  worrisome  is  the  gradual  shift  that  has  been  occurring  away  from
bold, transformational discovery to incremental advances and improvements in cur-
rent technology. For more than 50 years the United States has been at the frontiers
of  discovery,  creativity  and  research  breakthroughs.  This  kind  of  research  has  al-
ways  been  a  governmental  function,  owing  to  the  long  time-frames,  inherent  risks
and  the  difficulty  of  capturing  returns  on  investment.  But  publicly  funded  research
has been steadily moving away from the frontiers of knowledge, heading instead in
the direction of application and development. The federal research commitment has
grown  conservative—increasingly  driven  by  precedent,  consensus,  and  incremental
thinking. This is especially true at the Defense Advanced Research Projects Admin-
istration, or DARPA, which during the Cold War contributed research that brought
about  or  significantly  advanced  microelectronics,  weather  and  communications  sat-
ellites, global positioning systems, passenger jets, supercomputing, the Internet, ro-
botics,  sensor  technologies,  composite  materials  and  magnetic  resonance  imaging,
among other advances.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

To  this  end,  the  National  Innovation  Initiative  supports  the  goal  set  in  the  2001
Quadrennial  Defense  Review  and  by  the  Defense  Science  Board  that  at  least  three
percent  of  the  total  Department  of  Defense  budget  by  allocated  for  defense  science
and  technology.  Within  this  amount,  the  Department  of  Defense’s  historic  commit-
ment to fundamental knowledge creation should be restored by directing at least 20
percent  of  the  total  Department  of  Defense  science  and  technology  budget  to  long-
term,  basic  research  performed  at  the  Nation’s  universities  and  national  labora-
tories.

In  the  21st  century,  scientific  advancement  has  blurred  the  lines  between  sci-
entific  disciplines,  so  that  advancement  in  one  area  is  furthered  by  development  in
others.  For  example,  future  products  in  life  sciences  are  very  likely  to  result  from
a  combination  of  modern  biology,  nanotechnology,  information  sciences  and  the
physical sciences and engineering. Over the past half century the United States has
invested considerable sums in life sciences research and development, with remark-
able  results.  But  the  rate  of  increase  in  R&D  in  other  sciences  has  not  been  as  ro-
bust. Although federal funding for the life sciences has increased four-fold since the
1980s, growth in the physical sciences, engineering and mathematics has been stag-
nant.

It  is  important  we  increase  research  and  development  investment  across  dis-
ciplines,  because  scientific  advancement  today  is  interdependent  and  collaborative.
Research  and  development  funding  should  not  be  a  zero-sum  game  that  simply
shifts  investment  from  one  area  to  another  as  public  fashion  dictates.  Rather,  we
need  a  comprehensive  philosophy  that  brings  investment  in  other  disciplines  up  to
the level at which the life sciences have thrived.

Federal spending on scientific and technological research is profoundly important.
It  is  the  bedrock  upon  which  the  structure  of  American  innovation  rests.  But  it  is
not  the  only  component  of  our  past  and  future  achievements.  Private  industry  too
has  a  crucial  role  to  play,  and  perhaps  at  no  other  time  has  the  need  for  American
business  leadership  and  vision  been  more  acute.  But  here  too  there  are  trends  at
work that should concern us deeply.

Norm Augustine, now retired CEO of defense giant Lockheed Martin, told me that
when  he  was  the  CEO  of  Martin  Marietta,  the  precursor  to  Lockheed  Martin,  he
one day called in the analysts to announce a series of investments in research that
he  felt  would  propel  the  company  way  ahead  of  its  competition.  Much  to  his  sur-
prise, as soon as he had finished his presentation, the analysts ran out of the room,
sold  the  stock  and  the  price  plummeted—and  continued  to  drop  over  the  next  18
months.  Puzzled  about  the  negative  reaction  to  this  news,  Norm  asked  one  of  the
mutual  fund  analysts  why  the  stock  had  dropped.  He  was  told:  ‘‘Everyone  knows
it  takes  eight  to  10  years  for  research  to  pay  off.  But  our  shareholders  only  hold
stock less than one year. Our fund doesn’t invest in companies like yours that have
this kind of management.’’

The  drum  beat  of  quarterly  results  are  driving  business  decisions  and  drowning
out  long-term  management,  investment  and  innovation  strategies.  Today,  investor
patience  is  in  short  supply,  and  the  traditional  ‘‘buy  and  hold’’  approach  to  equity
investments is being abandoned by the professionals. U.S. mutual funds are holding
stocks  for  an  average  of  just  ten  months,  a  record  low,  and  annual  turnover  rates
are  118  percent,  a  record  high.  As  Norm  Augustine  discovered,  these  short  invest-
ment horizons pressure CEOs to focus on near-term results. Not long ago, a survey
of  chief  executives  by  Burson  Marstellar  found  that  their  number  one  business  pri-
ority was shareholder return. The category ‘‘Most Innovative’’ ranked eighth on the
CEO’s  list,  and  was  a  priority  for  only  23  percent  of  the  respondents.  Another  sur-
vey of financial executives found that fully 78 percent would give up long-term value
creation  in  the  company  in  exchange  for  smooth  earnings.  More  than  half—55  per-
cent—said they would avoid long-term investments that might result in falling short
of the current quarterly targets.

Admittedly,  it  will  be  difficult  to  change  Wall  Street’s  attitudes  and  habits.  But
it  is  terribly  important  to  this  country  that  we  begin  to  try  to  do  so.  We  can  use
the tax code to reward the behavior of companies that make significant research in-
vestments and take significant risks, just as we can find disincentives to short-term,
bottom-line-only  thinking.  In  doing  so,  we  will  make  holding  stock  of  innovative
companies  over  the  long-term  a  more  desirable  investment,  and  our  national  econ-
omy more competitive.
Conclusion

The  legacy  America  bequeaths  to  its  children  will  depend  on  the  creativity  and
commitment of our nation to build a new era of prosperity at home and abroad. The
generation  of  new  knowledge  through  research,  and  the  transmission  of  existing
knowledge  in  a  world-leading  educational  system  are  the  two  essential  elements  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

a productive and innovative society. Since World War II America has led the world
in  science  and  technology  innovations  largely  because  it  was  willing  to  make  the
considerable investments in both its educational systems and its research and devel-
opment  infrastructure  that  have  enabled  the  natural  creative  genius  of  the  Amer-
ican people (and visitors to our shores from all over the world) to flourish. If imita-
tion is the sincerest form of flattery, we should be very, very flattered that so many
other  nations  seek  to  emulate  the  methods  of  our  success.  But  we  also  must  be
aware that today, as in no other time in our recent past, we are challenged by other
nations equally determined to succeed. As Americans, we wish them ever success—
except the kind that would come at our own expense. The race belongs to the swift-
est. We must keep running. Thank you for giving me this opportunity to appear be-
fore you.

BIOGRAPHY FOR WILLIAM R. BRODY

William R. Brody became the 13th President of The Johns Hopkins University on
September  1,  1996.  Immediately  prior  to  assuming  the  position,  Dr.  Brody  was  the
Provost  of  the  Academic  Health  Center  at  the  University  of  Minnesota.  From  1987
to 1994, he was the Martin Donner Professor and Director of the Department of Ra-
diology,  Professor  of  Electrical  and  Computer  Engineering,  and  Professor  of  Bio-
medical  Engineering  at  Johns  Hopkins,  and  Radiologist-in-Chief  of  The  Johns  Hop-
kins Hospital.

A  native  of  Stockton,  California,  Dr.  Brody  received  his  B.S.  and  M.S.  degrees  in
electrical engineering from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, and his M.D.
and  Ph.D.,  also  in  electrical  engineering,  from  Stanford  University.  Following  post-
graduate training in cardiovascular surgery and radiology at Stanford, the National
Institutes of Health and the University of California, San Francisco, Dr. Brody was
professor of radiology and electrical engineering at Stanford University (1977–1986).
He  has  been  a  co-founder  of  three  medical  device  companies,  and  served  as  the
President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  Resonex,  Inc.  from  1984  to  1987.  He  has
over  100  publications  and  one  U.S.  patent  in  the  field  of  medical  imaging  and  has
made contributions in medical acoustics, computed tomography, digital radiography
and magnetic resonance imaging.

Dr.  Brody  serves  as  a  trustee  of  The  Commonwealth  Fund  and  of  the  Baltimore
Community Foundation, and sits on the governing committee of the Whitaker Foun-
dation.  He  serves  on  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  following  public  companies:
Medtronic  Inc.  and  Mercantile  Bankshares.  He  is  a  member  of  the  executive  com-
mittee  of  the  Council  on  Competitiveness;  the  International  Academic  Advisory
Committee, Singapore; and the selection committee of the Goldseker Foundation. He
formerly  served  on  the  President’s  Foreign  Intelligence  Advisory  Board,  on  the
Board of the Minnesota Orchestra Association, and on the Corporation of the Massa-
chusetts Institute of Technology. Dr. Brody is a member of the Institute of Medicine,
and  a  fellow  of  the  Institute  of  Electrical  and  Electronic  Engineers,  the  American
College of Radiology, the American College of Cardiology, the American Heart Asso-
ciation, the International Society of Magnetic Resonance in Medicine, the American
Institute  of  Biomedical  Engineering,  and  the  American  Academy  of  Arts  and
Sciences.

Dr.  Brody  and  his  wife,  Wendy,  have  two  grown  children  and  reside  at  Nichols

House on the Johns Hopkins Homewood campus.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

DISCUSSION

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  I  liked  the  statement  in  your  testimony

when you refer to a great American, Dale Earnhardt, Jr.

Dr. BRODY. Yeah.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.—and  you  say  his  quote,  ‘‘When  the  race

gets tough, you step on the gas.’’

Dr. BRODY. Yes.
Chairman BOEHLERT. So, we have got to step on the gas. Speak-
ing  about  stepping  on  the  gas,  a  guy  that  has  already  got  his  foot
on  the  pedal,  we  are  pleased  to  invite  him,  and  to  participate  in
today’s  deliberations,  our  distinguished  colleague,  Mr.  Culberson,
from  Texas,  who  is  a  member  of  the  Appropriations  Committee,
and I want more people to have the same insight that he has, who
are appropriators.

Mr.  Culberson,  I  ask  unanimous  consent  that  you  be  permitted
to  participate  in  today’s  proceedings,  and  welcome.  And  thank  you
for  your  interest.  You  are  sitting,  on  your  right,  next  to  two  very
distinguished scientists in their own right, Dr. Ehlers, Vern Ehlers,
and Dr. Bartlett, Roscoe Bartlett, two very distinguished scientists.
Let  me  tell  you  something.  Once  again,  it  is  music  to  our  ears
what  you  are  telling  us.  Our  challenge  is  how  do  we  get  the  other
Members of Congress to focus more on this, and how do we get peo-
ple  to  say  you  know,  that  is  right.  We  should  invest  more  in  the
National  Science  Foundation,  and  you  know,  it  is  just—they  have
more  money  in  the  coffee  fund  over  at  the  Pentagon  across  the
river——

Dr. BRODY. Yeah.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.—than  we  have  in  the  annual  budget  for

the National Science Foundation, and it is——

Dr. BRODY. Yeah.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.—so  vitally  important,  not  just  to  our
present,  to  our  future.  And  you  are  so  right  when  you  mention
DARPA, and we have had Tony Tether over here before us, and say
hey,  look,  you  are  getting  too  short-term  in  your  thinking.  You
have  got  to  think  about  the  immediate  problems,  but  you  can’t
abandon the long range thinking.

But  one  of  the  things  I  say  to  all  the  captains  of  industry,  when
they  come  before  us,  you  have  got  to  step  up  the  lobbying  effort.
When  a  budget  comes  out,  I  don’t  care  if  it  is  this  Administration
or the previous Administration, and you see the figures for the Na-
tional  Science  Foundation  or  the  Office  of  Science  in  the  Depart-
ment  of  Energy,  or  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Tech-
nology,  and  you  shake  your  head  and  say,  gee,  that  is  not  ade-
quate,  but  your  lobbyists  don’t  come  up  and  beat  on  the  doors  of
all the Congresspeople, and say that is not adequate, and for Cisco
and  for  IBM,  you  have  got  to  invest  more,  and  that  is  a  message
from  IBM  and  Cisco,  you  have  got  to  invest  more  in  this,  because
your  lobbyists  come  up,  and  talk  to  us  about  the  most  current
tweaking  of  trade  policy,  or  the  necessity  for  adjusting  tax  policy
to encourage innovation, and there is nothing wrong with that, but
they  never  get  to  the  rest  of  the  story,  and  the  rest  of  the  story
deals  with  adequate  funding  for  science  on  the  part  of  the  Federal
Government.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

And we wouldn’t have the Internet today if it weren’t for DARPA
and  NSF,  and  the  Internet  has  changed  the  world.  And  so  people
who  say,  but  too  many  people  expect  from  us,  you  know,  when  we
invest  in  research,  they  expect  guaranteed  results.  You  don’t  have
guaranteed results with research. You are going to have more fail-
ures  than  successes,  and  you  hope  and  pray  that  you  get  one  out
of a hundred ideas that you can follow through to a logical conclu-
sion.  But  if  we  don’t  do  a  better  job  of  building  the  foundation  to
the  structure,  and  Mr.  Morgridge,  you  are  so  right,  and  I  praise
Cisco for what you are doing with the academies and the thousands
of people you are introducing to the new technology. But if we don’t
do  a  better  job  of  K–12  science  and  math  education,  that  is  a  na-
tional  security  issue.  That  is  not  just  a  bunch  of  people  who  agree
that we all want better education for our kids and grandkids. It is
a national security issue, and we are failing.

In  international  comparisons,  with  youngsters  around  the  world,
our  kids  in  K–12  don’t  measure  up.  By  the  fourth  grade,  they  are
about  on  par.  By  the  eighth  grade,  they  are  slightly  behind,  and
by  the  twelfth  grade,  they  are  way  behind.  Boy,  that  doesn’t  guar-
antee  us  anything  in  the  future  but  more  agita.  You  know,  I  get
all  exercised  about  this,  but  I  just  hope  that  other  companies  in
corporate  America  will  follow  the  lead  of  your  two  great  institu-
tions, and I am not just, you know, currying favor with you because
you are here. But I know the IBM record. I know the Cisco record.
But I would like every company to replicate that.

I have got a company in my district, a small company, called Dol-
phin Technology. They have got 100 employees. You know what the
president  of  that  company,  a  guy  named  Mike  Miravalle,  who  I
wish  I  could  clone.  I  don’t  believe  in  human  cloning,  but  I  wish  I
could  clone  this  guy.  If  I—he  takes  promising  high  school  sopho-
mores  and  juniors.  He  goes  to  the  schools  and  gets  the  rec-
ommendation  of  their  teachers,  and  then  he  employs  them  in  the
summer  at  his  company,  pays  them  10  bucks  an  hour.  Can  you
imagine  a  15-year-old  kid  getting  10  bucks  an  hour?  And  assigns
them  to  a  mentor,  and  the  mentor  works  with  that  kid,  and  they
are only there for 10 or 12 weeks, and they get a few bucks in their
pocket.  They  get  some  discipline  in  the  job  market,  and  they  get
excited about the promise of their future, and he called me up one
day this spring, and he was so proud. One of the kids that partici-
pated  in  this  mentoring  program  was  from  the  inner  city.  He  hap-
pened  to  be  a  star  athlete,  a  great  quarterback,  and  he  called  me
up,  and  he  said  hey,  remember  the  kid  I  told  you  about?  He  just
got a full scholarship, full scholarship, to a very distinguished uni-
versity.  Guess  what?  It  was  an  academic  scholarship,  not  a  sports
scholarship.  He  had  a  lot  of  offers,  so  when  I  speak  to  the  NAM
or the Chamber of Commerce, and all the businesspeople start com-
plaining to me, you know, these high school graduates, we have to
retrain them. We can’t even employ them right away. We have got
to retrain them. I listen to them. I say quit moaning and groaning
and start doing something about it. Go back and survey your com-
pany, and then come back and report to me, how many of your em-
ployees have run for school board. Everybody says education should
operate  like  a  business.  How  many  businesspeople  do  we  have  on
boards  of  education?  Oh,  I  can’t  get  involved.  I  am  too  busy  in  my

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

business. You better damn well get involved, because there is a lot
at stake.

So,  excuse  this  monologue,  but  in  the  form  of  thanking  for  you
for  what  you  are  doing,  it  reminds  me  of  my  parish  priest.  Once
a  year,  I  am  convinced  from  on  high  the  bishop  sends  down  an
order,  and  he  says  I  want  you  to  give  your  homily  this  week  on  a
sense  of  reverence  and  church  attendance,  and  boy,  he  is  good  at
it.  And  he  gets  wound  up,  and  about  halfway  through,  I  feel  like
saying time out, but Father, we are here. So, you are here, and just
thank you so much for what you are doing. And I want, and I know
I can expect a renewed commitment for you to continue that.

I  have  got  some  very  specific  questions,  but  the  red  light  is  on
for  me,  so  I  will  go  to  Mr.  Costello,  and  I  will  be  at  the  end.  Mr.
Costello.

Mr. COSTELLO. Mr. Chairman, thank you, and I would like to as-
sociate  myself  with  your  remarks  concerning  the  innovations  that
both  IBM  and  Cisco  have  made,  and  contributions  that  they  have
made  not  only  to  the  economy  here  in  the  United  States,  but  the
global economy as well. Also with your remarks to encourage those
who  are  here  today  and  others  in  the  private  sector  to  become  en-
gaged and do a better job of lobbying on behalf of research and de-
velopment,  and  lobbying  both  the  White  House  and  the  Congress.
We  need  your  help.  You  are  kind  of  singing  to  the  choir  here.  We
are all in this together, and we understand the importance of R&D
and investment, unfortunately, as the Chairman pointed out, there
are others, other challenges, and because of budget deficits, but we
need  you  to  help  us  convince  our  colleagues,  and  those  in  the  Ad-
ministration that we need to make those investments.

I  think  we  can  all  agree,  as  the  Chairman  pointed  out,  and  I
think the three of you pointed out, the importance of education, in
particular K–12 in math and science. I think we can all agree that
we  have  a  responsibility,  and  that  we  should  aggressively  be  in-
vesting more in research and development.

My concern, frankly, and the reason that we held the roundtable
discussion, and the reason that I have brought up the issue several
times  in  various  hearings  of  this  committee,  is  the  issue  of
outsourcing.  I  think,  Dr.  Brody,  in  particular,  in  your  testimony,
you  point  out  the  discrepancy  between  the  percentage  of  U.S.  col-
lege graduates obtaining degrees in science and engineering, and in
comparison  to  the  world  average,  and  especially,  relative  to  the
percentages  in  Korea  and  China.  And  you  point  out  that  the  qual-
ity  of  the  graduates,  essentially  is  equivalent  to  us  here  in  the
United States in U.S. institutions. In fact, many of our institutions
are  affiliating  with  educational  institutions  in  China,  Asia,  and
other parts of the world. You point out that high speed communica-
tions  now  link  us  together,  where  you  are  based  is  really  not  an
issue  any  longer,  and  as  a  result,  many  of  the  U.S.  companies  are
outsourcing, and we are competing with low wages.

So, I guess my question to you is, in particular, is the—if we sim-
ply just increase the number of U.S. science and engineering grad-
uates,  how  does  that  address  the  problem  of  outsourcing,  number
one.  Number  two,  what  do  we  tell  young  people  today  that  are  in
K–12,  that  we  need  more  engineers,  we  need  more  scientists,  but
the  prospects  of  you  entering  these  careers,  if  you  in  fact  become

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

graduates,  and  you  become  a  scientist  or  an  engineer,  that  the
wages  that  you  are  looking  at  today  have  not  increased  in  several
years  in  the  United  States,  and  number  two,  that  many  U.S.  com-
panies  are  now,  because  of  the  low  wages,  and  the  quality  of  edu-
cation,  as  you  point  out  in  your  testimony,  is  equivalent  to  U.S.
graduates. How does that all shake out?

Dr. BRODY. Congressman Costello, you ask a question that prob-
ably  exceeds  my  capability  to  answer  in  components.  I  would  like
just  to  address  one  issue.  One  critical  factor  that  nobody  seems  to
be  talking  about,  one  reason  that  the  United  States  needs  to  train
more  scientists  and  engineers,  is  we  have  a  large  number  of  jobs
in  the  defense  and  security  infrastructure  that  require  security
clearances.  And  for  example,  we  at  the  Applied  Physics  Lab,  it  is
in  Congressman  Bartlett’s  district,  2000  scientists  and  engineers.
They  need  clearance.  If  we  bring  students  from  other  parts  of  the
world  in,  it  is  very  hard  to  get  clearance.  And  we  have  a  large
number  on  that  workforce  that  is  going  to  be  retiring,  and  we  do
not have the people coming up to replace them. So, this is a critical
security  issue,  irrespective  of  anything  else  that  we  have  talked
about.  I  will  leave  the  outsourcing  question  to  my  colleagues.  I
think  they  are  more  expert.  But  I  suspect  that  one  of  the  things
that  is  happening  is  the  wages  may  come  down  a  little  bit  in  the
U.S.,  but  my  prediction  is  that  the  wages  for  scientists  and  engi-
neers  in  other  countries  are  going  to  rise  much  more  rapidly  and
equilibrate,  that  you  know,  there  are  still  only  a  number  of  really
exceedingly  bright  people,  and  they  are  going  to  command  a  pre-
mium in the workforce.

And  the  other  thing  that  we  need  to  do  that  we  haven’t  done,
and I think this is a university responsibility, is to sell why careers
in science and engineering are useful. A technical background, even
if  you  go  off  and  become  a  manager,  you  move  into  other  fields,  a
technical  background  is  really  important,  and  I  think  we  need  to
sell those careers, not just an issue of well, if I go to work for IBM
as  an  engineer,  I  am  going  to  make,  you  know,  less  than  if  I  go
to Wall Street and work for Goldman Sachs.

Mr. COSTELLO. Mr. Morgridge.
Mr. MORGRIDGE. Over the past year, Cisco has added about 3,000
positions.  Currently,  about  two-thirds  of  our  employees,  and  we
have  about  37,000,  38,000,  are  in  the  United  States.  The  positions
that we have added have been principally in engineering and sales,
and sales support. From an engineering standpoint, the vast major-
ity  of  those  jobs  are  here,  either  in  San  Jose,  California,  which  is
our headquarters, or in one of our three other campuses. The sales
jobs,  as  you  might  expect,  are  all  over  the  globe,  because  only  45
percent  of  our  total  revenue  is  generated  here  in  the  U.S.,  so  a
large  portion  of  our  business  is  outside  the  United  States,  and  the
technical support for that business, and the sales, of course, are lo-
cated in country.

So,  as  long  as  we  are  able  to  get  the  best  and  the  brightest,  our
real  preference  is  to  hire  at  these  campuses.  We  have  invested  a
lot of money in developing them. That is, the Internet is a powerful
collaboration tool, but it is not the same, it is not the same as being
geographically  and  physically  related.  There  is  magic  to  that  that
you don’t quite get in the Internet.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

Mr. COSTELLO. When you mention that as long as we can get the
best  and  the  brightest,  our  preference,  and  of  course,  we  under-
stand that, but you have a responsibility to stockholders, you have
a  responsibility  to  others,  as  far  as  from  a  competitiveness  stand-
point. And if you have an equivalent elsewhere, an engineer or sci-
entist  that  is  making  one  third  of  the  wages  of  someone  in  the
United  States  that  can  perform  the  job,  don’t  you  have  a  responsi-
bility to take a look at that, and isn’t that what is going on in man-
ufacturing  today  in  other  sectors,  because  there  is  an  equivalent,
where  the  only  call  is  money?  Many  of  the  jobs  are  being
outsourced.

Mr. MORGRIDGE. Well, it actually goes beyond money. You know,
it  is  yet  to  be  demonstrated  conclusively  that  creativity  is  going  to
be  as  transferable  geographically  as  some  would  think.  And  cer-
tainly,  our  experience  to  date  is  that  the  best  work,  the  most  cre-
ative  work,  is  to  get  the  best  and  the  brightest,  and  situate  them
in  our  environment  here  in  the  United  States,  and  certainly,  I  see
that continuing. The only exception to that rule is that all markets
don’t  develop  at  the  same  pace,  and  some  of  them  differentiate
themselves,  and  to  be  successful  in  those  markets,  you  have  to
have on the ground contact to understand, and I think we are see-
ing  some  of  that.  That  is  not  a  zero  sum  game.  That  is,  we  would
hope that there is actual considerable upside, and I would cite just
the  use  of  the  cell  phone  as  a  kind  of  a  broad  base  platform.  That
is  different  around  the  world.  And  it  is  important  to  be  in  those
countries where they have used it differently, and understand why
and how, so that we can develop those solutions.

Mr. COSTELLO. Briefly, Mr. Donofrio.
Mr. DONOFRIO. Thank you. Thank you, Congressman. It is a com-
plex  problem.  It  is  a  complex  situation.  I  will  try  to  simply  my
views on this, IBM’s views on this.

Everything is changing, and we are naı¨ve to think that it is not.
It  is  not  just  technology.  It  is  the  entire  business  environment.
Value  is  migrating.  That  is  the  fundamental  issue.  Value  that  cre-
ates  real  wealth.  Everything  will  flow  from  that.  For  us,  we  had
a near death experience in order to appreciate and understand that
value  had  migrated.  In  our  business,  there  are  systems,  there  is
software, and there is services. And they always existed, it is inter-
esting, for 100 years more or less that we have been around as the
wonderful  IBM  company,  but  what  customers  want,  what  clients
want, and what they are willing to pay you for changes. It changes
because  of  market  forces.  This  is  where  we  need  to  look.  This  is
where we need to start, as we have these discussions and these de-
bates,  about  what  innovation  is  like  in  the  21st  century.  What  is
the role of science, engineering, technology, and mathematics?

It  is  critically  important,  but  it  is  not  the  necessary  and  suffi-
cient condition. It is critically important that we build on the bona
fides that we have established here in the United States, and that
we continue to worry about why we are not producing more science,
scientists, technologists, engineers, and mathematicians. And what
is  wrong  with  the  K–12  education  system,  and  why  have  we  left
behind  an  incredible  percentage  of  the  population,  the  Hispanic
population. I mean, if you really want to worry, look at the number
of Hispanics in terms of how many of them are entering the STEM

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

disciplines.  They  are  the  fundamental  reason  this  country  is  grow-
ing. They will be 25 if not 30 percent of the population in the next
foreseeable future.

That  aside,  will  not  get  us  to  where  we  want  to  be,  a  leader  in
the  world  economy.  We  will  not  be  the  leader  by  sheer  numbers.
That is probably a preordained and destined fact in the next 10 or
15 years, but that does not mean that the United States of America
cannot  lead  the  world  from  an  economic  perspective.  It  needs  to
lead  it  from  an  innovation  perspective.  We  have  always  thought
better than anyone else in the world. We have always found value.
That  is  how  John  created  Cisco,  that  value.  All  of  the  examples
that Bill talked about. They are all innovative examples that found
real business value or societal value, based on technology.

This is the fundamental issue. We need to educate ourselves, and
we  need  to  make  this  a  national  platform.  We  need  to  find  a  way
to rally around this, not just government, but we need you leading
us  too.  Us,  the  academic  institutions,  labor,  this  is  the  only  way
that real leadership is going to be found on this topic.

So,  you  worry  about  the  whole  issue  of  outsourcing  and
globalization.  We  are  in  174  countries  around  the  world.  It  is  a
simple  thought  for  us.  The  right  task,  with  the  right  skills,  in  the
right  place.  That  is  what  determines  where  things  get  moved.  But
in the end, we have more employment in the United States for the
last  year,  for  the  year  before,  and  for  this  year,  than  we  have  had
before.

So,  our  employment  is  not  going  down.  It  is  the  kind  of  people
that  we  are  employing.  It  is  the  thought  process  that  we  are  em-
ploying.  It  is  this  whole  idea  of  services  that  we  keep  forgetting
about.  We  have  195,000,  195,000  engineers,  scientists,  tech-
nologists, and mathematicians in the IBM company, Congressman,
around  the  world.  Half  of  them  are  in  services.  Half  of  them  are
applying  all  of  that  incredible  educational  capability  at  this  whole
issue  of  what  is  the  business  issue,  what  is  the  societal  issue,  and
how do I put technology to work to solve that problem faster.

That is the key for our success.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  The  gentleman’s  time  has  expired.  Dr.

Bartlett.

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you, Doctor. I feel very comfortable at this
hearing, having spent 24 years in a former life teaching, five years
working  for  Johns  Hopkins  University  Applied  Physics  Lab  and
eight years working for IBM. Gentlemen, thank you very much.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Is that a commercial?
Mr. BARTLETT. Yeah, I have a longer view of life than most Mem-
bers of Congress, having been born in 1926. Mr. Donofrio, you men-
tioned  that  90—I  am  sorry,  that  75  percent  of  our  economy  was
service-based.  Now,  if  you  push  this  service-based  economy  to  an
absurdity, if all we do is cut each other’s hair and take in each oth-
er’s  laundry,  that  is  clearly  not  a  very  good  prescription  for  pros-
perity, is it? Do you think this may have something to do with the
fact that we had last year, about a $700 billion trade deficit?

Mr.  DONOFRIO.  Well,  Congressman,  that  is  part  of  the  problem,
is  we  actually  don’t  understand  what  the  metrics  are  that  should
lead  us  in  the  21st  century.  We  continue  to  apply,  in  all  due  re-
spect,  Industrial  Age  views  to  the  evolving  economies  of  the  21st

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

century.  Services,  for  instance,  that  category,  it  includes  all  of  the
things you just said, and it includes about 90,000 of our wonderful
engineers  and  scientists  from  around  the  world  working  in  our
services sector as well. We need a better understanding of what the
real value driver is in services, instead of just homogenizing every-
thing.

I would argue that yes, our services-based people and others, you
know, others in the industry, the communications industry and the
IT  industry,  they  are  generating  real  value.  They  are  generating
real  wealth.  They  are  generating  real  jobs,  but  most  importantly,
they are creating real business and societal value. We need to start
to understand, how do we educate people to do that? So, let us take
services  apart  into  its  various  categories  and  constituencies,  let  us
start  treating  at  least  services  in  information  technology  and  com-
munications  technology,  let  us  start  treating  it  with  a  different
thought process. Let us treat it as a science, as an engineering dis-
cipline.

You do remember, it wasn’t so long ago, you could not get a com-
puter  science  degree.  In  fact,  when  I  went  to  school,  41  years  ago,
when  I  graduated  from  school,  I  had  to  hide  away  in  the  EE  de-
partment,  take  as  many  computer  courses  as  I  could,  and  then
came  out  to  go  to  work  for  a  computer  company.  It  is  only  25  or
30 years that we have reformed our view of yeah, these computers
will  be  around  for  a  while.  They  are  not  going  to  go  away.  I  think
we  are  at  a  very  similar  tipping  point  on  this  whole  issue  of  serv-
ices.  It  is  a  science.  It  is  a  discipline.  It  may  be  where  the  real
value  is,  and  it  is  not  just  cutting  your  hair,  polishing  your  shoes,
and changing your oil.

Mr. BARTLETT. Mr. Donofrio, don’t you think that maybe this in-
formation  technology  is  to  the  world  of  economy,  manufacturing,
mining,  and  agriculture,  like  mathematics  is  to  science  and  engi-
neering?  If  all  you  trained  were  mathematicians,  and  they  never
applied their skills to manufacturing and science and so forth, you
know, I think we are kind of obsessed with moving these little elec-
trons around and storing them and coughing them up and doing it
faster and faster.

Mr. Morgridge, you mentioned that we needed to attract the best
and  the  brightest  from  around  the  world.  Don’t  you  think  this  is
a  cop-out,  because  we  aren’t  able  to  turn  out  good  graduates  from
our secondary schools?

Mr.  MORGRIDGE.  In  a  global,  competitive  world,  I  don’t  think  so.
Mr.  BARTLETT.  But  you  know,  if  we  are  going  to  do  this,  and  if
every  country  is  going  to  do  that,  you  know,  why  should  we  have
to  drain  brains  from  other  countries?  Don’t  you  think  we  have
enough  in  our  country,  if  we  shaped  up  our  secondary  education
system, so that we were turning out adequate numbers of prepared
young people to enter our graduate schools?

Mr.  MORGRIDGE.  I  think  that  is  an  awfully  broad  assumption,

but I still think that——

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Do  you  think  that  the  students  from  other  parts
of  the  world  are  inherently  brighter  than  ours,  that  we  have  to  go
there?

Mr. MORGRIDGE. No.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

Mr.  BARTLETT.  I  don’t  for  a  minute  think  that.  I  think  you  are
going  there  because  we  are  failing  at  K–12.  Mr.  Donofrio  men-
tioned  that  our  graduate  schools  were  the  envy  of  the  world.  But
they  are  having  some  pretty  darn  good  ones  other  places  in  the
world, and we are now having trouble attracting the brightest and
the  best  in  the  world.  But  that  is  only  a  very  recent  phenomenon.

Mr. MORGRIDGE. Right.
Mr.  BARTLETT.  And  I  just  don’t  think  we  need  to  go  outside  our
country, if we had adequate K–12 education. I think that is where
the  challenge  is.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  you  would  indulge  me  just  one
quick question to Dr. Brody.

Dr.  Brody,  I  think  that  our  intense  focus  on  this  information
technology  is  a  bit  like  gilding  the  lily.  It  is  already  pretty  darn
good,  thank  you.  And  I  wonder  if  we  shouldn’t  now  be  using  the
skills  that  we  have  developed  there  to  apply  to  some  real  world
challenges, like maybe energy.

Dr.  BRODY.  Well,  I  am  not  an  expert.  Clearly,  energy  is  going  to
be  the  looming  issue  for  all  of  us,  and  if  we  don’t  get  on  that,  as
a  critical  number  one  priority  for  our  country,  we  are  all  going  to
be reading with the lights out, and that is probably not a good way
to  read.  It  might  be  good  for  the  Hopkins  Ophthalmology  Clinic,
but otherwise—I will go back, just if I might, the other—we are in
a  global  competition  for  talent,  and  I  use  the  analogy  of  the  NBA.
You  know,  for  many  years,  the  NBA  had  only  American  players.
Now,  you  look  at  the  NBA  roster,  it  is  worldwide,  including  Yao
Ming from China. It is a global search for talent, and wherever the
best  and  brightest  are,  if  there  is  a  large  talent  pool,  you  know,
companies  and  universities  are  going  to  want  to  get  the  very  best
and brightest.

That does not forgive us for failing at K–12, which is failing, and
we  need  to  do  something  about  that,  as  a  major  priority  as  well.
Mr.  BARTLETT.  Thank  you  for  recognizing  that.  Thank  you,  Mr.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  The  gentleman’s  time  has  expired.  But
what I am hearing the panel say is that we don’t have to just serve
as  a  magnet  to  attract  the  brightest  minds  from  all  around  the
world. We have got to do both. We have got to produce them here,
but  we  have  got  to  attract  them  from  wherever  we  can  attract
them.  In  other  words,  we  need  a  good  mix.  That  is  the  greatness
of America.

Mr. Lipinski.
Mr.  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  can’t  really  top  Dr.
Bartlett  there,  or  we  also—with  his  background,  but  I  do  have  a
unique background, in that I am an engineer. I have a background
in engineering, and one of only 11 Members of the House and Sen-
ate,  I  am  told,  that  does.  But  then  again,  you  could  say  that  I  got
a couple degrees in engineering, then I went and got a Ph.D. in po-
litical science, so I am not sure what that says, and I am not sure.
I  was  sitting  here  thinking  about  how  do  we  encourage  people  to
go  in  for  these  higher  degrees  in  engineering,  and  I  think  well,
what happened to me. But I also, you know, share something with
Mr. Morgridge and Brody, that I have a degree from Stanford also.
So, I do have that going.

Chairman.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

I look at this from many different angles, as someone who taught
political science at a university, someone with an engineering back-
ground. But it really, to me, comes down to how do we do the best
job we can here in Washington, so that we can employ more Ameri-
cans?  And  that  is  where  I  am  coming  at  this  from,  and  I  realize
that  if  you  are  running  a  company,  though,  you  need  to  take  care
of  the  stockholders,  and—that  is  an  inherent  tension  there  that  I
think  we  don’t  deal  with,  we  don’t  talk  about  enough,  but  I  think
we  need  to  work  together  as  the  government,  companies,  to  help
try and employ more Americans. So, we talk about a lot of different
things  here,  and  I  sort  of  wonder,  I  know  they  are  all  important,
but  I  want  to  know,  what  do  you  think  is  most  important?  We  see
these  other  countries  producing  more  Ph.D.s  in  science  and  engi-
neering.  We  see  students  doing  better,  say,  at  eighth  grade  level,
or the eighth grade level here, students are doing better in science
and math in other countries.

We also talk about the problem with short-term, too much short-
term  emphasis  on  research  and  development.  What  is  most  impor-
tant?  Is  it  most  important  that  we  bring  all  our  students  up,  or  is
it  more  important  that  we  have  a  select  few  that  are  really  inter-
ested  in  going  for  advanced  degrees,  science,  engineering,  other
fields  where  we  can  innovate,  and  then,  that  will  create  the  jobs?
Or is it the focus of our companies in being too short-term, or hav-
ing  too  much  of  a  short-term  focus?  Well,  that  doesn’t  seem  to
make a difference there. Why are other countries doing better than
we are doing?

So,  what  is  the  one  step  each  of  you  would  say  that  we  should
take  here  in  Washington  to  help  have  a  brighter  future  to  employ
more Americans? Nice easy question, right?

Dr.  BRODY.  I  don’t  want  to  disagree  with  you,  but  I  don’t  think
there  is  one  step.  I  think  a  better  way  to  think  about  it  is  there
are  some  things  you  can  do  over  the  short-term  that  will  have  a
short-term  impact.  There  are  some  things  over  the  intermediate-
term, and there are longer-term things. The short-term, we can in-
crease  funding  for  basic  research  in  math  and  physical  sciences,
through  the  NSF  budget,  as  we  have  with  the  NIH.  Clearly,  I
think,  in  time,  DARPA,  hopefully,  will  get  back  to  their  original
longer focus mission.

I think K–12, our educational system, didn’t get into the state it
is in overnight, and it is not going to get out of the state it is over-
night.  So,  although  we  can  do  individual  things  to  help  individual
students, turning around the system has to be viewed as an impor-
tant priority, but one that will take probably many, many years to
turn around.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Do you think, is it in the system, or is it in society?
Dr.  BRODY.  It  is  both.  It  is  both.  Turn  on  the  television  and  see
what we value. That is part of it. But also, then, you—and the way
we  manifest  that  is  the  way  we  invest  in  our  local  school  boards.
It  is  about  nobody  taking  the  time  to  join  the  school  boards.  It  is,
it  is  society’s  values,  and  we  will  have  to  turn  that  around  over
time. But there are things that we can do. Incentives always work,
if you get the right incentives in there, if we could incent some stu-
dents  into  science  and  engineering  careers,  one  way  or  another,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

through  scholarships  and  the  like,  it  will  have  an  impact  over  the
short-term.

Mr.  LIPINSKI.  Well,  what  do  you  think  those  incentives,  good  in-

centives would be from the government?

Dr.  BRODY.  Well,  I  think  scholarships,  forgiving  loans,  for  exam-
ple, for students who go on to college and major in science and en-
gineering.  Loans  are  a  huge  burden  for  college  students,  and  that
would  be  a  big  incentive  for  students,  to  think  about  it.  The  fact
that you went on to get a Ph.D. in another field is not a bad thing.
I think these cross-disciplinary people who become leaders in what-
ever  field,  including  Congress,  who  have  the  broad  disciplines,  in-
cluding a scientific training or engineering, is a good thing. So, the
fact that we lose people is not bad, but getting more people trained.
You  go  to  other  countries  in  Asia,  and  most  of  the  senior  govern-
ment  officials  all  have  technical  training  at  their  undergraduate
level. Some of them then have Ph.D.s. Some of them go to business
school or law school. But it is amazing how many of the leaders of
those countries have engineering or science training.

Chairman BOEHLERT. The gentleman’s time has expired, and we
go  to  a  Ph.D.,  a  very  distinguished  one  in  his  own  right,  Dr.  Vern
Ehlers.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you  for  the
monologue  you  gave.  I  am  going  to  do  something,  and  not  just  be-
cause  you  did,  but  I  will  copy  you  in  one  respect.  That  is  quoting
a  racing  figure.  I  am  reminded  of  Mario  Andretti’s  comment  that
if  you  are  in  control,  you  are  going  too  slow.  That,  in  a  sense,  de-
scribes  the  creative  process  as  well.  I  believe  that  the  most  impor-
tant  phrase  in  science  is  not  ‘‘Eureka,  I  found  it,’’  but  ‘‘that  is
funny, I never saw that before. I wonder what is causing it?’’

The  creative  process  is  hard  to—for  us  to  control,  but  we  have
to plough the ground and provide the fertilizer for it to take place,
and  we  are  not  doing  that.  I  think—I  believe  this  is  the  most  im-
portant  hearing  on  the  Hill  this  week,  maybe  this  year.  And  that
may  seem  like  an  outrageous  statement,  in  view  of  the  lack  of  ex-
tensive  media  coverage  and  so  forth,  but  just  think  back  30,  35
years.  This  committee  was  talking  about  the  DARPANet,  and  look
what  happened.  What  happened,  what  came  out  of  that,  has  af-
fected  the  world  much  more  than  anything  that  happened  in  the
Defense  Committee  or  other  major  committees.  When  Alan  Green-
span  comes  and  testifies,  all  the  media  are  there.  What  we  are
talking  about  here  today  is  going  to  have  a  greater  effect  on  the
economy  of  this  nation  than  anything  that  the  Fed  decides  this
week,  and  we  have  to  get  that  word  out.  We  have  to  emphasize
how important it is for the future of this country that the ideas you
are  presenting  are  the  basis  for  our  next  30  to  40  years  of  success
as a nation. And that is our job, but it is also your job, as the chair-
man said. We have to get the scientific and engineering community
out  there  helping  us  and  lobbying.  We  have  to  improve  our  edu-
cational system.

Just  one  bright  spot  you  can  go  home  with.  Today,  I  am  on  the
Education  and  Workforce  Committee.  Right  now,  we  are  marking
up the Higher Education Bill, and Congressman McKeon and I are
offering  a  scholarship  amendment  to  offer  1,000  scholarships  each
year to the 1,000 brightest students we identify, to go forward and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

study in the sciences, engineering, mathematics, and so forth. And
the  problem  is  going  to  be  getting  funding  for  it.  I  think  we  will
get  it  passed.  I  suspect  the  House  will  pass  it,  and  you  can  help
us  get  the  Senate  to  pass  it,  but  then,  where  is  the  money  coming
from? And that is where you and your colleagues are going to have
to  lobby  every  year  to  get  sufficient  funds  to  keep  that  program
going.

Also, there is a cultural attitude that I am very concerned about,
a  cultural  attitude  that  says  women  are  no  good  at  science  and
math. It is unique to this nation. I believe we have to reverse that.
It is happening, but we have to work more diligently at that. I give
many  speeches  in  the  schools,  and  I  always  tell  the  students  in
high  schools.  I  said  when  you  get  out  of  this  place,  you  are  either
going  to  be  a  nerd  or  be  working  for  a  nerd,  and  the  choices  you
make now in high school are going to determine which. And I also
assure  them  that  I  am  a  nerd,  and  they  never  believe  it  until  I
show  them  my  plastic  pocket  protector.  That  is  my  badge  of  my
identity.

A few questions. First of all, Mr. Donofrio, I appreciate your com-
ments  about  intellectual  property  protection.  I  have  been  pushing
that  really  hard  with—especially  with  respect  to  China,  and  just
yesterday,  talked  to  both  our  trade  representative  and  our  Sec-
retary of Treasury on that issue, and encouraged them, once again,
to  pursue  it.  But  you  made  an  interesting  comment,  Mr.  Donofrio,
not  in  your  spoken  testimony,  but  in  your  written  testimony.  You
called  for  new  performance  metrics  to  measure  innovation.  I  think
that  is  very  important,  but  I  wonder  if  you  could  expand  on  that,
as  to  just  how  you  would  do  that.  We  are  planning,  by  the  way,
an  important  conference  in  October  on  innovation  and  creativity.  I
see Deborah Wince-Smith in the audience. She is part of the plan-
ning  group  as  well.  And  I  think  that  is  one  issue  we  have  to  work
on,  and  how  we  can  apply  this  to  manufacturing.  So,  I  am  inter-
ested in your detailed thoughts on that.

Mr. DONOFRIO. It would be good, by the way, I thank you for the
comments and for the question, maybe that conference that you are
going to hold in October, maybe we can do more on this whole issue
of the right performance metrics for innovation in the 21st century.
I  think  most  of  you  recognize  that  the  current  system  we  have,
the  current  view  we  have  of  innovation,  is  fundamentally  deter-
mined  by  the  Industrial  Revolution,  and  I  mean,  I  am  not  saying
there is anything wrong with that, but it is 20th, at best, 20th cen-
tury  thought.  We  are  in  a  21st  century  environment,  and  again,  I
will sound a little repetitive here, things are moving. Value is mov-
ing one more time. And if you are not watching value, you end up,
as we did, in an almost near death experience.

So, the way you look at innovation in the 21st century, and these
metrics  that  you  are  looking  for,  it  is  a  very  complex  set  of  issues.
You  can  measure  piece  parts.  You  can  measure  things  that  will
contribute, and we have described an environment, for instance, in
the NII report, that we think make sense, to support an innovative
economy  and  an  innovative  growth  opportunity  for  the  United
States of America. And look, we are all Americans here, so I mean,
we would like the United States of America to continue to succeed
and  lead,  but  to  your  point,  if  we  don’t,  someone  else  will.  You

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

know, it is a very interesting world that we live in, and by the way,
the United States isn’t the only country that doesn’t do so well with
women  in  STEM  disciplines.  Almost  every  other  country,  with  the
notable exception of China. China does incredibly well with women
in  the  STEM  disciplines.  Just  another  reason  to  worry  about
whether  or  not  we  can  continue  to  lead  here  if  we  leave  half  the
population behind, more or less.

So, to your point, specifically, we could do a better job of looking
at  how  research  and  development  is  funded.  The  reports  suggest
we should be doing a better job of more complete research and de-
velopment funding, not piece by piece, not a piece of a solution, but
the totality of a solution. President Brody has already indicated we
should  be  doing  a  better  job  of  funding  the  physical  sciences.  I
mean,  this  is  on  the  government  side.  Not  take  away  from  the  life
sciences,  but  I  mean,  have  you  seen  the  budgets  for  physical
sciences  over  the  last  25  years?  They  are  flatlined.  They  are
flatlined. I mean, we are, thank God, they are at least flat, but that
is not the way you get ahead in the physical sciences. We could do
a  lot  more  on  education.  We  agree  with  you,  curriculum  reform  at
the  higher  education  level,  as  well  as  a  more  concentrated  set  of
thoughts  on  K–12.  Outcomes  and  the  value  migration  is  a  very
complex  issue  that  we  do  need  to  find  a  set  of  metrics  to  work  on.
We  are  committed  to  do  that,  by  the  way,  with  the  National  Inno-
vation Initiative and the follow-on work. We would welcome the op-
portunity  to  either  participate  in  your  conference  in  October,  or
perhaps we should have another hearing on this very topic, because
I will tell you, no one else in the world has figured this out either.
So,  we  are  not—it  is  not  like  we  are  being  way  left  behind  here.
If  we  can  get  it  right,  if  we  can  find  the  measurements,  and  then
from  the  measurements,  we  can  therefore  find  the  right  things  to
incent,  to  get  the  right  behavior,  to  be  the  leader  in  innovation  in
the  21st  century.  It  is  in  front  of  us,  to  be  able  to  see,  to  under-
stand, and to grab.

I hope that helps you a bit.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you.  And  Mr.  Chairman,  if  I  may  have  just
15  seconds,  I  want  to  compliment  Mr.  Morgridge  on  his  statement
that creativity is not necessarily geographically transferable, and I
criticized  American  culture  vis  a´ vis  science  and  math  education,
but I will compliment American culture on the creativity that is in-
trinsic to the thinking of this nation, and that is one of our biggest
aces in the hole to overcome the advantage other countries have in
wages.

Thank you.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you, Dr. Ehlers. Mr. Carnahan.
Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I want to say, in
particular,  to  you  that  I  agree  with  you,  that  K–12  education  is  a
national  security  issue.  I  also  want  to  thank  the  panel,  and  also,
specifically,  mention  to  Mr.  Morgridge,  your  comment  about  edu-
cation  being  the  foundation  for  innovation,  absolutely  is  true.  I
agree wholeheartedly. The quandary that I think I see here is that
we  have  seen  education  policy,  at  the  Federal  Government  level,
and  then  many  states,  has  really  been  one  of  devolution  of  edu-
cation  funding.  At  the  Federal  Government  level,  we  have  seen,
you know, arguments over whether we can fully fund No Child Left

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

Behind.  Many  state  governments,  from  elementary  and  secondary
and higher education, they have been cutting those budgets, where
most  of  our  state  education  funding  comes  from.  In  particular,
higher  education.  We  have  seen  those  costs  passed  on  to  students
in  higher  tuition.  Students  are  racking  up  higher  debt  than  ever
before.

When I was in the state legislature and served on our Education
Appropriations  Committee,  the  one  thing  that  struck  me  is  we
didn’t have business leaders showing up at our hearings, and none
of  them  were  weighing  in  on  the  questions  of  how  important  the
funding of education was. That is why I am so heartened to see you
here  today  engaged  in  that  discussion.  We  have  also  seen,  at  the
local  level,  the  burden  land  on  these  local  school  boards  with  re-
gard to how to properly fund their schools.

We  can’t  pass  everything  down,  and  pass  everything  off  to  the
local school boards. I guess you can tell from the nature of my com-
ments  that  I  would  like  to  know  what  you  think  about  that—our
overall education policy in the country, and what you are doing, or
can  do,  to  really  weigh  in  on  that  debate  as  we  have  it  here,  and
as we have it at the state level. And—well, I would ask that of the
panel.

Mr. MORGRIDGE. Well, certainly in California, and particularly in
Silicon  Valley,  there  have  been  kind  of  continuous  efforts  focused
on primary and secondary education. Currently, TechNet, which is
a  collaboration  of  high  tech  companies  in  Silicon  Valley,  is  putting
forth  a  proposal  on  education,  primary  and  secondary  education,
and on post-secondary education. So, there is not only an increased
awareness,  but  also,  increased  activity,  in  terms  of  carrying  that
forward.

You know, one of the things we forget, we do have excellent ele-
mentary and secondary schools. I am very proud of the high school
that  I  went  to.  I  have  gone  back  and  visited  it  numerous  times.  I
would love to go back there and go to school. And I am sure in your
districts, there are outstanding primary and secondary schools. The
key is, we don’t have enough of them. And more critically, we have
a third of them that are almost total failures, and that third is ad-
dressing a very important piece of our future population and of our
national  asset.  And  we  can’t  afford  to  have  two  thirds  of  them  not
participate  and  develop.  And  you  know,  to  your  question,  we  have
got  to  solve  that  problem  if,  indeed,  we  want  some  level  of  inde-
pendence,  relative  to  the  source  of  key  technical  and  engineering
personnel.

So,  I  think  there  certainly  has  been  an  ongoing  interest  on  the
part of business. I think it has heightened—I think there is greater
recognition,  as  there  is  in  this  body,  of  the  criticality  of  it,  and  so,
I  think  that  business  is  prepared  to  work  collaboratively,  and  to
push State governments and local governments on the issue of edu-
cation funding.

Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you.
Mr.  DONOFRIO.  Could  I  add  something  to  that,  if  there  is  time.
Mr. BOEHLERT. By all means, yes, please.
Mr.  DONOFRIO.  So,  I  agree  with  everything  John  said.  I  would
just  simply  add,  the  real  issue  here  that  I  think  you  are  trying  to
talk about and deal with is math and science, and why are we for-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

saking ourselves here. You realize this problem that we are talking
about starts in the third, the fourth, and the fifth grade. This prob-
lem  is  too  late  by  the  time  we  get  to  high  school,  let  alone  college.
There is enough research done on this matter that suggests that
the problem lies with the fact that we don’t have adequately capa-
ble teachers. It is true that in the fourth and the fifth grade, young
women  get  deprogrammed  from  math  and  science.  They  get  frus-
trated.  Under-represented  minorities  get  frustrated,  and  they  be-
come channeled to go do other things. So, if you were really looking
for one thing to do, from my perspective, having spent 20 years try-
ing  to  figure  out  this  problem,  it  is  teachers.  We  need  better  math
and  science  teachers.  That  is  how  we  will  get  more  and  more  peo-
ple  through  the  system  into  our  college  programs,  because  the
other  countries  that  we  are  all  worried  about,  it  is  what  they  do.
It is how they major in this stuff.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  The  gentleman’s  time  has  expired.  To  fol-
low  through  on  that,  just  let  me  point  out—the  reality  of  some-
thing. About half of the kids in K–12 in America are taking science
and  math  courses  from  teachers  who  didn’t  major  in  a  science  or
math  discipline.  That  doesn’t  mean  they  are  not  dedicated  edu-
cators, but quite frankly, I don’t want a French major teaching my
grandkids calculus, because they will end up with the same result,
where their grandfather still doesn’t understand it, but that is part
of the problem.

And then secondly, they will say, well, why don’t we get the best
and  the  brightest  in  science  and  math  majors  to  go  into  teaching?
Because  we  are  stupid  about  the  way  we  do  it.  Here  is  what  hap-
pens.  You  got  people  in  undergraduate  work  majoring  in  science
and  math,  excelling,  and  they  say,  you  know  what?  I  would  love
to teach. What a rewarding profession that is. But then they grad-
uate, and it is gee, I got $28,000 in student loans to pay back, and
Johnny  and  Susie  want  to  get  married,  and  begin  to  start  their
family,  and  they  say,  boy,  IBM  and  Cisco,  they  have  got  this  offer
to me for double what the local high school or grade school is offer-
ing,  and  I  really  want  to  teach,  but  I  can’t  afford  to  teach.  I  will
do  it  later,  and  later  never  comes  about.  So  they  make  a  practical
decision.

So,  one  of  the  things  this  committee  has  done  is  start  out  the
Science  and  Math  Scholarship  Program.  And  it  took  us  five  years
after we got it authorized to get a buck for it, and we give stipends,
$10,000,  to  juniors  and  seniors  in  college,  science,  math,  or  engi-
neering  majors,  who  will  agree,  for  each  year  of  the  stipend,  to
teach two years in public education, help solve their problem of in-
come,  and  it  helps  solve  our  problem  of  getting  them  in  the  class-
room. But I don’t want anyone to go from this hearing to think that
America’s schools, even the ones that are failing, aren’t peopled by
dedicated educators. There is a lot to be lacking in the administra-
tors, quite frankly, and the fact of the matter is, the most dedicated
French major or history major is probably not going to be the best
calculus  teacher  or  chemistry  teacher,  understandably,  but  they
have  to  take  their  assignment.  So,  we  are  getting  on  with  the  job,
but help us lobbying for more money for the scholarship programs.
And  I  want  to  welcome,  to  show  you  the  interest  we  have,  an-
other  appropriator—we  like  to  curry  favor  with  appropriators,  you

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

know—Todd  Tiahrt.  He  is  an  individual  who  is  vitally  interested
in  innovation  and  what  we  are  discussing  here  today.  And  in  his
busy  schedule,  he  is  not  on  this  committee,  but  he  wants  to  be
here. So, without objection, I ask unanimous consent that he be al-
lowed to sit in on the proceedings, and we welcome you, Mr. Tiahrt.
Mr. TIAHRT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and let me thank you for
having  this  hearing.  This  is  a  real  challenge  that  we  are  facing.
How  do  we  prepare  for  the  future  economy?  What  do  we  need  to
do  in  our  government  to  assist  that,  and  I  think  your  vision  with
the  scholarship  program  and  with  this  hearing  is  commendable,
and  I  am  glad  you  are  going  down  that  path.  I  have  a  statement
I would like to include in the record of this hearing.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Without objection, so ordered.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Tiahrt follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE TODD TIAHRT

First,  I  thank  Chairman  Boehlert  for  inviting  me  to  this  hearing.  I  commend  the
Chairman for his hard work on this committee and especially his foresight in focus-
ing  the  Committee’s  work  not  only  on  the  immediate  needs  of  our  nation  but  also
on long-term goals and finding the steps to reach those goals. I am especially inter-
ested  in  the  topic  of  today’s  hearing  ‘‘U.S.  Competitiveness:  The  Innovation  Chal-
lenge.’’  The  innovation  challenge  is  one  of  the  most  important  ones  for  us  to  meet
in order to ensure America’s economic competitiveness—however it is also one of the
hardest  to  define.  I  am  pleased  that  Chairman  Boehlert  has  assembled  these  wit-
nesses from various backgrounds to help Congress better define the innovation chal-
lenge and propose solutions.

As you may know, for the last two years I have been working with my colleagues
to  address  the  issue  of  economic  competitiveness.  The  United  States  has  the  #1
economy  in  the  world.  For  almost  two  centuries,  we  have  been  the  envy  of  the
world—a  dynamic  economy,  a  hardworking,  motivated  workforce,  truly  the  land  of
opportunity where innovation has thrived. That status is changing, however. We are
running a $670 billion annual trade deficit, that is contributing to our budget deficit
and slowed economy over the past few years.

This  development  is  not  a  temporary  blip  on  the  radar  screen.  It  is  the  culmina-
tion  of  a  generation  of  increased  regulation,  unsound  tax  policies,  languishing  em-
phasis on math and science education, unchecked health care costs, rampant lawsuit
abuse,  unfocused  research  and  development  funds,  and  weak  trade  policy  enforce-
ment. In short, our government has made it difficult and undesirable to do business
in  the  United  States.  We  have  put  up  roadblocks  to  keeping  and  creating  jobs  in
the  America.  And  we  have  done  this  to  ourselves.  If  these  current  trends  continue,
our  economy  will  continue  to  lag  and  we  will  no  longer  remain  the  most  dynamic
economy in the world.

Meanwhile, China, India and other nations are preparing for the future. They are
educating  their  students  in  math,  science  and  technology  and  pumping  out  record
numbers  of  engineers.  They  are  reducing  tax  rates  and  other  economic  barriers  to
entice investment in their nation. They are pursuing aggressive trade policies to re-
duce America’s dominance in world trade.

Without  attention  to  these  matters,  the  United  States  is  headed  towards  a  third

rate economy.

That is why we need to take this issue seriously. Last year we began the competi-
tiveness  legislative  agenda  on  the  Floor  and  over  a  period  of  eight  weeks  discussed
and voted on issues relating to keeping and creating jobs in America. Beginning last
week  the  Jobs  Action  Team  is  again  bringing  legislation  to  the  floor  to  combat  this
problem.  But  we  need  to  take  a  longer-term  vision.  For  this  reason,  I  have  estab-
lished  the  House  Economic  Competitiveness  Caucus.  The  Caucus  will  carefully  ex-
amine the issues facing our ability to compete economically in the coming years. We
will  work  to  focus  Congressional  efforts  on  removing  the  barriers  to  American  eco-
nomic competitiveness, and develop economic goals for the future and find the paths
to get there.

I  am  most  interested  in  hearing  the  testimony  of  the  witnesses.  I  am  especially

interested in the first two questions they will address:

• What role does innovation play in bolstering U.S. competitiveness?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

• What principal innovation challenges do your company and its industry sector

face in terms of competing in the global economy?

66

Americans are known for their ingenuity, a trait fostered by our society since the
Pilgrims  found  a  way  to  survive  the  harsh  New  England  winter  and  develop  into
a  thriving  community  that  eventually  became  a  great  nation.  Knowledge  and  ideas
are our most important raw materials.

The American economy has led the world because our system rewards innovation.
From Benjamin Franklin through Eli Whitney, Thomas Edison, George Washington
Carver, the Wright Brothers, Henry Ford, Jonas Salk, and Spaceship One promoter
Burt  Rutan,  our  entrepreneurs,  scientists  and  skilled  workers  create  and  apply  the
technologies that have changed and will continue to change our world.

Our  leaders  have  realized  that  while  they  shouldn’t  tell  people  what  to  think  or
how  to  do  things,  there  is  a  vital  national  interest  in  helping  the  best  ideas  come
forward.  America’s  strength  has  been  in  encouraging  thought  and  exploration,  and
providing the resources to bringing those dreams to life.

The Republican Congress has made great strides in funding research and develop-
ment.  We  have  met  and  exceeded  our  goal  of  doubling  the  National  Institutes  of
Health (NIH) medical research funding, we have made necessary reforms to stream-
line  the  Patent  and  Trademark  Office  and  FDA  processes,  and  we  have  promoted
nanotechnology,  broadband  dissemination,  and  a  myriad  of  other  important  high
tech investment. Similarly President Bush has focused on evaluating the scale, qual-
ity, and effectiveness of the federal effort in science and technology.

Research  and  development  investments  are  still  the  keys  to  our  nation’s  future
competitiveness,  and  thus  we  must  increase  our  efforts  to  spur  innovation.  I  look
forward  to  working  with  my  colleagues  to  find  ways  to  guarantee  a  vibrant,  inter-
nationally  competitive  American  economy  now,  five,  10,  15,  and  20  years  down  the
road.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Just  let  me  tell  you,  this  has  been  a  love-
in  so  far,  because  we  are  on  the  same  wavelength.  What  we  are
trying  to  do  is  overcome  the  obstacles  out  there,  and  try  to  figure
out  how  we  can,  you  know,  serve  as  collective  missionaries,  and
convince  other  people  in  this  Congress  not  to  be  just  concerned
with  CAFTA  or  who  our  Supreme  Court  nominee  is  going  to  be,
and all of that. Those are all important, but be concerned with this,
too. This is very important.

And  speaking  about  something  very  important,  it  is  very  impor-

tant that I recognize Mr. Rohrabacher.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  certainly  agree

with the idea of providing scholarships for our young people.

Chairman BOEHLERT. And you have been a leader in that regard,
and  we  have  the  Scholarship  for  Service  program.  Give  scholar-
ships, and for a scholarship, you serve.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Okay.  I—let  me  note  also,  perhaps,  just  tak-
ing  care  of  the  college  funds  for  students  might  not  be  enough.
Maybe  we  need  to  pay,  if  we  are  going  to  get  the  best,  or  at  least
some  very  adequate  teachers  in  science  and  mathematics,  because
of  the  competition  with  the  private  sector,  maybe  we  need  to  pay
those teachers more money, as compared to teachers who teach po-
etry or more of the other things that, perhaps, aren’t involved with
competitiveness  but  involved  with  happiness.  And  so,  I  think  that
is a major problem, that all teachers in high school have to be paid
the same amount of money. We don’t differentiate that, and I think
that differentiation is needed if we are going to remain competitive.
However, I have another line of questioning, that I would like to
go  into,  and  very  quickly,  I  would  like  to  ask  each  member  of  the
panel,  in  just  one  or  two  words,  literally,  one  or  two  words,  how
much  credit  would  you  give  to  the  federal  spending  on  long-term
research  to  the  success  of  America’s  high  tech  industries?  What
would you say, a lot, medium, or not very much credit?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

Dr. BRODY. A lot.
Mr. MORGRIDGE. The same.
Mr. DONOFRIO. A lot.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay. And I take it from our industrial lead-
ers  that  that  means  that  in  their  own  companies,  they  have  taken
advantage  of  this  long-term  research,  the  product  of  long-term  re-
search. Now, I want to ask something a little bit more aggressively,
and  that  is  what  should  we  expect  from  American  companies,  if
they are the recipients of such largesse? IBM, for example, just sold
off,  I  don’t  know,  I  think  that  the  deal  was  consummated,  selling
off  a  major  division  to  America’s  greatest  economic  adversary.
Should we expect that America’s long-term research that we invest
so  much  money  in  should  be  going  to  help  you  create  companies
like  your  companies,  set  up  manufacturing  units  in  China,  to  put
our  people  out  of  work?  Where  does  the  benefit  of  the  American
people  who  pay  for  those  tax  dollars  play  a  role  in  the  decision-
making of American industrialists like yourself?

Mr.  DONOFRIO.  Well,  Congressman,  in  order  for  IBM  to  be  the
asset  you  would  like  it  to  be  here  in  the  United  States  and  the
world,  of  course,  it  needs  to  be  competitive.  The  government  does,
indeed, help us with certain research, but I would remind you that
we  probably  have  the  world’s  largest  and  singularly  distinguished
private  research  laboratory  in  the  world.  Our  research  division,
headquartered  in  the  T.J.  Watson  Research  Center.  We  have  over
3,000  researchers,  2,000  of  them  here  in  the  United  States,  and
1,000  of  them  spread  across  the  globe.  That  research  organization
is  what  is  the  spark  plug  for  IBM’s  growth.  So,  nobody  invests
more in science and technology——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Right.
Mr. DONOFRIO.—on their own than the IBM company does.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Right. But you just gave a lot of credit to the

American taxpayer for your success.

Mr. DONOFRIO. Doesn’t necessarily mean—no, I—you said overall

success when you asked that question.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Of America’s high tech industries.
Mr. DONOFRIO. Right. That may not be——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. IBM is different than that, I think.
Mr. DONOFRIO. Well, a little bit——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. You have done it on your own.
Mr.  DONOFRIO.  Not  completely  on  our  own,  and  we  participate
now  in  these  programs  much  more  aggressively,  and  we  have  also
provided a considerable amount of technological prowess and capa-
bility to the United States of America, and we continue to do that,
in  the  defense  industry,  as  well  as  in  the  intelligence  community.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  And  that  is  an  excuse  for  going  overseas  to
America’s greatest potential enemy and investing in their country?
Mr.  DONOFRIO.  That  is  not  an  excuse  for  doing  anything  of  that

matter at all. This is all about being globally competitive.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. That is right. It is not all about globally com-
petitive. It is about what this gentleman down here said, it is about
the benefit and the wellness of the American people.

Mr. DONOFRIO. How can we——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. You can divorce yourself about what the ben-
efit  to  the  American  people  are  all  you  want,  but  the  fact  is,  we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

represent the people of this country. We don’t represent a global in-
terest, especially if that global interest puts our people out of work.
Mr.  DONOFRIO.  A  healthy  IBM  helps  us  become  healthy  in  the
United States. It is what has allowed us to continue to increase our
employment  in  this  country  for  the  last  three  to  four  years.  With-
out  that,  you  are  faced  with  the  near  death  experience  that  IBM
went  through  at  the  end  of  the  ’80s  and  the  beginning  of  the  ’90s.
So,  the  consequences  are  severe,  and  they  are  important  to  the
United States of America, for us to be globally competitive.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  I  guess,  does  Cisco  go  along  with  this?  Is

Mr. MORGRIDGE. Cisco does 55 percent of its business outside the
United  States.  We  employ  over  two-thirds  of  our  people  in  the
United  States.  We  spend  a  billion,  over  a  billion  dollars  a  year  on
research. The vast majority of that is done here. This past year, we
increased our employment from about 35,000——

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  If  the  Chairman  would  indulge  me  just  one

more minute to follow up, because I know this is——

Chairman BOEHLERT. Is this going to be poetry or prose?
Mr. ROHRABACHER. It is not part of the love fest, anyway, let me

that——

put it that way. Is Cisco——

Mr. MORGRIDGE. So, I think we are——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Have you——
Mr. MORGRIDGE. We are returning——
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Have  you  invested—yeah,  certainly  you  are
returning jobs to the United States, but have you also invested dra-
matically in China?

Mr. MORGRIDGE. We have not invested——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay.
Mr. MORGRIDGE. Most of our investment——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. So——
Mr.  MORGRIDGE.—in  China  has  been  in  sales  and  marketing,  in

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay. Right, but——
Mr. MORGRIDGE.—to get share of that market.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.—not  in  manufacturing.  But  not  in  manufac-

order——

turing.

Mr. MORGRIDGE. We are not an integrated——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. And not——
Mr. MORGRIDGE.—manufacturer.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.—in  transferring  technology  that  was  devel-

oped here over to our greatest potential enemy.

Mr. MORGRIDGE. If you mean from a research standpoint, no.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Right.  So,  you  are  competitiveness  in  your
company  wasn’t  dependent  on  that,  but  the  IBM  company  was,
huh?

Mr. MORGRIDGE. I can’t——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Totally confuse——
Mr. MORGRIDGE. I can’t answer for the IBM company.
Chairman BOEHLERT. In all fairness, let us have——
Mr. ROHRABACHER. All right.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.—the  witness  from  IBM,  Mr.  Donofrio,  re-

spond to that.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Sure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

Mr.  DONOFRIO.  The  technology  that  you  are  referring  to  and  I
didn’t  know  this  was  going  to  be  this  type  of  a  hearing,  but  that
is  fine,  you  know,  that  PC  technology,  have  you  been  studying  it?
I  mean,  do  you  understand  how  much  value  there  is  in  that  tech-
nology?  There  are  no  secrets  there.  There  is  nothing  at  risk  in
being  able  to  transfer  this  around  the  world.  And  by  the  way,  do
you  realize  that  90  percent  of  most  of  the  insides  of  all  of  those
computers come from somewhere else other than the United States
already  today,  and  that  the  real  value  is  in  the  way  you  apply
these things? This is the whole——

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Do you differentiate——
Mr. DONOFRIO.—issue that we have been talking about.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Do  you  differentiate  in  something—other
than  the  United  States  versus  some  country  like  Red  China,  that
might be an enemy of the United States——

Mr. DONOFRIO. We comply with every rule, law, and enforcement

in the United States of America——

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  But  your  company  also  participates  in  help-
ing  us  create  that  law,  create  those  regulations.  I  am  sorry,  Mr.
Chairman,  if  I  have  to  be  the  skunk  at  the  lawn  party,  but  I  find
the  globalist  view  of  big  business  not  to  be  comforting  to  someone
who  is  basically  looking  out  for  the  interests  of  the  American  peo-
ple, and not some global concept of the future.

If  IBM  isn’t  healthy,  we  are  talking  about  U.S.  competitiveness
here.  We  are  not  talking  about,  you  know,  IBM’s  health,  if  it  not
basically an American company.

Mr. DONOFRIO. Mr. Rohrabacher, we co-chaired this report. That
is  how  much  we  care  about  the  competitiveness  of  the  United
States of America.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Thank  you  very  much.  The  gentleman’s

time has expired, and thank you for that report.

Mr. Green.
Mr.  GREEN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  I  may,
I  would  like  to  thank  you  for  the  wonderful  sermon  that  you  gave
us  earlier.  I  think  those  of  us  who  did  not  have  religion  acquired
it,  and  quite  frankly,  we  were  ready  to  pass  the  collection  plate.
Thank you so much.

I  would  like  to  talk  just  a  little  bit,  if  I  may,  friends,  about  the
problem.  There  is  an  indication  that  the  problem  starts  in  the
fourth grade, thereabout. I think there is some truth to this. How-
ever,  I  contend  that  it  really  starts  in  the  home.  I  really  do  think
that  we  do  have  some  cultural  attitudes  that  we  have  to  adjust.  I
have  actually  witnessed  persons  pay  good  money  to  go  and  sit  in
the  rain  and  watch  a  football  game,  while  missing  an  opportunity
to attend a PTA or PTO meeting that was free.

It  has  been  my  experience  that  we  seem  to  be  placing  athletics
above  and  beyond  academics,  and  that  attitude  has  got  to  change,
because  as  long  as  we  are  willing  to  pay  athletes  millions  to  play,
and  have  millions  of  teachers  underpaid,  we  have  a  problem.  I
think  that  teachers  are  the  molders  and  sculptors  of  humankind,
and that they mold and shape the human mind. They take the es-
sence  of  mental  clay,  and  they  mold  it  and  shape  it  into  the  quin-
tessential manifestation of intellectual cloisonne´.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

ments.

We  have  got  to  have  the  best  and  brightest  teachers,  and  one  of
the  ways  that  you  get  the  best  and  brightest  teachers  is  to  pay
them  more.  Teachers  are  underpaid.  We  pay  athletes  hundreds  of
millions in their profession, and teachers are making thousands in
their  professions.  Friends,  and  some  don’t  make  thousands,  one  of
my  colleagues  has  commented.  So,  I  am  appealing  to  us  to  under-
stand  that  if  we  truly  want  to  leave  no  child  behind,  we  ought  to
leave no teacher behind, and we ought to pay them more.

Having said this, how do you propose that we deal with this vote

that is coming up, and continue this hearing.

But  we  do  have,  we  do  have  this  problem  of  adjusting  our  atti-
tudes  about  academics  versus  athletics,  and  I  would  just  like  to,
given that you have studied so many things, get some of your com-
ments about how we will make this cultural change. I heard on the
news  this  morning  there  is  some  game  out,  Mr.  Chairman,  called
Grand  Theft  Auto,  has  some  sort  of  sexually  explicit  scene  in  it.
There is a cultural problem here that is deeply rooted that we have
got to deal with, and I am interested in your comments on how do
we deal with the culture that promulgates a lot of what we are see-
ing  at  the  fourth  grade,  fifth  grade,  sixth  grade  levels  and  above,
and  I  also  would,  as  I  close,  Mr.  Chairman,  like  to  thank  my  good
colleague and friend, Mr. Culberson from Texas. I would like to ex-
tend a personal welcome to you to our committee.

Thank  you  so  much,  my  good  friend.  And  I  welcome  your  com-

Dr.  BRODY.  I  do,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  don’t  have  an  answer,  Con-
gressman Green. I do believe that this is—there are manifest prob-
lems,  obviously,  and  money  drives  a  lot  of  what  is  going  on  in  our
society, but nonetheless, universities of the margin can make a dif-
ference through outreach to schools, and providing role models, and
I  think  of  my  distinguished  faculty  member,  a  famous  neuro-
surgeon,  world  famous  neurosurgeon,  Ben  Carson,  who  grew  up  in
the  projects  and  became  a  world  famous  neurosurgeon.  He  volun-
teers  his  time,  has  created  a  foundation  to  mentor  young  kids  in
the inner cities, and to teach them about role models——

Mr. GREEN. Would you yield for just a moment? We don’t ask the
CEOs of, oh, well, shouldn’t use Enron, of IBM, major corporations,
to  volunteer  their  time,  to  run  these  corporations.  They  do  it  for
money,  and  they  do  a  good  job.  Why  do  we  tend  to  assume  that  if
you  are  an  educator,  you  do  it  simply  because  you  love  it?  I  think
they  do.  They  do.  They  love  it,  but  you  can  do  what  you  love,  and
still be properly compensated. That is my point.

Dr.  BRODY.  You  certainly  have  no  objection  from  me  on  that

topic.

Mr.  DONOFRIO.  No,  so  I  would  agree  with  that,  Congressman.
And I think you are right. We do need to find a way to pay teach-
ers more, because that is what will get the better and the brighter
teachers  to  show  up,  and  that  will  help  this  whole  issue  of  math
and science, which we spoke about earlier. And your comments are
also  very  well  made  about  the  home  and  the  environment  and  the
culture  that  our  young  are  exposed  to.  And  it  is  complementary.  I
mean,  you  can  get  both  of  these  things  to  synergistically  work  to-
gether.  There  have  been  many  attempts,  and  we  need  to  continue
to  work  on  improving  our  education  system’s  efficiency,  to  deliver

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

more  taxpayer  dollars,  you  know,  to  the  classroom,  to  the  teacher,
to  allow  what  you  are  talking  about  to  occur,  because  it  is  always
hard to generate new funds to be able to do this.

And  on  top  of  that,  I  do  think  that  Dr.  Brody  has  a  good  idea.
We  do  volunteerism,  more  outreach,  a  mixture  of  that  could  help
take  off  some  of  the  burden  of  the  cost  of  the  education  system.
There  are  many  wonderful  efforts  that  go  on  around  the  calendar
year. One that I know of, that I participate in, is this National En-
gineers  Week  effort  that  many  of  us  are  all  founders,  if  not  spon-
sors  of,  where  thousands  and  thousands  and  thousands  of  engi-
neers  and  scientists  show  up  in  the  fourth  or  fifth  or  sixth  grades,
so  that  hundreds  of  thousands,  if  not  millions  of  children  actually
get  to  understand  what  an  engineer  or  scientist  or  a  mathemati-
cian or a technologist do. They don’t know what they do. They have
never even heard of it, because of their background, their home life,
their at-risk, you know, environment. And it is just powerful to see
their  eyes  lighten  up,  and  to  see  their  whole  thought  process  start
to change about what could be possible.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Here is the problem. You see, we have got
bells. We are going to have a series of two votes. That means about
a half-hour. So, Mr. Reichert next, and we are not going to ask you
to hang around here, while we go over and play Congresspeople.

So, Mr. Reichert.
Mr.  REICHERT.  Yes,  sir.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  am  one  of
the  few  Members  that  don’t  have  a  doctorate,  and/or  an  engineer-
ing  degree.  I  come  from  a  law  enforcement  background.  I  was  the
sheriff in Seattle, and as we sit here and talk about technology and
science,  I  think  back  to  my  days  as  a  homicide  detective,  and  I
made  a  list  of,  you  know,  innovative  technology  that  has  come
along. DNA, when I was a homicide detective, archaeology, anthro-
pology,  entomology,  all  of  those  things  come  together  in  the  world
that  I  worked  in.  We  need  scientists  in  those  areas,  too.  So,  I  also
am  a  member  of  the  Jobs  Action  Team.  It  is  a  team  here  put  to-
gether,  in  Congress,  to  focus  on  jobs,  and  so,  I  kind  of  want  to  fol-
low  up  on  some  questioning  that  came  earlier,  and  a  little  bit,  as
was described, a hostile way, but coming from a jobs point of view.
Just one question. What factors do IBM and Cisco consider when
locating  a  major  manufacturing  facility  in  another  country?  What
are the major factors that you consider?

Mr.  MORGRIDGE.  We  have  a  virtual  manufacturing  model,  which
means  that  we  really  don’t  have  a  large  number  of  factories.  We
have a large number of factories that support our products, but we
don’t choose those locations. They are chosen by our suppliers. The
factories,  the  few  factories  that  we  do  have  are  in  San  Jose,  Cali-
fornia, and we use them principally to do early prototype and first
run, before we have someone else actually build the product.

What  I  would  say  is  that  all  of  our  major  research  facilities,
which  is  really  the  value  add  of  our  company,  are  located  here  in
the United States, with the exception of one in Canada and one in
Israel.

Mr.  DONOFRIO.  So,  Congressman,  the  way  we  do  it  is  quite
straightforward.  Number  one,  of  course,  we  have  a  history,  given
we  have  been  around  for  almost  100  years,  but  we  have  an  inte-
grated supply chain, meaning everything that deals with the whole

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

issue of building something is handled by the same group, whether
we  are  building  it  ourselves,  or  whether  we  are  taking  parts  from
other people, and adding value to them, and putting them together.
But  for  the  pieces  where  we  actually  have  factories,  and  we  have
many  of  them  around  the  world,  I  would  have  to  simply  say  it  is
the  right  tasks,  the  right  skills,  and  the  right  places,  and  we  let
that  determine  in  the  bottom  line,  in  the  final  analysis,  you  know,
where  we  have  to  put  a  factory,  or  where  a  manufacturing  facility
should be, as part of the whole global, you know, integrated supply
chain network that we build.

Mr.  REICHERT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  yield  the  balance  of

my time, and request that my other questions be submitted.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  They  will  be,  as  will  others,  be  submitted
to the witnesses, and we would ask for a response in a timely fash-
ion.

Here is what we are going to do. Ms. Eddie Bernice Johnson, who
has been so faithful, for a minute, and then Mr. Davis for a minute,
and then we have got to run over to the floor, and get your running
shoes on.

Ms. Johnson.
Ms. JOHNSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and our Ranking Mem-
ber.  I  won’t,  hopefully,  take  the  whole  minute.  I  just  want  to  say
that this is my 13th year on this committee, and this has been my
great passion, of trying to get information out, so that young people
can  become  more  interested.  And  we  are  having  a  little  headway
in  Dallas,  Texas,  because  we  are  in  the  midst  of  TI  and  EDS,  but
I want to involve Cisco and IBM as well, so I will be in touch with
you. I am chair of the science and tech brain trust for the Congres-
sional  Black  Caucus,  and  we  have  a  meeting  coming  up  in  Sep-
tember. Thank you.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you. Mr. Davis.
Mr. DAVIS. I will be very brief as well, and I will also have a copy
that I leave for the record. I want to make a pretty brief comment.
Number  one,  some  of  the  Members  here  are  saying  in  K–12,  we
have  a  failed  educational  system,  and  then  others  are  saying  we
can’t  get  good  math  teachers  or  science  teachers.  Let  us  make  a
comparison as to what we spend on education and national defense.
National  defense  is  extremely  important,  and  we  should  spend
what we are spending there. But yes, in reality, you are looking at
about  $500  billion  for  national  defense,  and  about  $50  billion  for
education,  one  out  of  ten  dollars.  So,  if  someone  goes  to  work  for
a  defense  contractor  for  $150,000,  either  a  scientist  or  a  mathe-
matician,  why  in  the  heck  would  they  go  to  work  teaching  school
for  $45,000  a  year?  Until  we  get  our  head  screwed  on  right,  edu-
cation  is  just  as  important  of  a  defense  mechanism  for  our  nation
as  what  we  are  spending  in  many  other  areas.  That  is  part  of  our
national  defense,  and  for  some  reason,  we  can’t  get  that  through
the  heads  of  a  lot  of  folks  who  serve  in  Congress.  We  are  failing
at  that  as  well,  but  I  do  have  a  deep  and  abiding  concern  that
when  a  company  is  bought  by  a  Chinese  company,  like  Murray,
Inc.,  and  they  take  bankruptcy  after  giving  all  the  research  and
technology,  all  the  patents  that  they  own,  that  Murray,  Inc.  has,
and  then  they  shut  the  plants  down,  and  take  that  technology  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

China,  and  then  start  shipping  them  back  over  here  under  some
other name.

We  have  got  to  also  take  a  serious  look  at  corporate  America.  A
lot  of  it  is  driven  by  greed  and  profit,  and  the  patriotism  of  the
American corporate structure is not like it used to be. If they were
as  patriotic  as  our  troops,  who  are  offering  their  lives  up  for  sac-
rifice in Iraq and in Afghanistan, if corporate America was that pa-
triotic,  we  would  be  a  whole  lot  better  shape  in  our  jobs  in  this
country.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  Mr.  Donofrio,
Mr.  Morgridge,  Dr.  Brody,  thank  you.  I  think  we  have  had  a  spir-
ited  and  intriguing  exchange  of  views  and  ideas.  We  have  covered
poetry and prose. Thank you for being facilitators, and we will con-
tinue  this,  and  keep  up  the  good  work.  I  just  wish  we  could  have
more  act  responsibly  like  your  institutions  are,  Johns  Hopkins,
what a wonderful, great place that is, and Cisco, and IBM.

Thank you very much. This hearing is adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 12:00 p.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(75)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Nicholas  M.  Donofrio,  Executive  Vice  President  for  Innovation  and

Technology, IBM Corporation

Questions submitted by Representative Lincoln Davis
Q1. What is the most important point in the education system for children to be en-
couraged in math and science? If the Federal Government was to strengthen its
education investments in math and science, at what age should the focus be?

A1. Although  it’s  important  to  focus  on  the  quality  of  math  and  science  programs
at  the  college  and  university  level,  this  will  impact  the  near-term  preparedness  for
innovation  within  the  current  scope  of  opportunity.  We  also  need  substantial  in-
creases  in  the  number  and  proportion  of  students  in  colleges  and  universities  who
are  well-grounded  in  math  and  science  and  are  prepared  to  enter  science,  tech-
nology, engineering and mathematics (STEM) careers.

In  fact,  we  must  expand  the  pipeline  for  STEM  careers  and  ensure  that  young
people are well-equipped to participate in a society that is increasingly characterized
by math, science and technology. In this regard, grades 4–8 are critical, as students
prepare  to  move  from  basic  computation  and  simple  scientific  concepts  to  master
higher  level  math  and  science  concepts.  Students  who  complete  the  middle  school
years  with  a  solid  grounding  in  math  and  science  will  be  successful  in  high  school.
Mastery encourages interest and commitment.

A  focus  on  grades  4–8  requires  well  prepared  teachers.  The  Federal  Government
can  offer  new  incentives  to  attract  college  students  to  teaching  and  encourage  sec-
ond-career teachers in math and science. Succeeding in grades 4–8 also requires an
ongoing  review  of  standards,  assessments  and  curriculum  to  ensure  that  all  stu-
dents will be exposed to math and science and the curriculum will be of the highest
quality.  This  means  an  emphasis  on  hands-on  learning,  problem-solving  and  best
practices. The new requirement for a science assessment is a good first step. Federal
investment  in  curriculum  development  and  evaluation  in  these  areas  is  also  impor-
tant. The recent loan forgiveness program for math and science teachers is another
good  beginning  that  needs  to  be  evaluated  for  effectiveness  and,  if  appropriate,  ex-
panded.
Q2. How can rural areas uniquely cope with the loss of U.S. competitiveness?
A2. First  it  should  be  noted  that  the  U.S.  remains  competitive  by  many  measures.
But  America  cannot  be  complacent  as  many  nations  become  more  competitive  by
opening  their  economies,  educating  their  citizens,  and  investing  in  modern  infra-
structures.

In today’s global economy, a region’s capacity to innovate will determine whether
it  competes  in  commoditized,  low-margin  markets  or  whether  it  will  participate  in
the high-margin, rapid growth markets driven by innovative goods and services.

Rural areas in the U.S. should evaluate how well they are preparing their citizens
to  compete  by  examining  the  policies  and  resources  offered  to  support  innovation.
Many U.S. locales are pursuing strategies that include components such as:

• Cyber  infrastructure—including  high-speed  Internet  availability  and  net-
works to enable collaboration, such as computer ‘‘grids’’ that also expand proc-
essing capacity for advanced tasks.
• Education  reform—including  business-academia  partnerships  to:  establish
new  curriculums  and  research  across  traditional  scientific  disciplines;  teach
students  entrepreneurship  and  how  to  commercialize  new  ideas;  and  train
students in the rapidly growing field of business services.
• Risk Capital—including incentives for early stage investors in qualified start-
ups and regional networks to increase awareness of investment opportunities.
Regional  innovation  strategies  also  rely  on  collaboration  between  business,  gov-
ernment,  and  academic  institutions.  Each  plays  a  role  in  the  innovation  ecosystem
that determines how attractive and productive a region will be for innovators.
Q3. How  can  U.S.  industry  partner  with  schools  and  universities  more  to  help  en-
courage technology competitiveness? Can government help facilitate that partner-
ship, and how?

A3. U.S. industry can partner with state education departments and school districts
to  improve  technology  competitiveness.  Businesses  input  and  consultation  is  essen-
tial  to  a  regular  review  of  academic  standards  to  ensure  that  elementary  and  sec-
ondary  schools  are  encouraging  innovation  and  supporting  students  in  their  efforts

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

to master math and science. This should be built into the process for developing all
state standards.

Industry  can  be  a  co-sponsor  in  programs  to  provide  high  quality  math  and
science  instructional  content  (like  IBM’s  TryScience  initiative),  provide  mentors  to
individual students—even e-mentors—and provide opportunities for young people to
learn  about  math,  science  and  engineering  first-hand  (as  they  do  in  IBM’s  EXITS
camps each summer). Each year, more than 3000 IBMers visit schools in the United
States  and  encourage  young  people  to  explore  math,  science  and  engineering  with
hands  on  activities  and  personal  mentoring  during  National  Engineers  Week  (re-
cently  renamed  EWeek).  Businesses  throughout  the  Nation  can  join,  support  and
help EWeek grow until we can reach every middle and high school student.

Businesses  also  can  share  their  experience  using  data  for  decision-making  and
other  business  approaches  that  can  help  education  leaders  improve  school  oper-
ations  and  outcomes  (e.g.,  IBM’s  Change  Toolkit).  The  Federal  Government  can
work  with  business  and  education  leaders  to  launch  a  major  national  campaign  to
raise the status of math, science and engineering careers and provide young people
with information to make good career choices.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

Responses by John P. Morgridge, Chairman of the Board, Cisco Systems, Inc.

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Representative Lincoln Davis
Q1. What is the most important point in the education system for children to be en-
couraged in math and science? If the Federal Government were to strengthen its
education investments in math and science, at what age should the focus be?

A1. I’m not an education expert and have not studied this issue extensively, but an-
ecdotal  evidence  seems  to  point  to  early  education  as  when  students  are  most  sus-
ceptible  to  gaining  an  aptitude  for  math  and  science.  Early  encouragement  in  any
discipline,  as  you  know,  can  have  an  enormous  impact  on  a  child.  If  math  and
science  were  more  squarely  focused  on  in  K–5,  I  think  it  would  have  an  enormous
impact  in  later  educational  years,  especially  if  math  and  science  were  made  to  be
as  ‘‘matter-of-fact’’  as  spelling  and  reading,  i.e.,  nothing  to  fear  and  in  the  normal
course  of  business.  Math  and  science  can  have  a  stigma  attached  to  them  as  too
hard or not easily grasped and that ‘‘culture’’ also needs to be changed.
Q2. How can rural areas uniquely cope with the loss of U.S. competitiveness?
A2. Broadband  can  have  an  enormous  impact  on  rural  areas  to  help  with  competi-
tiveness.  If  you  think  of  broadband  as  the  always-on,  high-speed  connection  to  the
world,  then  location  becomes  more  and  more  irrelevant.  With  energy  costs  rising
and  telecommuting  more  acceptable  in  the  private  and  public  sectors,  rural  areas
have  the  decided  advantage  of  being  more  cost  effective  places  for  people  to  locate,
live, work, learn and play. An affordable cost of living while being connected to the
world  through  broadband,  can  be  an  actual  advantage  of  being  located  in  a  rural
area for a knowledge worker.
Q3. How  can  U.S.  industry  partner  with  schools  and  universities  more  to  help  en-
courage technology competitiveness? Can government help facilitate that partner-
ship, and how?

A3. Industry  can  help  colleges  and  universities  identify  the  jobs  of  the  future  by
placing  bets  on  where  technology  is  going.  Clearly,  basic  training  in  math  and  the
sciences is a good start, but, as we know, it is the engineering specialists and tech-
nology programmers who will help determine the next innovative new technologies.
We  need  to  work  hand  in  glove  with  universities  to  determine  where  some  of  the
new  technologies  will  be  coming  from  and  help  shape  the  curriculum  and  training
in  these  areas.  This  includes  offering  internships,  job  offers  to  new  college  grads,
endowing  professorships  in  advanced  technologies  and  helping  fund  the  research
and  development  at  universities.  I  would  like  to  note  that  Stanford  University  was
the genesis of Sun Microsystems, Cisco Systems, and Google to name a few success
stories  out  of  university/industry  cooperation.  (As  of  this  writing,  these  companies
employ 72,434 people.)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

Responses by William R. Brody, President, The Johns Hopkins University

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Representative Lincoln Davis
Q1. What is the most important point in the education system for children to be en-
couraged in math and science? If the Federal Government were to strengthen its
education investments in math and science, at what age should the focus be?

A1. While  it  is  never  too  early  to  encourage  children  to  excel  in  math  and  science,
I would say we ought to be increasing our focus on the middle school years. Increas-
ing  the  emphasis  on  middle  school  prepares  students  to  succeed  at  higher-level
math  courses  in  high  school  arid  encourages  them  by  strengthening  their  skills  in
the  fundamentals.  The  2004  NAEPP  ‘‘Nation’s  Report  Card’’  for  mathematics  edu-
cation  indicates  some  improvement  in  scores  since  1999,  however,  we  still  see  evi-
dence  that  indicators  such  as  poverty  level  and  parents’  educational  attainment
have a significant negative impact on achievement.

International rankings of achievement in schools offer another indicator of declin-
ing  U.S.  scholastic  standing  and  competitiveness.  Among  15-year-olds,  U.S.,  stu-
dents declined to 28th place, behind China, Japan, Korea, Finland, Canada, France
and  the  Czech  Republic,  among  others,  according  to  the  Program  for  International
Student Assessment (PISA, 2003).

The  U.S.  educational  system  is  falling  behind  that  of  other  advanced  countries
just  as  the  Nation’s  scientific  and  technical  workforce  is  about  to  experience  a  high
rate  of  retirement.  One  quarter  of  current  workers  in  science  and  engineering  are
older  than  50  years.  At  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  Department  of  Labor  projects  that
new  jobs  requiring  science,  engineering,  and  technical  training  will  increase  at  a
rate four times higher than the average national job growth.

The relatively poor achievement of U.S. school children in math and science—par-
ticularly  in  secondary  school—is  well-documented.  The  problem  begins  early  in  the
K–12 pipeline. Survey results indicate that the United States is losing its potential
science  and  engineering  majors  around  the  middle  school  level,  In  the  2000  NAEP
Science  test  (the  most  recent  one  available),  there  was  virtually  no  change  in  per-
formance between 4th and 8th grade. But the significant decline for 12th grade indi-
cates that we are losing the battle by high school.

To  me,  this  raises  other  questions:  Are  today’s  school  teachers  qualified  to  teach
math and science? What are we doing to provide math and science teachers in mile
schools  and  high  schools  with  the  proper  training,  support,  and  curricula  to  reach
their  students?  How  do  we  recruit  to  the  teaching  profession  those  college  students
with an interest in math and science, especially when the job market for people with
technical  skills  is  so  competitive  and  pays  so  much  better?  These  questions  are  a
critical part of the solution.

Teaching jobs still are not well-compensated, especially in comparison to technical
jobs  in  the  private  sector.  Then  factor  in  these  impediments:  Teaching  adolescents
is especially challenging today. Teachers are overburdened with classroom manage-
ment.  New  teachers  often  do  not  receive  support  from  their  more  experienced  col-
leagues.

One  solution  already  exists,  but  awaits  full  funding  by  Congress.  To  ensure  that
every  student  is  able  to  learn  from  a  teacher  who  is  fully  qualified  in  math  and
science, Congress created the Robert Noyce Scholarship Program. It offers incentives
for  talented  college  students  in  science,  math,  engineering,  and  technology  to  enter
the teaching profession. Each Noyce Scholar is eligible to receive a $10,000 scholar-
ship in exchange for a two-year commitment to teach math or science in elementary
or  secondary  school.  While  this  program  has  the  potential  to  provide  our  schools
with  desperately  needed  teachers  who  are  highly  qualified  in  these  fields,  finding
has hovered only around the $8 million mark. This program should be expanded to
$20 trillion, the level authorized by Congress.

U.S.  universities  and  colleges  need  to  do  more  to  partner  with  their  local  K–12
institutions to train teachers, revamp science and math curriculum, and mentor stu-
dents.  These  are  just  a  few  programs  underway  at  Johns  Hopkins  and  many  of  its
sister institutions. We do much to advance that state of K–12 education, but we can
clearly must and should do more.

We also need to do a better job of tailoring science and math education to attract
minorities  and  women  into  middle  and  upper-level  classes.  For  example,  many
women  avoid  computer  and  science  classes  because  of  social  views  of  the  field  as
limiting  and  unwelcoming.  But  that  impression  may  be  more  based  on  how  we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

present the goals and requirements of science education. These stereotypes then are
reinforced by the limited pool of students who self-select to go into these fields.

If  we  are  to  make  science,  math,  and  technology  education  more  inclusive,  we
need  to  recognize  that  girls  and  boys  may  go  into  a  field  for  different  reasons,  If
educators  are  not  able  to  communicate  how  scientists  and  innovators  contribute  to
the  greater  good,  to  the  social  good,  we  will  not  be  able  to  break  that  stereotype.
Q2. How can rural areas uniquely cope with the loss of U.S. competitiveness?
A2. The  most  obvious  solution  is  to  attract  more  business  by  upgrading  our  coun-
try’s  electronic  infrastructure.  By  giving  rural  locations  better  access  to  broadband
and  satellite  communications,  workers  in  remote  areas  can  easily  access  jobs  that
might  otherwise  be  outsourced  overseas.  American  companies  should  look  first  to
America’s rural labor force, where everyone speaks English, educational went for at
least  the  high  school  level  can  be  certified,  and  states  want  and  need  jobs  to  revi-
talize  their  communities.  In  fact,  this  is  how  the  U.S.  call  center  business  first  ex-
panded  during  the  dot-com  boom,  when  these  facilities  sprouting  in  small  Mid-
western towns to support businesses around the country.

A federal investment to expand broadband and satellite communications to under-
served communities—both in rural areas and in inner cities—would provide a boost
comparable to the Rural Electrification Act of 1936. This expansion would also give
companies additional opportunities to invest.

To  build  the  capacity  to  handle  technology  jobs,  the  Nation’s  investment  in  rural
communities  would  require  job  training  and  support,  retraining,  and  continuous
learning opportunities, especially in computer skills. With the expansion of distance
learning  and  satellite  hookups,  college  classes  can  be  delivered  anywhere,  anytime.
At  the  same  time,  expanding  the  investment  in  community  colleges  would  enable
these locally based schools to reach more people in rural areas. In both cases, schol-
arships and financial aid, as well as company-funded training, could expand the op-
portunities.
Q3. How  can  U.S.  industry  partner  with  schools  and  universities  more  to  help  en-
courage technology competitiveness? Can government facilitate that partnership,
and how?

A3. Corporate  partners  could  make  it  easier  for  their  scientific  and  technical  em-
ployees  to  lend  their  skills  and  time  to  further  technology  training  and  teaching.  A
number  of  companies  offer  technology  programs  and  support  to  schools  nationwide;
among  them  are  Intel,  Hewlett-Packard,  Microsoft,  IBM,  and  Apple.  Some  compa-
nies, including 3M, IBM, DuPont, and General Electric, already encourage their em-
ployees to volunteer in science and math classrooms, as well as in other K–12 class-
es  in  their  communities.  The  MCI  Foundation,  through  its  innovative  Marco  Polo
Web portal, sponsors teacher support and curriculum enhancement in science, math,
and economics education; this is a partnership with government and non-profit orga-
nizations.

The  social  investment  in  education  being  made  by  these  companies  is  both  altru-
istic  and  mission  critical.  These  companies,  while  serving  their  communities  and
employees,  recognize  that  their  future  success  depends  upon  a  large  talent  pool  to
recruit for the next generations of employees. Without the trained technical and sci-
entific  workforce  of  tomorrow,  their  businesses  would  not  be  able  to  continue  to  in-
novate and compete successfully in an increasingly competitive global arena.

Company  leaders  also  act  as  role  models.  They  could  reach  out  to  schools  and
youth  groups  through  community  forums,  through  the  media  (including  new  media
such  as  Web,  podcasting,  instant  messaging,  and  blogs),  through  sponsoring  sports
teams and after-school clubs, and through internships and exchange programs to ex-
cite  youth  about  the  opportunities  for  careers  in  math  and  science.  This  corporate
commitment  might  include  special  outreach  efforts  to  minority  communities  and
women.

In  addition,  there  are  other  very  active  national  and  regional  initiatives  that  in-
volve business leaders in addressing education issues. These include the Council on
Competitiveness,  the  Business  Roundtable,  the  Business-Higher  Education  Forum,
Chambers of Commerce. the Maryland Business Roundtable on Education, and local
business groups. These groups do not work in a vacuum; they include educators and
education organizations as partners and advocates for their experience and expertise
in the classroom.

Leaders  in  higher  education  also  play  an  important  role  in  improving  the  level
of math, science and technical teaching, as well as offering pre-college programs for
children, often as young as those at the elementary school level.

We, at Johns Hopkins University, take our own commitment to providing opportu-
nities  for  K–12  learning  in  math,  science  and  technology  very  seriously.  Just  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

cently, I addressed the members of the Johns Hopkins K–12 Council, a collaborative
coalition  drawn  from  the  University,  Baltimore  City  and  the  Maryland  K–12  com-
munity.  The  Council’s  goal  is  to  catalyze  research-driven  collaborations  between
Johns  Hopkins  and  schools  throughout  Maryland.  Though  it  has  no  five-standing
school of education, Hopkins is considered a path breaker in education research and
reform among national and local education policy-makers.

Johns  Hopkins  effort  through  the  Council  are  geared  towards  sharing  what  we
know  as  educators  and  scientists  or  mathematicians  and  engineers,  what  school
teachers and administrators have learned, and what we think children need to know
to  succeed  beyond  high  school.  While  the  Council’s  efforts  are  geared  to  improving
our  schools,  generally,  and  to  students  overall,  it  pays  particular  attention  to  pro-
viding  opportunities  for  under-represented  students  to  advance  their  knowledge  in
math and science.

To  mention  just  a  few  examples,  in  the  sciences,  the  Johns  Hopkins  University
Applied Physics Laboratory (JHU/APL) has a wide range of programs for young ex-
plorers.  Our  Education  and  Public  Outreach  (E/PO)  office  strives  to  excite  and  in-
spire the next generation of explorers by creating hands-on, interactive learning ex-
periences  for  students.  educators  and  the  general  public.  Our  civilian  space  edu-
cation  and  public  outreach  office  provides  unique  opportunities  for  students,  edu-
cators,  museums,  science  centers  and  the  general  public  to  share  in  the  excitement
of  APL’s  current  endeavors—from  landing  on  an  asteroid  to  looking  for  water  on
Mars.

The  Maryland  Mathematics,  Engineering,  Science  Achievement  Program  (MESA)
is  a  statewide  pre-college  program  sponsored  by  JHU/APL.  Morgan  State  Univer-
sity, The University of Maryland, Towson University, local school systems, and busi-
nesses throughout Maryland. Maryland MESA works directly with schools and edu-
cators to support and develop the interests, skills, and abilities of K–12 students in
science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics.  The  program  also  serves  as  a
driving  force  in  encouraging  and  assisting  minorities  and  females  in  achieving  aca-
demic and professional success in these fields.

In  an  effort  to  boost  middle  school  math  achievement,  Johns  Hopkins  University
researchers  are  spending  a  great  deal  of  time  in  a  magical,  pixilated  place  called
Descartes’  CoVE.  This  innovative  CD–ROM  learning  environment  helps  youngsters
develop higher-level math skills including geometry, logic, and number theory. It is
a  collaborative  virtual  space,  accessible  via  the  Web  and  CD–ROM,  where  students
can  explore  the  farthest  reaches  of  their  mathematical  reasoning  by  solving  real-
world puzzles and problems. Development of Descartes’ CoVE is funded by corporate
grants from AT&T and the Toyota USA Foundation.

In  cooperation  with  the  Johns  Hopkins  Center  for  Talented  Youth,  the  Materials
Research  Science  and  Engineering  Center  (MRSEC)  at  The  Johns  Hopkins  Univer-
sity  offers  paid  summer  internships  in  JHU  materials  research  laboratories  to  six
qualified and under-represented high school students from the greater metropolitan
Baltimore area and surrounding counties. In addition, seven teachers, nominated by
their  schools  and  selected  by  MRSEC  and  CTY,  participate  in  a  four-day  program
designed to introduce them to the research and the scientists of MRSEC.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(83)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

STATEMENT OF THE INSTITUTE OF ELECTRICAL AND ELECTRONICS ENGINEERS—

UNITED STATES OF AMERICA (IEEE–USA)

84

IEEE–USA  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  submit  comments  for  inclusion  in  the
record of House Science Committee hearings on the innovation challenges facing the
United  States.  These  comments  address  the  question  posed  by  the  Committee  on
what the Federal Government should be doing to strengthen the Nation’s innovation
system, with special emphasis on federal programs of support for research and tech-
nical workforce development.

IEEE–USA  was  established  in  1973  to  advance  the  public  good  and  promote  the
professional  careers  and  public  policy  interests  of  the  more  than  220,000  electrical,
electronics  and  computer  engineers  who  are  U.S.  members  of  the  Institute  of  Elec-
trical  and  Electronics  Engineers  (IEEE),  one  of  the  world’s  largest  technical-profes-
sional  societies.  Our  members  have  been  present  at  the  creation  of  electro-techno-
logical  innovations  that  have  fueled  more  than  a  century  of  remarkable  growth  in
American industry sectors, ranging from aerospace and defense, computers and tele-
communications,  electrical  power  generation  and  robotics  to  new  and  emerging
fields including biomedical devices and nanotechnology.

At the dawn of the 21st Century, America desperately needs a new national com-
petitiveness strategy. After a decade of economic prosperity in the 1990’s, the Nation
was  buffeted  by  recession  in  2001  and  by  a  prolonged  jobless  recovery  marked  by
unprecedented  levels  of  unemployment  in  high  technology  fields.  Today  we  face  a
new,  more  rough  and  tumble  form  of  global  economic  competition,  especially  in
science,  engineering  and  technology-based  sectors  that  have  fueled  U.S.  prosperity
since World War II.

China’s  emergence  as  a  manufacturing  superpower,  India’s  strength  as  a  leading
provider of business process out-sourcing services and the collapse of the former So-
viet  Union  have  added  at  least  2.5  billion  people  to  world  labor  markets  already
awash  in  talented,  highly  motivated  people.  Continuing  advances  in  digital  tech-
nologies  and  the  inexorable  spread  of  the  Internet  have  added  a  whole  new  dimen-
sion  to  America’s  competitiveness  challenge.  Any  task  that  can  be  digitized—from
chip design to financial analysis to sophisticated pharmaceutical research—can now
be  performed  in  many  less  developed  countries  at  prices  developed  countries  just
can’t match.

Key Elements of a National Competitiveness Strategy

Twenty  years  ago,  U.S.  policy-makers  faced  a  different  competitiveness  challenge
driven by the aggressive expansion of the Japanese and European economies. In re-
sponse  to  pressure  from  business,  educational,  labor  and  professional  leaders,  Con-
gress enacted and federal agencies implemented fiscal and monetary initiatives that
helped  to  stimulate  public  and  private  investments.  To  an  existing  commitment  to
basic  research,  they  added  a  new  emphasis  on  applied  research  and  technology
transfer  to  accelerate  commercialization  of  new  ideas  and  inventions.  Public  sector
investments in education and training were expanded to include a new focus on life-
long  learning  to  help  incumbent  workers  acquire  knowledge  and  skills  needed  to
master  newly  emerging  and  rapidly  changing  technologies.  And  trade  policy  initia-
tives  were  expanded  to  include  a  greater  emphasis  on  export  promotion  and  open
access to overseas markets. As a result, the United States was able to maintain its
global economic, military and technological preeminence and continue to provide its
residents  with  individual  opportunities  and  living  standards  unmatched  anywhere
else in the world.

To help maintain America’s economic, military and homeland security in increas-
ingly  interdependent,  technology-driven  global  markets,  public  and  private  policy-
makers  must  work  together  to  forge  a  new  National  Competitiveness  Strategy  for
the 21st Century. Key policy objectives ought to be:

• To improve the Nation’s education system from pre-school to graduate school
and  beyond,  with  special  emphasis  on  improving  math,  science  and  commu-
nications skills in grades K–12;
• To  increase  systemic  incentives  for  individuals  to  pursue  education  and  ca-
reers  in  Science,  Math,  Engineering  and  Technical  fields  and  promote  more
effective  utilization  of  SMET  personnel  by  public  and  private  sector  employ-
ers; and
• To  strengthen  the  Federal  Government’s  commitment  to  basic  research  and
enhance its ability to encourage public and private sector investments leading
to  the  development  and  application  of  innovative  processes,  products  and
services.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Implications  for  the  SMET  Workforce—Labor  Market  Supply  and  Demand

Considerations

85

Innovation  is  ultimately  about  people,  their  knowledge  and  their  creativity.  The
S&T  workforce  challenge,  therefore,  is  to  create  and  sustain  an  environment  that
will attract the best and brightest minds and enable them to innovate. A workplace
in  which  creative  people  at  all  levels  share  in  the  rewards—as  well  as  the  risks—
associated  with  innovative  behavior  is  essential  to  meet  changing  labor  market
needs.

Much  of  the  advice  directed  at  Congress  on  S&T  workforce  issues  is  predicated
upon  looming  shortages  of  scientists  and  engineers.  Such  speculative  claims  were
used  in  the  1980’s  and  ’90’s  to  justify  immigration  policy  interventions  that  wors-
ened  rather  than  eased  prevailing  labor  market  imbalances.  This  year,  proponents
of  ‘‘Increase  the  Supply’’  policies  are  using  the  coming  retirement  of  the  baby-boom
generation, the Nation’s growing dependence on foreign-born graduate students and
researchers  and  statistics  comparing  science  and  engineering  degree  production  in
China,  India  and  the  United  States  to  justify  similar  policy  interventions.  Business
groups  are  calling  on  Congress  to  fill  America’s  S&T  educational  pipeline  with  a
younger, more diverse—and less expensive—crop of future S&T workers.

The Business Roundtable’s recent call for a doubling of U.S. science and engineer-

ing degree awards by 2015 is an example of just such an appeal.

IEEE–USA believes that policy-makers should distinguish between the important
societal  need  to  increase  the  technological  literacy  of  all  Americans  from  narrowly
focused calls to increase the supply (and reduce the cost) of science and engineering
graduates. Effective solutions to the broader societal problem will help to ensure the
ready availability of people with the knowledge and skills needed to meet constantly
changing labor market demands.

A  policy  of  pushing  or  pulling  more  Americans  into  science  and  engineering  edu-
cational pipelines—in the absence of reasonable assurances of rewarding job and ca-
reer  prospects—is  unlikely  to  succeed.  Students  don’t  major  in  difficult  fields  just
to  get  scholarships  or  help  employers  meet  hiring  targets.  They  major  in  difficult
fields  to  get  jobs—preferably  professionally  challenging  and  financially  rewarding
jobs.

As  history  has  shown,  Congressional  decisions  to  address  anticipated  labor  mar-
ket  imbalances  by  raising  temporary  H–1B  work  visa  ceilings  created  serious  over-
supplies of scientists and engineers in the 1990’s, led to prolonged periods of unem-
ployment  for  substantial  numbers  of  U.S.  and  foreign  workers  and  probably  helped
to  dissuade  many  of  the  best  and  brightest  U.S.  students  from  pursuing  technical
careers.

Improving SMET Labor Market Incentives and Rewards

As  Harvard  labor  economist  Richard  Freeman  has  observed,  the  marketplace  re-
ality is that U.S. scientists and engineers rank low in terms of wages compared with
income earned by other highly skilled professionals and lag significantly behind doc-
tors,  lawyers  and  business  executives  in  terms  of  income  earned  over  the  course  of
their  careers.  When  coupled  with  the  length  of  time  it  takes  to  earn  post-graduate
degrees—two  to  four  years  in  engineering  and  up  to  eight  additional  years  in  some
scientific  fields—and  the  challenge  of  maintaining  technical  proficiency  over  a  30-
to  40-year  career,  it  should  come  as  no  surprise  that  many  Americans  perceive
science  and  engineering  as  an  unattractive  career  choice.  The  growing  reliance  of
U.S. employers on temporary foreign workers and their ability to transfer high tech
jobs to lower cost overseas locations are making such choices even more difficult for
many of America’s best and brightest young students.

The  challenge  for  policy-makers,  then,  is  to  find  policies  that  improve  opportuni-
ties  for  America’s  best  and  brightest  students  to  pursue  educations  and  careers  in
science  and  engineering  fields.  Trying  to  attract  more  students  into  the  education
pipeline  without  improving  attendant  incentives  and  rewards  won’t  solve  America’s
high  tech  workforce  challenge.  Such  an  approach  will  only  increase  hardships  and
disappointment  when  newly  minted  scientists  and  engineers  find  limited  job  oppor-
tunities,  lagging  financial  rewards,  job  insecurity  and  uncertain  career  prospects
when they receive their degrees.

Workforce Policy Objectives

As part of a comprehensive national innovation strategy, IEEE–USA believes that
workforce-related policies and investments should be directed at the following objec-
tives:

• Strengthen  the  Nation’s  education  system  from  pre-school  to  graduate  school
and  beyond,  with  special  emphasis  on  improving  math,  science  and  commu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

nications  capabilities  in  grades  K–12  and  promoting  greater  flexibility  in  un-
dergraduate and graduate degree programs in science and engineering.

• Improve incentives for individuals to pursue education and careers in science,
math, engineering and technical fields and promote more effective utilization
of  graduates  by  public  and  private  sector  employers.  This  objective  can  best
be accomplished by establishing federal scholarships for service incentive pro-
grams in technology intensive agencies; enacting additional tax incentives for
continuing  education  and  training  (lifelong  learning);  and  expanding  eligi-
bility for Trade Adjustment Assistance to dislocated service sector workers.

• Promote  balanced  reforms  in  America’s  permanent,  employment-based  immi-
gration  system  and  reduce  the  Nation’s  growing  dependence  on  temporary
visa programs.

Critical  Importance  of  Federal  Investments  in  Research  and  Development
Substantial  and  sustained  public  and  private  investments  in  research  over  the
past  50  years  have  spawned  an  abundance  of  technological  breakthroughs,  trans-
formed  American  society  and  helped  the  United  States  to  become  the  world’s  pre-
eminent  economy.  Some  economists  estimate  that  as  much  as  half  of  all  recorded
growth  in  Gross  Domestic  Product  (GDP)  over  this  period  is  attributable  to  techno-
logical advances.

While the U.S. continues to lead the world in its capacity to innovate—to convert
ideas  and  inventions  to  useful  and  affordable  products,  services  and  processes—
overall  federal  spending  on  research  and  development  as  a  percentage  of  GDP  has
declined  significantly  since  1965.  The  focus  of  federally-funded  R&D  has  also
changed.  It  has  shifted  away  from  long-term  investments  in  basic  research—the
kind  of  research  that  has  done  the  most  to  spur  innovation  and  economic  growth—
into much shorter-term investments in applied research and development.

Increases  in  spending  on  weapons-related  research  and  development  at  the  De-
partment  of  Defense  have  accounted  for  70  percent  of  all  federally  funded  R&D  in-
creases in recent years. Of the remainder, 75 percent has gone to the National Insti-
tutes of Health (NIH) and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS). At $71 bil-
lion  and  $29  billion  respectively,  the  R&D  budgets  at  DOD  and  NIH  now  account
for  over  75  percent  of  all  federal  spending  on  research  and  development.  Federal
funding  for  R&D  in  the  physical  sciences  and  engineering,  on  the  other  hand,  has
been flat or declining for over 30 years. To be optimally successful, the Nation’s in-
vestments  in  research  must  be  balanced  across  science  and  engineering  disciplines
and  between  short-term  needs  for  practical  applications  of  state-of-the-art  tech-
nologies and the longer-term search for promising technologies of the future.

The  Federal  Government  has  long  played  a  critical  role  in  helping  to  strengthen
the Nation’s innovation system by sponsoring basic and applied research at univer-
sities, government laboratories, and not-for-profit research laboratories. The Federal
Government invests $132.3 billion in R&D, about one-third of the Nation’s total in-
vestment.  It  funds  long-term  basic  research,  whereas  industry-sponsored  R&D  in-
vestments  are  much  more  narrowly  focused  on  near-term  product  and  process  im-
provements. Thus, federal support continues to be crucial to the discovery and early
stage  development  of  basic  knowledge  that  the  U.S.  needs  to  maintain  its  position
of preeminence in technological innovation.

Sustained national investment in research and development will be necessary, but
is  not  going  to  be  sufficient  to  ensure  continuing  economic  and  technological  pre-
eminence.  We  must  also  be  able  to  capture  and  commercialize  the  outcomes  of  such
research  in  ways  that  will  allow  us  to  continue  to  produce  goods  and  services  that
meet  the  test  of  international  markets  while  simultaneously  improving  the  living
standards  of  our  citizens.  While  the  Federal  Government’s  funding  priority  should
be basic research—where industry under-invests—there needs to be a renewed focus
on bridging the ‘‘valley of death’’ between basic research and the commercialization
of technology, as well as funding the applied research that leads to generic and ena-
bling technologies that can be commercialized by private industry.

Policy-makers  must  also  understand  that  research  and  development  is  only  one
component  of  the  ‘‘commercialization’’  challenge.  An  even  bigger  obstacle  to  tech-
nology innovation than limited federal R&D dollars may be the Wall Street business
imperative  to  return  short-term  profits  each  quarter,  which  discourages  long-term,
high-risk  investments  in  innovation  and  technology  commercialization.  Other  key
components  of  a  new  National  Competitiveness  Strategy—impacting  tax,  trade,  in-
tellectual  property  and  immigration  policy—are  beyond  the  scope  of  this  particular
statement.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

R&D Policy Objectives

87

IEEE–USA  believes  that  federal  research  and  development  policies  and  invest-
ments  should  be  redirected  as  recommended  by  the  Council  on  Competitiveness  in
its Innovate America report in order to:

cent of the S&T budget to long-term research,

re-allocate three percent of agency R&D budgets,

• Stimulate  high-risk  research  through  ‘‘Innovation  Acceleration’’  grants  that
• Restore  DOD’s  historic  commitment  to  basic  research  by  redirecting  20  per-
• Intensify  support  for  research  in  the  physical  sciences  and  engineering  to
• Enact a permanent, restructured research and experimentation tax credit and
extend  the  credit  to  research  conducted  in  university-industry  research  con-
sortia.

achieve a more robust national R&D portfolio, and

In addition, we endorse related Council on Competitiveness recommendations, in-

cluding:

favored, life-long learning accounts,

• Stimulate  greater  workforce  skills  enhancement  through  the  creation  of  tax-
• Enhance  workforce  flexibility  and  facilitate  mobility  by  increasing  the  port-
• Expand  programs  of  assistance  to  service  sector  and  other  workers  who  are
• Build  10  Innovation  Hot  Spots  over  the  next  five  years  to  capitalize  on  re-

ability of health care and pension benefits,

dislocated by technology and trade,

gional assets and leverage public and private sector investments.

In closing, we would also recommend the timely enactment of legislation to:

and engineering education initiatives,

• Increase  National  Science  Foundation  funding  in  line  with  the  previous  Con-
gressional  authorization  in  Public  Law  107–368  that  its  budget  be  doubled,
• Fully  fund  the  FY  2002  commitment  to  expand  incentives  for  NSF’s  science
• Maintain  the  long-term  basic  research  focus  in  other  science  and  technology
programs,  including  those  administered  by  the  Defense  Advanced  Research
Projects  Administration  (DARPA)  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security
(DHS), and
• Increase  high  performance  supercomputing  research  and  development  fund-
ing, revitalize manufacturing technology in the United States by enacting the
Manufacturing  Technology  Competitiveness  Act  (H.R.  250)  and  support  fund-
ing  for  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  at  levels  recommended  in  the
21st Century Nanotechnology Act (Public Law 108–153).

Conclusion

This  statement  focuses  on  two  important  components  of  a  national  innovation
strategy,  and  therefore  presents  only  a  partial  picture  of  what  needs  to  be  done  to
ensure the ability of the United States to maintain its technological competitiveness
in the global economy.

IEEE–USA  appreciate  the  enormity  of  the  many  interrelated  tasks  facing  Con-
gress and the Administration and remains committed to working with all interested
parties to help identify and implement policy options that will help sustain the pros-
perity,  security  and  quality  of  life  that  we  associate  with  a  strong  and  competitive
America.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 15:06 Feb 24, 2006 Jkt 022550 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\072105\22550 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

